VEHICLE  SAFETY  FOR  CHILDREN 

S.  HRG.  110–436 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON CONSUMER AFFAIRS, 
INSURANCE, AND AUTOMOTIVE SAFETY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

FEBRUARY  28,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

35–958 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2008 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

MARGARET SPRING,  Democratic  General  Counsel 
LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  CONSUMER  AFFAIRS,  INSURANCE,  AND 

AUTOMOTIVE  SAFETY 

MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas,  Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire, 

Ranking 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on February 28, 2007  .......................................................................
Statement of Senator Carper  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sununu  ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Campbell, Hon. W. Packy, Former Representative from New Hampshire  .........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Claybrook,  Hon.  Joan,  President,  Public  Citizen;  Former  Administrator,  Na-
tional Highway Traffic Safety Administration  ..................................................
Prepared statement with attachments  ...........................................................
Gulbransen, Dr. Greg, Pediatrician, Syosset, New York  ......................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
McCurdy,  Hon.  Dave,  President/CEO,  Alliance  of  Automobile  Manufacturers; 
accompanied  by  Robert  Strassburger,  Vice  President,  Safety  and  Harmoni-
zation  .....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Medford, Ronald, Senior Associate Administrator for Vehicle Safety, National 
Highway Traffic Safety Administration  .............................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Association of International Automobile Manufacturers, Inc. (AIAM), prepared 
statement  ..............................................................................................................
Fennell, Janette E., President, KIDS AND CARS, prepared statement  .............
Greenberg,  Sally,  Senior  Product  Safety  Counsel,  Consumers  Union  of  U.S., 
.....................................................................................

Inc., prepared statement 

Page 
1 
6 
49 
1 
2 

7 
8 

19 
21 
10 
12 

38 
40 

4 
5 

69 
84 

71 

(III) 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VEHICLE  SAFETY  FOR  CHILDREN 

WEDNESDAY,  FEBRUARY  28,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON CONSUMER AFFAIRS, INSURANCE, AND 
AUTOMOTIVE SAFETY, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:10 a.m. in room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Mark  Pryor, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you  all  for  being  here  today.  It  is  my 
pleasure  to  welcome  you  to  our  Consumer  Affairs,  Insurance,  and 
Automotive Safety Subcommittee hearing on vehicle safety for chil-
dren. This is our first meeting of the year, and I want to thank my 
colleague,  the  Ranking  Member,  Senator  John  Sununu,  who  does 
a  fantastic  job  on  this  issue  and  many  others.  We  look  forward  to 
having a productive couple of years. We anticipate some of our col-
leagues  will  come  and  go  today,  because  there  are  a  lot  of  com-
mittee  hearings  going  on  right  now,  but  I  just  wanted  to  say  good 
morning,  thank  everyone  for  being  here  to  talk  about  auto  safety 
for children. 

We have jurisdiction over a wide range of issues that are impor-
tant  to  the  daily  lives  of  consumers,  and  Senator  Sununu  and  I 
have  already  discussed  some  other  hearings  that  we’ll  have  in  the 
future.  Some  of  those  relate  to  children,  some  of  those  relate  just 
to  the  general  public,  but  I’m  very  pleased  that  we’re  taking  this 
first  hearing,  at  Senator  Sununu’s  request,  to  talk  about  the  sub-
ject matter today. 

In  2005,  1,451  children  ages  14  and  younger  died  as  passengers 
in  motor  vehicle  crashes,  and  approximately  203,000  were  injured 
in  the  United  States.  That’s  an  average  of  four  deaths  and  556  in-
juries each day. We both feel that we need to work to reduce those 
numbers. And I know that Senator Sununu has shown a great com-
mitment to this issue and, as I said, many others. I have two chil-
dren  myself  and  I  feel  the  compulsion  to  try  to  make  our  vehicles 
and our roads safer for our children. 

I  also  want  to  thank  the  witnesses  for  being  here  this  morning, 
providing testimony, for working with the Subcommittee staff on a 
variety  of  topics,  in  terms  of  scheduling  and  statements,  et  cetera. 
Today, we’ll have five witnesses. They’ll discuss a variety of top-
ics  and  issues  related  to  auto  safety  for  children,  including  the 

(1) 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

Cameron  Gulbransen  Kids  and  Cars  Safety  Act  of  2007  that  was 
introduced yesterday by Senator Clinton and Senator Sununu. And 
I  hope  that  today’s  discussion  will  begin  that  process  of  dialogue 
that  we’re  famous  for,  sometimes  infamous  for,  here  in  the  U.S. 
Senate.  I  hope  that  it  definitely  leads  to  more  safety  for  our  chil-
dren and our other auto passengers. 

With that, I’d like to hear from Senator Sununu. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator  Pryor.  I  cer-
tainly  appreciate  the  fact  that  you’ve  made  the  commitment  to 
make  this  our  first  hearing  of  the  year.  As  you  indicated,  Senator 
Clinton  and  I  introduced  legislation  yesterday  that  would  address, 
in  particular,  non-traffic  fatalities.  Over  1,000  children  in  the  last 
5  years  have  been  killed  in  non-traffic  accidents,  and  thousands 
more  have  been  injured.  And  it’s  not  just  children,  but,  of  course, 
when it happens to the youngest among us, I think anyone, wheth-
er  you’re  a  parent  or  not,  can’t  help  but  feel  the  enormity  of  the 
loss. 

Representative  Peter  King  has  introduced  legislation  on  the 
House side, and I certainly want to thank him for his great leader-
ship  on  this  issue.  As  well,  Packy  Campbell  will  be  joining  our 
panel  today,  a  good  friend  of  mine  from  New  Hampshire  who  has 
dealt  very  personally  with  the  impact  that  non-traffic  auto  fatali-
ties  can  have  on  a  family.  This  has  been  a  long  process,  especially 
for  a  lot  of  the  advocates  and  the  coalition  of  partners  that  have 
worked  on  this  legislation.  We  introduced  legislation  at  the  end  of 
the  1st  session  in  2005,  but  obviously  weren’t  able  to  see  it  com-
pleted  on  the  floor,  and  this  hearing,  I  think,  is  an  important  and 
early beginning to the process in the new session of the 110th Con-
gress. 

You  spoke  about  the  impact  accidents  have.  We’re  talking  about 
thousands  of  lives,  thousands  of  families.  And  anytime  we  talk 
about  regulation,  whether  it’s  with  auto  safety  or  any  other  area, 
we have to be mindful of the cost. But the important thing, I think, 
in the construction of the legislation that we’ve introduced is that— 
in  two  of  the  key  areas,  making  automatic  windows  safer,  and  en-
suring  that  cars  can’t  inadvertently  be  put  into  gear  without  the 
knowledge  of  the  driver—the  costs  to  implement  these  improve-
ments  are  less  than  $10  on  a  car.  And  that  is  really  significant, 
that  existing  technologies  are  there  to  make  a  huge  difference  in 
this area. 

And  regarding  the  visibility  behind  a  vehicle,  where  someone 
may unknowingly back over or back into a child, the technology ex-
ists that can certainly prevent tragic accidents. There’s no question 
it’s  more  than  $10  a  car  to  implement  today.  But  there  are  dif-
ferent  options  and  opportunities  to  both  improve  that  technology 
and to bring down its cost. 

Equally  important,  we  are  mindful  that  changes  and  improve-
ments in auto safety don’t happen overnight. The auto industry has 
implemented significant improvements in past years, ranging from 
antilock  brakes  to  side  airbags.  And  this  is  done  because  it  makes 
good  business  sense,  because  it  makes  good  safety  sense,  because 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

it makes a difference in the lives of the consumers that drive those 
vehicles. Things don’t necessarily happen overnight, but I feel—and 
I  think  the  supporters  of  this  legislation  feel—there  are  improve-
ments  that  can,  and  need,  to  be  made.  We  provide  a  window  for 
NHTSA  to  develop  new  rules  in  these  areas,  and  then  to  imple-
ment  those  rules  over  a  3-year  window.  And  I  think  that  is  real-
istic,  it’s  doable,  it’s  achievable,  and  ultimately  it  will  have  a  huge 
impact  on  both  the  fatalities  and  the  injuries  that  we  see  in  these 
three key areas. 

Our bill doesn’t mandate any particular approach to dealing with 
brake-shift  interlock  or  window  safety  or  rear  visibility.  We  don’t 
tell the auto manufacturers how to do it. We don’t tell NHTSA how 
to develop the standard. But we simply say that standards in these 
areas  are  essential,  because  they  will  have  a  material  benefit  for 
consumers.  So,  this  is  the  beginning  of  the  process,  this  session.  I 
want to certainly thank all of those that have been involved in the 
KIDS  AND  CARS  coalition  for  the  advocacy  work  that  they’ve 
done, and the work that they’ve done in helping to gather informa-
tion. One of the things we realized early on was that we don’t have 
good  collection  of  data  in  this  area.  And  NHTSA,  represented  by 
Mr. Medford today, I think is making strides in improving the proc-
ess for data collection. So, we’ve already had a good impact in that 
area. 

I  look  forward  to  the  testimony  of  all  of  our  panelists  today.  I 
hope  this  Subcommittee  and  the  full  Commerce  Committee  can 
move the legislation as one of its first orders of business this year. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Now, typically what we will do is, we’ll allow government officials 
to  testify  on  a  separate  panel,  but,  by  agreement  with  Senator 
Sununu  and  also  with  the  permission  of  Ron  Medford,  who’s  going 
to  be  our  first  witness,  we’d  like  to  consolidate  the  panels  today. 
So, let me introduce the panelists. Y’all come on up, grab a seat, 
all  the  panelists,  and,  as  y’all  are  taking  your  seats,  I’ll  introduce 
you. I’ll recognize Mr. Medford first. 

Mr.  Medford  is  the  Senior  Associate  Administrator  of  Vehicle 
Safety  of  the  National  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administration, 
NHTSA.  He’ll  be  talking  about  NHTSA’s  effort  to  enhance  auto-
mobile  safety  for  children,  and  he’ll  give  us  a  progress  report  on 
some of the studies under SAFETEA–LU. 

And we’ll also hear stories from two parents whose children were 
tragically  killed  in  separate  non-traffic  automobile  accidents.  Mr. 
Packy Campbell, whose son, Ian, was the victim of a runaway car, 
and  also  Dr.  Greg  Gulbransen,  who  accidentally  backed  over  and 
killed  his  2-year-old  son,  Cameron.  I  appreciate  you  all  being  here 
and your willingness to testify. 

Also,  we’ll  have  Joan  Claybrook,  the  President  of  Public  Citizen. 
She brings a wealth of experience and insight into the area of auto-
mobile  safety.  She  was  the  NHTSA  Administrator  during  the 
Carter  Administration  and  has  remained  active  in  this  area  ever 
since. She’ll talk about a variety of auto safety issues. 

And,  finally,  we’ll  have  Mr.  David  McCurdy,  on  behalf  of  the 
automobile  industry.  He’s  the  President  of  the  Alliance  for  Auto-
mobile  Manufacturers,  and  he’ll  talk  about  some  of  the  advances 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

made in child safety standards by the industry. He will provide an 
update on safety measures taken by the industry. 

So,  with  that,  what  I  would  like  to  do  is  acknowledge  Mr.  Ron 

Medford and ask him to make his opening statement. 

We’re  going  to  do  5  minutes  on  the  opening  statement.  I’d  love 
for  y’all  to  watch  the  time.  And  then  we’ll  have  a  series  of  ques-
tions after that. 
Mr. Medford? 

STATEMENT  OF  RONALD  MEDFORD,  SENIOR  ASSOCIATE 
SAFETY,  NATIONAL 

ADMINISTRATOR  FOR  VEHICLE 
HIGHWAY TRAFFIC SAFETY ADMINISTRATION 
Mr. MEDFORD. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, Senator Sununu. I ap-
preciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  the  Subcommittee  this 
morning  to  discuss  the  important  issue  of  improving  vehicle  safety 
for  children.  I  regret  that  Administrator  Nason  could  not  appear 
before  you  because  of  a  prior  commitment  to  testify  at  a  House 
hearing this morning. 

I ask that my written statement be submitted for the record. 
While  every  highway-related  death  is  a  tragedy,  the  loss  of  a 
child  is  particularly  devastating.  Administrator  Nason,  the  mother 
of  two  young  daughters  herself,  has  made  protecting  children  one 
of  her  top  priorities.  Earlier  this  month,  NHTSA  hosted  a  public 
meeting  to  discuss  ways  to  increase  the  use  of  Lower  Anchorages 
and  Tethers  for  Children,  or  a  system  known  as  LATCH.  LATCH 
is a system of anchorages built into newer vehicles that is designed 
to  make  it  easier  to  install  child  seats.  This  meeting  came  about 
as a result of a new survey conducted by NHTSA which found that 
40  percent  of  parents  with  LATCH-equipped  vehicles  still  rely  on 
seatbelts  to  secure  their  child  seats.  The  survey  also  found  that 
many  parents  are  unaware  of  either  the  existence  or  the  impor-
tance of LATCH. As a result of this public meeting, NHTSA is now 
working  with  vehicle  and  car  seat  manufacturers,  consumer  advo-
cates,  and  others  to  develop  a  national  education  campaign  to  bet-
ter  inform  parents  on  proper  child  seat  installation.  Installing  a 
child  seat  should  not  be  a  daunting  task  for  parents,  and  NHTSA 
is committed to making LATCH better known and easier to use. 

Regarding  back-over  crashes,  last  November  NHTSA  released  a 
comprehensive  study  on  this  problem.  As  a  part  of  the  study, 
NHTSA tested camera-based systems currently available, to evalu-
ate  their  performance  and  effectiveness  in  mitigating  back-over 
crashes.  Our  study  found  that,  while  rear-facing  cameras  helped 
drivers  better  see  pedestrians  in  the  back  of  the  vehicle,  the  pres-
ence  of  fog,  rain,  or  glare,  can  significantly  reduce  their  effective-
ness. We also found that cameras were not effective at night. And, 
finally,  our  research  showed  that,  even  if  the  camera  can  clearly 
discern  the  object,  preventing  the  crash  is  still  dependent  on  the 
driver observing the video display and reacting quickly enough. Al-
though  our  studies  show  that  cameras  have  limitations  in  pre-
venting crashes, NHTSA believes this technology holds great prom-
ise.  And,  accordingly,  we  are  continuing  our  research  this  year  on 
examining  the  human-factors  issues  related  to  camera  effective-
ness. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

Regarding  the  entrapment  hazard  posed  by  power  windows,  the 
Senators  may  recall  that  in  2004  NHTSA  finalized  a  regulation 
mandating  all  vehicles  sold  beginning  October  1,  2008,  have  re-
cessed  window  switches  to  prevent  their  inadvertent  activation. 
Last  year,  NHTSA  added  to  this  rule,  pursuant  to  a  mandate  in 
SAFETEA–LU,  requiring  that  power-window  switches  have  to  be 
pulled  up  or  out  to  work.  We  were  pleased  to  complete  this  man-
date  nearly  a  year  ahead  of  the  deadline  set  by  Congress.  We  be-
lieve that, once in effect, these new rules will significantly help re-
duce the likelihood of these incidents. 

Mr. Chairman, it is the worst fear of every parent to lose a child. 
The good news is that child safety in vehicles has come a long way. 
In 1975, the fatality rate for children 5 years old and younger was 
4.5 per 100,000 children. Today, the fatality rate for children under 
5 is 2.27, a record low. However, moreover, current statistics show 
that  children  9  years  of  age  and  younger  had  the  least  amount  of 
fatalities among any age group. These improvements in child safety 
are  attributable  to  a  combination  of  innovative  safety  features  on 
the  vehicle,  widespread  use  of  child  safety  seats,  and  enhanced 
drunk-driving  enforcement.  NHTSA  is  committed  to  making  addi-
tional safety improvements to further protect children. Of all of the 
lifesaving  work  NHTSA  does,  I  consider  this  our  most  important 
duty. 

Thank you for your consideration and for this Committee’s ongo-
ing  effort  to  improve  highway  safety.  I’d  be  glad  to  answer  any 
questions that you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Medford follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RONALD MEDFORD, SENIOR ASSOCIATE ADMINISTRATOR 

FOR VEHICLE SAFETY, NATIONAL HIGHWAY TRAFFIC SAFETY ADMINISTRATION 

Mr. Chairman, my name is Ron Medford, and I am the Senior Associate Adminis-
trator  for  Vehicle  Safety  at  the  National  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administration 
(NHTSA).  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  this  Subcommittee  to  dis-
cuss  the  important  issue  of  improving  vehicle  safety  for  children.  I  regret  that 
NHTSA  Administrator  Nicole  R.  Nason  could  not  appear  before  you  because  of  a 
prior commitment to testify at a House subcommittee hearing. 

The  mission  of  NHTSA  is  to  reduce  fatalities  and  injuries  on  our  Nation’s  roads. 
In 2005, the last year for which complete data are available, there were 43,443 high-
way-related fatalities and 2.7 million injuries. Vehicle crashes are the leading cause 
of death for the age group of 4 to 34. 

While every highway-related death is a tragedy, the loss of a child is particularly 

devastating. 

Administrator  Nason,  the  mother  of  two  young  daughters  herself,  has  made  pro-
tecting  children  one  of  her  top  priorities.  Earlier  this  month,  Administrator  Nason 
hosted  a  public  meeting  with  industry  leaders  and  consumer  advocates  to  discuss 
ways  to  increase  the  use  of  Lower  Anchorages  and  Tethers  for  Children,  or  the 
LATCH  system.  LATCH  is  a  system  of  anchorages  built  into  newer  vehicles  that 
is specifically designed to make it easier to properly install child seats. This meeting 
came  about  as  a  result  of  a  new  survey  conducted  by  NHTSA  which  found  that  40 
percent  of  parents  with  LATCH-equipped  vehicles  still  rely  on  seat  belts  to  secure 
their child seat. The survey also found that many parents are unaware of either the 
existence or the importance of the LATCH system. 

As a result of this meeting, NHTSA is working with vehicle and car seat manufac-
turers,  child  seat  installation  instructors,  and  consumer  advocates  to  develop  a  na-
tional education campaign to better inform parents on proper child seat installation. 
Installing a child safety seat should not be a daunting task for parents, and NHTSA 
is committed to making LATCH better known and easier to use. 

Additionally,  NHTSA  is  currently  working  to  revise  its  ease-of-use  ratings  for 
child  seats.  We  believe  this  new  rating  system  will  serve  as  a  strong  incentive  for 
child seat manufacturers to make proper installation of car seats easier for parents. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

Another area of concern that NHTSA is active in addressing is back-over crashes. 
Last  November,  NHTSA  released  a  comprehensive  study  on  this  problem.  This 
study estimated that back-over crashes cause at least 183 fatalities and up to 7,419 
injuries  annually.  Thankfully  the  majority  of  these  injuries  are  relatively  minor, 
meaning that the victims are treated in the emergency room and released. 

As part of this study, NHTSA tested several systems currently available to evalu-
ate  their  performance  and  potential  effectiveness  in  mitigating  back-over  crashes. 
Our tests found that the performance of ultrasonic and radar parking aids in detect-
ing children behind the vehicle was typically poor. 

Our study also looked at camera-based systems and found that they provide driv-
ers with the ability to see pedestrians in the majority of rear blind spot zones. How-
ever, we found that rain, fog or glare from the sun can significantly reduce the cam-
era’s  ability  to  show  drivers  a  clear  view  of  an  object  in  back  of  the  vehicle.  The 
cameras  are  also  not  effective  at  night.  Finally,  our  research  showed  that  even  if 
the  camera  can  clearly  discern  the  object,  preventing  the  crash  is  still  dependent 
on the driver observing the video display and reacting quickly enough. 

Although our study showed that cameras have limitations in preventing back-over 
crashes,  NHTSA  believes  this  technology  holds  promise.  Accordingly,  we  are  con-
tinuing our research in this area. 

Regarding  the  entrapment  hazard  posed  by  power  windows,  the  Subcommittee 
may  recall  that  in  April  2004,  NHTSA  finalized  a  rule  mandating  that  all  vehicles 
sold in MY 2008 have recessed window switches to prevent their inadvertent activa-
tion.  Last  year,  NHTSA  added  to  this  rule  pursuant  to  a  mandate  in  SAFETEA– 
LU  requiring  that  power  window  switches  not  only  be  recessed,  but  have  to  be 
pulled ‘‘up or out’’ to work. We were pleased to be able to meet this mandate nearly 
a  year  ahead  of  the  deadline  set  by  Congress.  Although  a  child  fatality  due  to  a 
power  window  is  an  extremely  rare  occurrence  (approximately  one  to  two  children 
a  year  on  average)  we  believe  that  once  in  effect,  these  rules  will  significantly  re-
duce the likelihood of these incidents. 

Mr. Chairman, it is the worst fear of every parent to lose a child. The good news 
is child safety has come a long way. A generation ago it was not uncommon for chil-
dren of all ages to be sitting anywhere in the car, completely unrestrained. Through 
our  educational  efforts,  and  the  passage  of  Anton’s  Law  and  other  similar  legisla-
tion, now 98 percent of children under 1 year old are buckled up. 

More  important,  these  changes  in  law  presaged  a  change  in  society  toward  child 
safety in vehicles. Apart from being illegal in all 50 states, most parents now would 
never  consider  not  buckling  up  their  child.  This  focus  on  child  safety  by  parents  is 
paying  dividends,  as  NHTSA  data  shows  that  children  9  years  of  age  and  younger 
have the least amount of fatalities among any age group. 

NHTSA is committed to making additional safety improvements to further protect 
children. Of all the lifesaving work NHTSA does, I consider this our most important 
duty. 

Thank  you  for  your  consideration,  and  for  this  Subcommittee’s  ongoing  effort  to 

improve highway safety. I would be pleased to answer any questions. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Medford. 
We’ve been joined by Senator Tom Carper, of Delaware. And he’s 

decided not to give an opening statement, right? 

Senator CARPER. Could I just make one really, really short state-

ment? 

STATEMENT OF HON. THOMAS R. CARPER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM DELAWARE 

Senator CARPER. Mr. Chairman, thank you for holding the hear-
ing  and  for  letting  me  step  in  for  a  little  while.  I  have  three  hear-
ings going on at the same time, so I’m not going to burden you for 
long with my presence. 

I’m delighted to see my old colleague—not ‘‘old’’—— 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  CARPER.—but  my  colleague  of 

longstanding,  Dave 
McCurdy.  For  those  of  you  who  follow  baseball,  I  think  today  may 
be the first day of spring training. 

[Laughter.] 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

Senator  CARPER.  And  Dave  McCurdy  and  I  used  to  play  on  the 
Congressional  baseball  team,  and  a  couple  of  years,  I  remember, 
when  I  was  nominated  for  Most  Valuable  Player  by  the  Repub-
licans—I’m a Democrat. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  CARPER.  Tom  Ridge  was  the  outfielder  for  the  Repub-
licans  for  a  while.  A  couple  of  years,  I  think  we’ve  picked  him  as 
our Most Valuable Player. This guy can handle himself well behind 
the witness stand, and he is also pretty good with a baseball. Real 
good with a bat. But it’s great to see you. 

And  thank  you  all  for  being  here  and  testifying  with  us  this 

Thank you, David. Welcome. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you,  Senator.  And  thank  you  for  joining 

morning. 

us. 

Our  next  witness  is  Packy  Campbell,  former  State  Representa-

tive for the State of New Hampshire. 

STATEMENT OF HON. W. PACKY CAMPBELL, FORMER 

REPRESENTATIVE FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Mr. CAMPBELL. Good morning. A little nervous this morning. It’s 
my  first  time  in  front  of  the—what  I  call  the  ‘‘real  Congress.’’  I’ve 
been  in  front  of  the  Senate  in  New  Hampshire  a  whole  bunch  of 
times in the panels, so—— 

It’s  an  honor  to  be  here  with  the  Members  of  this  Committee, 
and  it’s  an  honor  to  be  one  of  the  advocates,  but  also  a  politician 
who  realizes  that  sometimes  it  takes  an  act  of  Congress  to  save 
lives.  And  it’s  going  to  take  an  act  of  Congress  to  save  more  lives. 
My  story,  of  losing  my  young  son,  and  literally  having  my  child 
die  in  my  arms,  is  tragic.  It’s  heart-wrenching.  It  can  keep  you 
awake  nights.  I’m  not  here  to  pull  at  your  heartstrings,  although 
this  is  an  emotional  issue  for  me  and  all  of  the  family  advocates. 
I’m  here  to  tell  you  that  this  is  a  good  commonsense  measure.  As 
a  Republican  in  the  New  Hampshire  House  in  the  ‘‘Live  Free  or 
Die’’  State,  I’ve  never  voted  for  a  helmet  bill  or  a  mandatory  seat-
belt bill. What are we talking about? And sometimes, the safety ad-
vocates  have  to  tap  me  and  say,  ‘‘Remember,  safety  is  a  good 
thing.’’ 

I know safety is a good thing, and I know this is a good bill, be-
cause it’s reasonable, it’s cost-effective. You know, my story relates 
to  a  brake-shift  interlock  or  a  brake  transmission,  which  they  call 
BTSI,  or  ‘‘Betsy’’  is  the  word  I’m  supposed  to  learn.  But  no  matter 
what  the  issue  is,  whether  it’s  power  windows  or  rear  visibility 
standards, as a parent and as a compassionate Congress, as human 
beings,  sometimes  we  need  to  regulate.  This  is  one  of  those  times. 
The  industry  and  NHTSA  has  been  excellent.  I  came  down  and 
met  with  NHTSA  and  had  over  12  people  in  the  room,  with  the 
help  of  Congressman  Bass.  We  had  a  great  meeting.  Out  of  that 
meeting came real, productive measures. Those measures were the 
first  step  in  the  right  direction  of  this  thing.  I  realize  there  are 
things  that  happen  in  SAFETEA–LU.  It  was  SAFETEA–LU  that 
motivated  me  to  come  here,  because,  quite  frankly,  as  a  parent,  I 
was  angry,  because  I  said,  ‘‘It’s  not  enough.’’  But  then,  as  a  legis-
lator,  I  calmed  down  and  said,  ‘‘It’s  a  step  in  the  right  direction. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

We’re moving the ball forward.’’ This bill is good legislation. I hope 
that  all  the  Committee  members  will  join  Senator  Sununu  and 
Senator Clinton and cosponsor this bill. I think it would be a great 
statement, politically, that we need to care about our children, and 
we need to protect our children. 

I  obviously  failed  in  reading  my  statement  here.  But  it’s  just 
sometimes  something  you’ve  got  to  speak  from  the  heart.  I  hope 
that  this  Committee  and  this  Senate  will  do  an  act  of  Congress  to 
save other parents and to save lives. I know there are other meas-
ures that could have happened, or should have happened. The bot-
tom  line  is,  my  son’s  death  wasn’t  counted,  it  hasn’t  been  counted, 
that—the  rules  that  NHTSA  can  make  up,  they  can’t  make  with 
those statistics. Those statistics have not been gathered to a degree 
that  allowed  them  to  do  rulemaking.  Those  statistics  need  to  be 
gathered.  This  bill,  unfortunately,  needs  to  hammer  that  point 
home  so  that  NHTSA,  who  is  willing  to  do  their  job,  who’s  trying 
to  do  their  job,  will  have  clear  direction  that  this  data  needs  to  be 
tracked so that we have a reason—a justified reason—I mean, they 
do  a  cost-benefit  analysis,  as  morbid  as  that  is,  with  these  safety 
features.  Since  we  don’t  have  the  data,  we  can’t  do  that  analysis. 
That’s  why  we  need  an  act  of  Congress  to  say,  ‘‘These  are  impor-
tant safety features, and we should enact them.’’ 

I thank you very much, and—I lost track of time, but I think my 

5 minutes is up. And I appreciate it, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Campbell follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. W. PACKY CAMPBELL, FORMER REPRESENTATIVE 

FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman and Members of the Consumer Affairs, Insurance, and 
Automotive  Safety  Subcommittee  of  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science, 
and  Transportation,  for  the  opportunity  to  provide  this  testimony  on  the  need  for 
improved efforts to protect children from vehicle-related injury. 

My name is Packy Campbell. I live in the small town of Farmington, New Hamp-
shire with my lovely wife Brenda, and our children Ryan, Sarah, Adam and our in-
fant child Sean. Also in that town is the grave of my son Ian Joseph, who tragically 
died at our house on April 14, 2004 just shy of his second birthday. 

I  am  a  politician  by  choice,  an  advocate  by  circumstance.  I  served  two  terms  in 
the  New  Hampshire  House  of  Representatives.  It  was  during  my  first  term  in  the 
House  that  my  son  Ian  was  killed  in  a  non-traffic  non-crash  incident  in  our  drive-
way.  Ian  was  killed  when  his  then  4  year  old  brother  was  able  to  knock  my  com-
pany’s  F–350  pickup  truck  out  of  park  without  either  turning  the  vehicle  on  or 
touching the brakes, a feat believed to be impossible due to the fact that the vehicle 
was equipped with brake transmission shift interlock (BTSI). When purchasing that 
vehicle  I  intentionally  sought  to  buy  one  with  safety  features  that  would  keep  my-
self, family and others safe. 

However,  although  equipped  with  some  safety  features,  my  4  year  old  son  Adam 
was  able  to  put  the  truck  key  in  the  ignition  and,  without  starting  the  vehicle  or 
touching  the  brakes,  shift  the  truck  out  of  park  and  into  either  neutral  or  reverse. 
That nearly 8,000 pound truck then rolled in our driveway and crushed Adam’s best 
buddy,  our  toddler  son  Ian,  who  died  in  my  arms  on  the  front  porch  of  our  home. 
I  have  become  aware  of  that  our  family’s  tragic  accident  is  not  all  that  unusual. 
On  April  12,  2005  Milan  Richard  Hedmark  died  in  a  startlingly  similar  situation. 
It was this revelation that motivated me on my current course of action to seek leg-
islation,  as  I  realize  my  responsibility  now  is  to  protect  children  and  families  from 
experiencing this type of tragedy. 

Our accident involved a vehicle equipped with brake shift interlock. What is brake 
shift  interlock?  It  is  a  mechanical  or  electrical  design  in  a  vehicle  steering  column 
that  prevents  a  car  from  coming  out  of  park  unless  the  brake  petal  is  depressed. 
Virtually  every  car  made  has  these  features.  However  some  cars  are  designed  so 
that the safety feature only works in four out of five key positions. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

Since  the  accident  occurred  I  have  worked  with  NHTSA,  with  the  automobile  in-
dustry,  and  with  advocacy  groups  like  KIDS  AND  CARS,  to  make  known  the  risks 
to  children  posed  by  cars  that  do  not  contain  simple,  cost  effective  safety  measures 
proposed  in  the  Act,  and  to  mandate  such  features  in  all  vehicles  sold  in  the  U.S. 
by  2010.  In  my  discussions  with  NHTSA  even  some  of  their  representatives  were 
shocked  to  learn  of  what  Mr.  Keith  Brewer  at  NHTSA  called  a  ‘‘sweet  spot’’  where 
a BTSI equipped car can be put into neutral without touching the brake. 

Through the combined efforts of those groups, and others, a voluntary agreement 
(NHTSA–2006–25669–2; ‘‘Reducing the Risk of Inadvertent Automatic Transmission 
Shift  Selector  Movement  and  Unintended  Vehicle  Movement;  a  Commitment  for 
Continued  Action  by  Leading  Automakers’’)  was  reached  to  promote  public  con-
sciousness of the fact that brake transmission shift interlock (BTSI) is not foolproof 
right  now,  by  disclosing  which  vehicles  do  or  do  not  have  BTSI  safety  features  to 
prevent inadvertent roll-away accidents, and to work to make sure that all vehicles 
sold  in  the  U.S.  by  2010  are  fully  protected  against  roll-away  incidents  such  as  the 
one that took the life of my son Ian, and hundreds of other children. 

When  first  presented  with  the  agreement,  I  was  hesitant  to  support  it,  as  I 
thought  that  the  Cameron  Gulbransen  2005  bill  should  have  been  passed  to  man-
date  both  disclosure  and  changes  to  vehicle  design  standards.  I  was  convinced  to 
support  the  voluntary  agreement,  however,  by  the  promises  of  design  changes  by 
2010  and  immediate  disclosure  by  the  industry  and  NHTSA  of  vehicles  that  com-
plied, and with a personal commitment to me by key members of NHTSA to produce 
a list of vehicles that DID NOT comply. At the time, I thought that doing something 
now  to  save  some  lives  in  2010  was  autos  worth  supporting  the  voluntary  agree-
ment.  I  wanted  a  list  of  non-compliant  auto’s  so  that  it  could  be  provided  as  part 
of  the  law  enacted  by  the  New  Hampshire  Legislature  and  signed  by  Governor 
Lynch  to  mandate  the  disclosure  of  all  vehicles  that  did  not  have  complete  brake 
shift interlock features. 

With all due respect, in regards to the agreement I quote Ronald Reagan who said 
‘‘trust,  but  verify.’’  If  there  is  a  commitment  on  the  part  of  industry  what  is  wrong 
with holding industry accountable for that commitment. 

On  a  more  personal  level,  my  9  year  old  son  said  to  me  regarding  this  proposed 
law that ‘‘people are more likely to break their promises than they are to break the 
rules.’’ 

When the list of compliant vehicles was released by NHTSA and industry in Sep-
tember,  I  contacted  NHTSA  for  two  reasons.  The  first  was  that  the  F–250  was  on 
the  list  but  did  NOT  comply  with  BTSI.  Some  6  weeks  later,  Ford  amended  their 
list to delete the F–250. This was presumably only done as a result of my contacting 
NHTSA  about  the  problem  with  Ford’s  list.  The  second  was  that  I  wanted  to  see 
what  I  was  promised,  namely  what  I  call  the  ‘‘non-compliant  list.’’  The  response  I 
received  was  that  there  is  no  such  list,  and  that  I  would  need  to  figure  it  out  on 
my  own.  I  therefore  joined  Janette  Fennell  of  KIDS  AND  CARS  in  writing  to 
NHTSA  on  October  2,  2006  requesting  that  NHTSA  publish  such  a  list,  just  as  it 
publishes the list of compliant cars. 

On  February  16th,  just  9  short  days  ago,  NHTSA  finally  produced  the  list.  Upon 
being advised of the newly created list this past weekend, it only took me a minute 
to  confirm  that  the  voluntary  agreement  is  still  insufficient.  Specifically,  the  same 
F–250, and the F–350 that killed my son, are not on either list. Every vehicle manu-
factured  and/or  sold  in  the  U.S.  is  supposed  to  be  on  the  list,  and  I  found  two  that 
are  not  in  just  about  a  minute,  approximately  the  time  it  took  my  4  year  old  son 
to  run  into  daddy’s  truck  only  slightly  ahead  of  my  wife  and  I  and  get  the  vehicle 
to  roll-over  his  baby  brother.  I  will  not  be  surprised  to  find  that  other  vehicles  are, 
for  whatever  reasons,  omitted  from  the  list;  for  example,  I  am  told  that  the  Chevy 
SSR and Saab 9.2 are on neither list. 

Regardless of why these errors, and perhaps others, were made, the point is that 
this voluntary system is just not an adequate way for this Nation to take reasonable 
steps  to  protect  our  children.  When  industry  and  the  marketplace  are  unable  to 
come to grips with a problem, it is sometimes necessary for the government to step 
in and mandate such reasonable steps to promote the public safety. 

These  examples  show  that  without  an  act  of  Congress  industry  and  NHTSA  will 

be unlikely to provide the type of information promised. 

Additionally,  that  agreement  only  deals  with  one  of  the  issues  addressed  in  the 
Gulbransen bill, namely the brake transmission shift interlock. It does not deal with 
auto  reverse  power  windows,  nor  with  rear  visibility  standards,  both  of  which  have 
caused  death  and  injury,  both  of  which  are  easily  avoidable  and  equally  deserving 
of action by Congress. 

As  a  parent  who  is  a  member  of  a  group  of  parents  who  are  forced  to  deal  with 
the  loss  of  their  child,  the  principal  is  simple:  safety  features  are  not  luxury  items, 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

nor should the be optional equipment. Further, the absence of safety features is not 
something that should be hidden from consumers. It is not the fault of parents that 
accidents, otherwise preventable, happen. Great parents suffer great tragedies. The 
only  way  to  ensure  that  fatalities  will  not  happen  is  to  design  them  out.  This  pro-
posed Act will design out, with reasonable affects to the cost structure on the indus-
try, defect’s that costs the lives of children. 

PLEASE  UNDERSTAND  THAT  MY  SON  IAN  WOULD  BE  ALIVE  IF  HE  AND 
HIS BROTHER HAD JUMPED INTO THE OTHER VEHICLE IN MY DRIVEWAY 
AT  THE  TIME  OF  THE  ACCIDENT.  That  vehicle,  a  2002  GMC  Envoy,  was 
equipped  with  BTSI  in  all  key  positions,  making  the  roll-away  accident  impossible 
for  a  4-year  old  to  cause.  The  fact  that  I  purchased  both  of  those  cars  with  the  ex-
pectation  that  they  would  behave  in  the  same  way  shows  why  we  need  Congress 
to act on this bill. 

Finally, the agreement does nothing to require industry or NHTSA to compile sta-
tistical  data  of  non-traffic,  non-crash  situations  involving  bodily  injury  or  death.  It 
will  take  an  act  of  Congress  to  change  the  reporting  requirements  of  law  enforce-
ment  across  the  company.  NHTSA  did  a  2004  study  of  death  certificates  my  sons 
death  certificate  was  not  reported  in  a  way  that  it  was  calculated  in  that  study.  It 
will take an act of Congress to make relevant statistics a possibility. 

When  my  little  son  Ian  died  in  the  little  town  of  Farmington  in  the  little  State 
of  New  Hampshire  in  April  2004,  his  death  was  not  tracked,  recorded  or  counted 
by  any  governmental  agency  in  this  country.  His  death,  and  hundreds  of  other 
deaths  in  such  non-traffic  non-crash  situations,  should  not  go  un-noticed.  They 
should be heard by this Congress, and NHTSA, and industry, as a call, or more ap-
propriately  a  cry,  to  take  reasonable  steps  to  avoid  such  needless  deaths  and  inju-
ries in the future. 

NHTSA  may  suggest  to  this  Congress  that  it  is  working  on  these  issues  through 
rulemaking. In fact, prior to offering the voluntary agreement NHTSA offered to put 
the  issue  in  rulemaking,  and  asked  me  to  petition  for  such  a  rule.  I  declined  that 
request. 

Although NHTSA has the authority to make rules with the force of law when cir-
cumstances warrant, rulemaking requires NHTSA to perform a cost-benefit analysis 
on any proposal to require a safety feature. However, without any accurate data on 
non-traffic non-crash related deaths, such an analysis is impossible. 

More  importantly,  it  is  a  morally  reprehensible  analysis  to  do  in  the  first  place. 
One  child’s  death  is  enough  when  it  can  be  so  reasonably  avoided  by  the  common 
sense,  reasonable  and  affordable  safety  measures  proposed  by  this  Act.  Congres-
sional  action  circumvents  this  morbid  ‘‘cost-benefit’’  analysis.  Congressional  action 
is needed now. 

It  is  only  by  enacting  this  law  that  the  Federal  Government  will  begin  to  collect 
data  on  such  incidents,  and  will  force  the  industry  to  implement  reasonable  meas-
ures  to  avoid  the  deaths  of  hundreds  of  children  in  the  future.  It  is  my  hope,  and 
my  prayer,  that  my  little  Ian’s  death  does  not  go  unnoticed  by  this  Congress,  but 
that  instead  you  hear  his  cry,  and  the  cry  of  his  family  and  hundreds  of  family’s 
across  this  great  Nation,  and  enact  the  Cameron  Gulbransen  Kids  and  Cars  Safety 
Act of 2007. 

I  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  and  submit  testimony  to  you  on  behalf 
of  my  son  Ian,  his  brothers  and  sister,  my  wife  Brenda,  and  on  behalf  of  the  hun-
dreds of other families who look to this Committee and this Congress to learn from 
our  tragedy  and  do  the  best  you  can  to  prevent  such  needless  deaths  in  the  future. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Our next witness is Dr. Greg Gulbransen. 
Doctor? 

STATEMENT OF DR. GREG GULBRANSEN, PEDIATRICIAN, 

SYOSSET, NEW YORK 

Dr. GULBRANSEN. Mr. Chairman, good morning. 
I’m  Dr.  Greg  Gulbransen.  I’d  like  to  start  by  saying  thank  you 

for taking on this challenge. 

I  wish  to  thank  you  and  Members  of  the  Consumer  Affairs,  In-
surance,  and  Automobile  Safety  Subcommittee  for  inviting  me  to 
appear  before  you  today  to  testify  on  the  important  issue  of  child 
safety as it relates to the vehicles that we drive. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

I’m  here  today  to  speak  to  you  as  a  dad,  a  pediatrician,  a  board 
member  of  KIDS  AND  CARS,  and  a  concerned  citizen  in  an  at-
tempt  to  make  vehicles  safer  for  the  American  family.  My  wife, 
Leslie, and I, along with hundreds of other families, are determined 
to prevent our tragedy from happening again and again to so many 
other families. 

On  October  19,  2002,  a  preventable,  but  unthinkable,  tragedy 
struck  our  family.  It  was  9:30  p.m.,  and  I  stepped  out  to  move  my 
SUV  into  the  driveway.  Inside  my  home  were  my—the  babysitter, 
Leslie,  my  wife,  and  my  two  young  sons,  or  so  I  thought.  It  was 
a habit of mine to back the SUV into the driveway in the evening, 
because  in  the  morning  the  streets  are  congested  with  children 
playing  and  people  walking  their  dogs.  Cameron  was  not  in  the 
driveway  when  I  got  into  my  SUV.  While  driving  in  reverse,  I  re-
member looking over my shoulder and using the rearview and both 
side  mirrors,  and  backing  slowly  into  my  parking  space.  I  thought 
I was driving a safe vehicle and doing the right thing, until I sud-
denly  felt  the  front  wheel  go  over  a  bump.  I  had  no  idea  what  I 
had  run  over.  I  knew  I  couldn’t  have  hit  the  curb,  and  it  was  too 
early  for  the  newspaper.  Out  of  concern,  I  jumped  out,  and  there 
in the headlights was my 2-year-old son, Cameron, in his baby-blue 
pajamas,  holding  his  blanket,  face  up,  dying  of  massive,  profuse 
head  injuries.  I  knew  immediately  it  was  too  late,  but  I  did  every-
thing I could to save my dying son. 

I  can’t  begin  to  describe  the  sickening  shock  and  devastation. 
How  could  this  have  happened?  I  looked  where  I  was  driving,  but 
yet  I  never  saw  him.  I  never  had  a  chance  of  seeing  Cameron,  be-
cause he was too small—too small for the large blindspots that are 
built  into  the  design  of  our  vehicles.  While  SUVs,  minivans,  and 
pickup trucks have become more popular, they pose a greater dan-
ger  for  our  children.  These  vehicles  have  huge  blind  zones  that 
have  led  to  tragedies  for  many  families,  because  drivers  simply 
cannot  see  who  or  what  is  behind  them  when  they  are  driving. 
These  technologies  will  continue—I’m  sorry—these  tragedies  will 
continue, if something isn’t done. 

I  learned,  later,  that  there  are  technologies,  like  cameras  and 
sensor  systems,  that  would  have  warned  me  that  my  son  was  be-
hind  my  vehicle.  As  a  pediatrician  who  advocates  for  children’s 
safety,  and  as  a  father  who  has  lost  a  child,  I  can’t  stress  enough 
how  important  it  is  to  get  these  lifesaving  technologies  into  vehi-
cles. 

While  the  Government  is  responding  for  collecting  accident  data 
and  recognizing  safety  issues  affecting  our  daily  lives,  at  the 
present time the Government hasn’t even set up a database to col-
lect information about non-traffic injuries. Yes, my son was also not 
a statistic. No one ever even counted his death. It was an unevent. 
Without  data  collection,  how  can  we  expect  the  Government  and 
the  automobile  industry  to  appreciate  the  need  to  make  the  nec-
essary  safety  improvements  in  our  vehicles?  I  find  it  curious  that 
it’s  taken  the  efforts  of  a  nonprofit  agency,  such  as  KIDS  AND 
CARS,  to  bring  this  issue  to  the  public  attention.  If  not  for  their 
work—if  not  for  their  efforts  to  inform  the  public  about  these  dan-
gers,  I’m  certain  we  would  not  have—we  would  not  be  here  today, 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

trying to work together to solve this grave public health and safety 
issue. 

Yes,  the  ultimate  responsibility  for  operating  a  vehicle  lies  with 
the  driver.  I  feel  that  pain  every  single  day.  However,  the  auto-
mobile  industry  is  responsible  for  designing  safe  vehicles,  and  the 
Government  has  both  the  duty  and  the  obligation  to  protect  chil-
dren  in  and  around  motor  vehicles  by  setting  reasonable  safety 
standards. 

The  truth  is  that  when  drivers  are  backing  their  vehicles,  they 
are  forced  to  put  blinders  on  that  prevent  them  from  seeing  large 
areas  behind  their  vehicle.  Parents  know  the  driver  should  not  be 
required to bear the burden for this problem alone, especially when 
motor  vehicles  come  equipped  with  large  blind  zones  as  standard 
equipment,  blind  zones  that  cannot  be  eliminated  by  mirrors  and 
cannot  be  made  safe  by  educational  messages  alone.  Only  tech-
nology  that  provides  drivers  with  visibility  behind  the  vehicle  can 
shine  a  light  into  the  blind  zone  and  ensure  that  our  children  are 
protected. 

I’m not talking about futuristic, pie-in-the-sky developments that 
are  years  away.  I’m  talking  about  stuff  that  already  exists,  that’s 
already  being  offered  as  either  standard  or  optional  equipment  on 
many  current  production  vehicle  models.  Until  the  Government 
acts  to  provide  that  technology  in  every  vehicle,  drivers  will  have 
little chance of preventing back-over crashes, and our children will 
remain  at  risk  even  near  their  own  homes.  That’s  why  the  Cam-
eron Gulbransen Kids and Cars Safety Act of 2007 is so important. 
While my son’s name is on the bill, it’s not about him at all. It’s 
about every single child that’s ever been backed over, inadvertently 
left in a vehicle, or accidently trapped in a power window. This leg-
islation  honors  all  of  them,  and  shows  how  much  we  are  trying  to 
make vehicles safer for the American family. 

For  some  reason,  there’s  a  little  confusion.  The  press  seems  to 
think  that  all  we  want  to  do  is  advocate  that  cameras  are  on  the 
rear of all these vehicles. It’s not that. We want safety performance 
standards for rearward visibility. 

So,  thank  you  for  your  time  and  giving  me  the  honor  to  crusade 
here  today  for  safety  of  children.  I  thank  you  for  the  past  support 
for  this  legislation  and  your  efforts  to  get  it  enacted  last  year  be-
fore Congress adjourned. I hope that passage of this legislation will 
be  of—a  priority  of  the  Subcommittee,  and  I  want  to  help  in  any 
way I can. I think this is my fifth time down here, and I’ll continue 
to keep coming down. 

I’m  happy  to  answer  any  questions  you  have.  I  also  have  in-
cluded  attachments  to  the  testimony  to  illustrate  the  enormous 
blind  zones  behind  some  vehicles,  a  fact  sheet  on  the  major  provi-
sions in the legislation, and information about the growing number 
of child deaths. 

Please remember the motto from KIDS AND CARS, ‘‘Be sure you 

can see before you turn the key.’’ 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Gulbransen follows:] 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. GREG GULBRANSEN, PEDIATRICIAN, SYOSSET, NEW 

YORK 

13 

Mr.  Chairman,  good  morning.  I  am  Dr.  Greg  Gulbransen  and  would  like  to  start 
by saying thank you for taking on this challenge. I wish to thank you and the mem-
bers  of  the  Consumer  Affairs,  Insurance,  and  Automotive  Safety  Subcommittee  for 
inviting  me  to  appear  before  you  today  to  testify  on  the  important  issue  of  child 
safety as it relates to the vehicles we drive. I am here today speaking to you as dad, 
a Pediatrician, a board member of KIDS AND CARS, and a concerned citizen in an 
attempt to make vehicles safer for the American family. My wife Leslie and I, along 
with  hundreds  of  other  families  are  determined  to  prevent  our  tragedy  from  hap-
pening again and again to so many other families. 

On  October  19,  2002  a  preventable  but  unthinkable  tragedy  struck  our  family.  It 
was 9:30 p.m. and I stepped outside to move my SUV into the driveway. Inside my 
home  were  the  babysitter,  Leslie,  and  my  two  young  sons;  or  so  I  thought.  It  was 
a  habit  of  mine  to  back  the  SUV  into  the  driveway  in  the  evening  because  in  the 
morning  the  streets  were  congested  with  children  playing  and  people  walking  their 
dogs.  Cameron  was  not  in  the  driveway  when  I  got  into  my  SUV.  While  driving  in 
reverse I remember looking over my shoulder and using the rear view and both side 
mirrors  and  backing  slowly  into  my  parking  space.  I  thought  I  was  driving  a  safe 
vehicle  and  was  doing  the  right  thing  until  I  suddenly  felt  the  front  wheel  go  over 
a  bump.  I  had  no  idea  what  I  had  run  over.  I  knew  I  couldn’t  have  hit  the  curb. 
Out  of  concern  I  jumped  out  and  there  in  the  headlights  was  my  2-year-old  son, 
Cameron, in his baby blue pajamas holding his blanket, face up, bleeding profusely 
from a massive head injury. I knew immediately it was too late but I did everything 
I could to save my dying son. 

I can’t begin to describe the sickening shock and devastation. How could this have 
happened?  I  looked  where  I  was  driving  but  yet  I  never  saw  him!  I  never  had  a 
chance  of  seeing  Cameron  because  he  was  too  small.  Too  small  for  the  large  blind 
zones that are built into the design of our vehicles. 

While  SUVs,  minivans  and  pickup  trucks  have  become  more  popular  they  pose  a 
greater danger for our children. These vehicles have huge blind zones that have led 
to tragedies for many families because drivers simply cannot see who or what is be-
hind  us  when  we  drive.  These  tragedies  will  continue  if  something  isn’t  done.  I 
learned  later  that  there  are  technologies,  like  cameras  and  sensor  systems  that 
would  have  warned  me  that  my  son  was  behind  my  vehicle.  As  a  pediatrician  who 
advocates  for  children’s  safety  and  as  a  father  who  has  lost  a  child,  I  can’t  stress 
enough how important it is to get these life-saving technologies into all vehicles. 

While  the  government  is  responsible  for  collecting  accident  data  and  recognizing 
safety  issues  affecting  our  daily  lives,  at  the  present  time  the  government  hasn’t 
even  set  up  a  database  to  collect  information  about  non-traffic  injuries.  Without 
data  collection  how  can  we  expect  the  government  and  the  automobile  industry  to 
appreciate  the  need  to  make  the  necessary  safety  improvements  in  our  vehicles?  I 
find it curious that it has taken the efforts of a nonprofit agency, KIDS AND CARS, 
to  bring  this  issue  to  public  attention.  If  not  for  their  efforts  to  inform  the  public 
about these dangers, I’m certain we would not be here today trying to work together 
to  solve  this  grave  public  health  and  safety  issue.  Yes,  the  ultimate  responsibility 
for  operating  a  vehicle  lies  with  the  driver.  I  feel  the  pain  of  that  every  day.  How-
ever, the automobile industry is responsible for designing safe vehicles, and the gov-
ernment  has  both  the  duty  and  the  obligation  to  protect  children  in  and  around 
motor  vehicles  by  setting  reasonable  standards  for  safety.  The  truth  is  that  when 
drivers  are  backing  their  vehicles  they  are  forced  to  put  blinders  on  that  prevent 
them from seeing large areas behind their vehicle. Parents and other drivers should 
not  be  required  to  bear  the  burden  for  this  problem  alone,  especially  when  motor 
vehicles  come  equipped  with  large  blind  zones  as  standard  equipment.  Blind  zones 
that cannot be eliminated by mirrors and cannot be made safe by educational mes-
sages alone. Only technology that provides drivers with visibility behind their vehi-
cle can shine a light into the blind zone and ensure that our children are protected. 
I  am  not  talking  about  futuristic,  pie-in-the-sky  developments  that  are  years 
away, I am talking about existing technology that is already offered either as stand-
ard or optional equipment on many current production vehicle models. Until govern-
ment acts to provide that technology in every vehicle, drivers will have little chance 
of  preventing  back-over  crashes,  and  our  children  will  remain  at  risk  even  near 
their own homes. 

That’s  why  the  Cameron  Gulbransen  Kids  and  Cars  Safety  Act  of  2007  is  so  im-
portant.  While  Cameron’s  name  is  on  the  bill,  let’s  remember  this  isn’t  just  about 
Cameron.  This  bill  is  about  every  single  child  that  has  been  backed  over,  inadvert-
ently  left  in  a  vehicle  or  accidentally  trapped  in  a  power  window.  This  legislation 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

honors  all  of  them  and  shows  how  much  we  are  trying  to  make  vehicles  safer  for 
the American family. 

Thank  you  for  your  time  and  giving  me  the  honor  to  crusade  here  today  for  the 
safety  of  children.  I  thank  you  for  your  past  support  for  this  legislation  and  your 
efforts  to  get  it  enacted  last  year  before  Congress  adjourned.  I  hope  that  passage 
of  the  legislation  will  be  a  priority  of  the  Subcommittee  and  I  want  to  help  in  any 
way  I  can.  This  is  my  fifth  trip  to  Capitol  Hill  to  urge  passage  and  I  will  come  as 
often as you like to see this important bill enacted. 

I  am  happy  to  answer  any  question  you  have.  I  also  have  included  attachments 
to  my  testimony  that  illustrate  the  enormous  blind  zones  behind  some  vehicles,  a 
fact sheet on the major provisions in the legislation and information about the grow-
ing number of child deaths and injuries. 

Please  remember  the  motto  from  KIDS  AND  CARS  when  you  get  behind  the 

wheel of your vehicle today, ‘‘Be sure you can see before you turn the key.’’ 

THE CAMERON GULBRANSEN KIDS AND CARS SAFETY ACT OF 2007 FACT SHEET 

At  least  four  young  children  are  killed  in  a  non-traffic  automobile  incident  every 
week. The age of victims in these cases is usually less than 5-years-old. These trage-
dies  are  truly  heart-wrenching—but  also  preventable.  This  bill  addresses  the  lead-
ing causes of these needless deaths and injuries by directing the Secretary of Trans-
portation to issue safety standards and take other action to reduce the incidence of 
child injury and death inside or outside of parked passenger motor vehicles. 
The Need To Protect Children In and Around Vehicles 

Since 2001, over 1,000 children have died in non-traffic incidents and this statistic 
has  been  steadily  rising.  Preliminary  data  indicate  219  documented  fatalities  in 
2006. The government currently does not collect data about non-traffic incidents, so 
we  know  that  the  real  fatality  numbers  are  much  higher.  (data  provided  by  Kids 
and Cars, www.KidsAndCars.org.) 

A 2002 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) study (July 2000–June 
2001) reported that over 9,160 children are treated in hospital emergency rooms due 
to non-traffic incidents. 
The Bill 

The  Cameron  Gulbransen  KIDS  AND  CARS  Safety  Act  of  2007  directs  the  Sec-
retary of Transportation to issue safety standards to decrease the incidence of child 
injury and death. The Act: 

• Establishes  reasonable  rulemaking  deadlines  regarding  child  safety,  applicable 

to all passenger motor vehicles, in three ways: 

—Ensures  that  power  windows  and  panels  automatically  reverse  direction 
when they detect an obstruction to prevent children from being trapped, in-
jured or killed. 

—Requires a rearward visibility performance standard that will provide driv-
ers  with  a  means  of  detecting  the  presence  of  a  person  behind  the  vehicle 
in order to prevent backing incidents involving death and injury, especially 
to small children and disabled people. 

—Requires  the  vehicle  service  brake  to  be  depressed  whenever  the  vehicle  is 
taken out of park in order to prevent incidents resulting from children dis-
engaging the gear shift and causing vehicles to roll away. 

• Establishes  a  child  safety  information  program,  administered  by  the  Secretary 
of  Transportation.  This  will  involve  collecting  non-traffic  incident  data,  inform-
ing parents about these hazards to children and ways to mitigate them, as well 
as  making  this  information  available  to  the  public  through  the  Internet  and 
other means. 

Support 

Senators  John  E.  Sununu  (R–NH)  and  Hillary  Rodham  Clinton  (D–NY)  are  the 
prime senate sponsors; the House of Representatives companion bill is sponsored by 
Congresswoman Jan Schakowsky (D–IL) and Congressman Peter King (R–NY) 

Groups  supporting  the  bill  include:  KIDS  AND  CARS,  Consumers  Union,  Advo-
cates for Highway and Auto Safety, the American Academy of Pediatrics, Public Cit-
izen,  Kids  in  Danger,  Trauma  Foundation,  The  Zoie  Foundation,  Adrianna’s  Rule 
Foundation, Veronica’s Eyes Foundation, Craig’s Crusade and more. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
b
u
g

l

16 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
b
u
g

l

17 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
3
b
u
g

l

18 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Ms. Joan Claybrook, Public Citizen. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
4
b
u
g

l

19 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOAN CLAYBROOK, PRESIDENT, PUBLIC 
CITIZEN;  FORMER  ADMINISTRATOR,  NATIONAL  HIGHWAY 
TRAFFIC SAFETY ADMINISTRATION 
Ms. CLAYBROOK. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
First,  I’d  like  to  acknowledge  the  role  of  this  Committee  in  pas-
sage  of  the  SAFETEA–LU  bill  for  which  we  are  very  appreciative. 
It’s a wonderful piece of legislation, and it’s made a huge difference 
already in safety. 

Second,  I’d  like  to  acknowledge  the  work  that  was  done  on  the 
TREAD  Act,  although  some  of  you  weren’t  here  then.  This  com-
mittee  did  pass  the  TREAD  Act  in  2000,  and  it  also  has  made  im-
portant  improvements  in  the  activities  of  the  National  Highway 
Traffic Safety Administration. 

Third,  I’d  just  like  to  direct  the  Senators  to  some  of  the  families 
that  are  in  the  first  rows  here  who  have  come  to  Capitol  Hill  to 
lobby for the legislation, and to thank Senator Sununu for your co-
sponsorship of this important bill. 

Mr. Chairman, I have divided my statement into three parts: the 
importance  of  protecting  children  inside  cars,  the  importance  of 
protecting  children  outside  of  vehicles,  and  school  bus  safety.  And 
because there’s so much to say, I’m going to have to urge that you 
pay  attention  to  the  testimony  as  its  whole,  but  I’m  just  going  to 
mention a few items in it. 

First,  I  do  want  to  support  the  enactment  of  the  Cameron 
Gulbransen legislation. It’s really an important piece of legislation, 
and it needs to be passed. 

But  the  question  of  what  the  Committee  is  going  to  do  in  terms 
of  its  decisions  in  the  legislative  process  beyond  that  legislation,  I 
think,  need  to  be  addressed  in  terms  of  the  number  of  deaths  to 
children in the different types of crashes that occur. 

And  it’s  amazing,  I  just  got  this  data  yesterday  from  NHTSA— 
late  yesterday—and  so,  I  don’t  have  it  included  in  my  testimony, 
but  I  do  have—it’s  being  distributed  today—a  sheet  that  pictures 
a  car  that  describes  the  different  crash  sources/modes,  and  where 
these  deaths  and  injuries  occur.  The  data  are  for  2005.  In  frontal- 
crash  impacts—these  are  0-  to  8-year-old  children  who  are—there 
are  241  deaths  in  frontal-impact  crashes.  There  are  257  deaths  of 
children  in  rollover  crashes.  There  are  61  deaths  in  rear-impact 
crashes.  There  are  200  deaths  in  side-impact  crashes.  There  are 
339  deaths  of  child  pedestrians.  And  there  are  226  deaths  that 
would be prevented were the Gulbransen law to pass. 

So, there you have the importance of that bill spelled out by the 
statistics and the data. Incredibly, incredibly important. And it’s no 
less  important  than  front-,  rear-,  rollover,  or  side-impact  crashes 
that occur. 

Now,  the  other  interesting  piece  of  information  that  I  got  from 
NHTSA  late  yesterday  was  the  relationship  between  the  deaths  of 
children and the deaths of adults in those modes of crashes. And— 
in terms of percentages, because the numbers are quite different— 
but  if  you  compare  the  0-  to  8-year-old  children  in  these  modes  of 
crashes to adults age 13 and above, they’re 33 percent for rollovers, 
where  children  are  killed;  and  34  percent  for  adults.  Same  thing. 
For  frontal,  you  have  31  percent  for  the  0-  to  8-year-old,  and  38 
percent  for  adults,  so  it’s  very  close.  For  the  side,  it’s  26  percent 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

and  22  percent—26  for  children,  22  for  adults.  And  in  the  rear, 
there’s a bigger difference, 8 percent and 3 percent. 

Now, what does that say to us, in terms of what’s needed? Well, 
first—cars  are  not  made  for  children.  They’re  just  not  made  for 
children.  Motor  vehicles  are  made  for  adults.  And  so,  the  items 
that  are  addressed  in  our  testimonies  jointly  today  are  ones  that 
say,  ‘‘These  are  the  most  important  areas  where  there  are  simple 
remedies.’’ Most of them are incredibly inexpensive, like the brake- 
shift  interlock,  which  is  voluntarily  offered  by  the  auto  industry, 
but  only  80  percent  of  the  vehicles  comply  with  it  today,  and  less 
used  to  when  this  voluntary  deal  was  first  agreed  to  in  the  1990s. 
It costs a couple of dollars, and it means that no kid can shift that 
gearshift  out  of  park  and  into  neutral,  and  let  the  car  roll  away, 
because  they  can’t  reach  the  brake.  And  so,  the  brake-shift  inter-
lock requires you to put your foot on the brake before you can shift. 
And  I  will  say  that  when  I  was  5  years  old,  I  did  that  in  my  par-
ents  car,  and,  as  a  result,  I  almost  died,  because  the  car  almost 
rolled  over  a  cliff.  And  if  some  woman  hadn’t  seen  it  happen  and 
stopped  it,  I  would  be  dead,  at  5  years  old.  So,  this  is  a  really  im-
portant, but small, item. 

But if you look at the back-over, which is where the largest num-
ber  of  deaths  are  occurring,  and  which  is  really  unnecessary,  I 
want  to  say  two  things.  One  is  that  in  1980  I  issued  a  conspicuity 
standard, a standard which measures what a person inside the ve-
hicle  can  see  all  around,  360°.  And  that  standard  took  10  years  to 
develop,  and  it  was  never  implemented.  NHTSA  never  imple-
mented  it.  And,  as  a  result,  we  have  vehicles  that  are  designed  so 
that—and  Consumer’s  Union  has  documented  this—so  you  cannot 
see  children  for  many,  many  feet,  particularly  if  you’re  short.  And 
many women who drive these SUVs are short. You cannot see your 
children.  And  even  if  you’re  taller,  you  can’t.  So,  there’s  got  to  be 
something  done.  And  what  this  bill  has  in  it  is  a  safety  perform-
ance standard. It’s not a requirement for any particular technology. 
It’s a safety performance standard. So, I think that this bill is well- 
warranted. 

In terms of power windows, when I was at NHTSA in the 1960s, 
we started working on power windows. They were just coming into 
vehicles  and—in  a  widespread  way.  And  no  one  knew  what  to  do. 
Well,  now  we  have  the  methods  for  raising  and  lowering  the  win-
dow  changed.  The  auto  reverse  in  Europe  costs  $10  to  $12  a  win-
dow.  If  you  ask  any  parent  would  they  spend  $10  to  $12  per  win-
dow  to  protect  their  kids  from  being  strangled  or  their  arms  or 
hands  being  cut  off,  you  wouldn’t  find  a  parent  in  this  nation  that 
wouldn’t pay that amount of money. And when you think about the 
cost  of  fancy  radios  and  all  the  rest  of  it  that  are  put  in  cars  that 
cost  much  more,  then  you  know  that  these  are  cheap,  very  cheap, 
by comparison. 

And  when  the  industry  does  something  in  mass  production,  the 
costs  go  way  down.  They  always  complain  about  it,  and  then  they 
give  you  the  optional  equipment  price,  but  when  they  put  it  in 
mass production, the price goes down. 

There  are  several  other  things  that  I  mention  in  my  testimony. 
I’ll  just  briefly  say  that  child  restraints  are  only  tested  for  frontal 
crashes,  they’re  not  tested  for  side,  rear,  or  rollover  crashes.  They 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

should  be.  The  rear  seatbacks  often  fall  down  on  children,  because 
they’re not built in a strong enough way, and the standard for vehi-
cle  seats  is  35  years  old.  And  we  tell  people  to  put  their  kids  in 
the  back  seat,  and,  when  we  do,  the  seat  can  go  back  and  harm 
them.  When  NHTSA  did  crash  tests  for  the  rear-impact  tests  that 
they  were  going  to  raise  to  50  miles  an  hour,  almost  every  seat 
back fell backward. Now, who doesn’t go 50 miles an hour down the 
highway,  right?  You  may  not  crash  at  50  miles  an  hour,  but  it 
could  be  at  40  in  the  rear.  NHTSA  did  nothing  to  issue  a  new 
standard to require that seat backs don’t fall back. And yet, we tell 
all people to put their kids in the back seat. If that seat back falls 
backward, what happens is, the front seat passenger goes zooming 
backward,  because  your  belt  doesn’t  hold  you  in  a  rearward  crash, 
and  you  become  a  quadriplegic  or  paraplegic,  and  you  crush  your 
child. Terrible. And that data is generally not collected. 

So, I urge you to pass this bill. I urge you to look at these other 
issues.  They’re  very  minor  costs,  most  of  them.  The  seat-back  cost 
couldn’t  be  $15  or  $20  to  fix  per  car.  And  I  urge  you  to  consider 
all  of  these  issues,  because  they’re  really  critically  important,  and 
children deserve it. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Claybrook follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOAN CLAYBROOK, PRESIDENT, PUBLIC CITIZEN; 
FORMER ADMINISTRATOR, NATIONAL HIGHWAY TRAFFIC SAFETY ADMINISTRATION 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman and Members of the Consumer Affairs, Insurance, and 
Automotive  Safety  Subcommittee  of  the  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science, 
and  Transportation,  for  the  opportunity  to  provide  this  testimony  on  the  need  for 
improved  efforts  to  protect  children  from  vehicle-related  injury.  I  am  Joan 
Claybrook, the president of Public Citizen, a national non-profit public interest orga-
nization  with  over  150,000  members  nationwide.  We  represent  the  interests  of  con-
sumers  and  ordinary  citizens  through  lobbying,  litigation,  regulatory  oversight,  re-
search, and public education. 

Child safety issues first gained the spotlight in the 1990s, with the discovery that 
auto manufacturers were installing cut-rate airbags that were killing children. I had 
alerted  manufacturers  in  1980  of  research  pointing  to  the  need  to  consider  designs 
and  technologies  such  as  top-mounted,  vertically  deploying  airbags,  dual  inflation, 
technical  folds,  and  tethers  in  order  to  reduce  risks  to  children  and  small-statured 
adults,  but  most  automakers  failed  to  follow  through  on  this  information.  Although 
automakers had known for a dozen years that the child/airbag relationship was deli-
cate, they neither warned the public against placing children in the front seats nor 
designed  airbags  to  protect  children.  Instead,  they  exploited  the  discretion  granted 
them by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration’s (NHTSA) broad per-
formance  standard  and  abused  it.  It  took  Congressional  action  to  force  NHTSA  to 
require the automakers to accommodate children in airbag design. This story, unfor-
tunately, is paradigmatic of the child safety issue. 

Motor  vehicle  crashes  are  the  leading  cause  of  death  for  children  ages  3  to  14  in 
the  United  States. 1 NHTSA  reports  that  in  2005,  1,946  children  were  killed  and 
234,000 children were injured in motor vehicle crashes. 2 That means that each day 
an  average  of  5  children  are  dying  in  motor  vehicle  crashes  while  another  640  are 
injured. 3 Moreover,  children  are  also  at  serious  risk  in  and  around  motor  vehicles 
in  non-traffic  related  incidents,  and  these  data  are  completely  missing  from  state 
and  Federal  safety  databases.  In  the  absence  of  government  data  collection,  KIDS 
AND CARS, a national nonprofit safety organization, maintains a database of child 
fatalities  from  motor  vehicle  events  other  than  crashes  on  the  Nation’s  roadways. 
These non-traffic motor vehicle related events—which include children being backed 
over  by  vehicles,  being  inadvertently  left  in  hot  vehicles,  being  strangled  by  power 
windows,  and  setting  cars  in  motion  when  left  unattended  in  a  vehicle—killed  at 
least 226 children in 2005 alone. 4 (We suspect these numbers could be even higher, 
because  NHTSA  does  not  currently  collect  non-traffic  death  and  injury  data;  KIDS 
AND CARS is the only source for these data.) 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

What is even more tragic about these bleak statistics is that many of these deaths 
and  serious  injuries  could  have  been  prevented.  When  I  refer  to  preventability,  let 
me  be  clear  that  I  am  not  blaming  parents;  instead,  I  am  referring  to  the  failures 
of  industry  to  design  motor  vehicles  for  children  and  of  our  Federal  Government  to 
use the resources at its disposal to gather data and set standards to protect children 
from needless harm. I am sure that we will undoubtedly hear today about the need 
to  educate  parents,  or  that  many  of  the  deaths  and  injuries  we  will  discuss  today 
are  attributable  to  parental  neglect.  I  caution  you  to  reject  these  arguments,  for 
they are simply the child safety equivalent of the ‘‘nut behind the wheel’’ argument 
that industry raised for years in order to avoid accepting responsibility for its design 
failures. We know that children must be driven to school, the doctor, and so on; we 
know  as  well  that  parents  do  not  have  fifteen  arms  or  eyes  in  the  backs  of  their 
heads,  and  that  children  can  get  into  enormous  danger  in  a  split  second.  Vehicles 
must  be  designed  with  some  recognition  of  these  simple  facts  of  life,  and  NHTSA 
must  ensure  that  they  are.  As  NHTSA  and  manufacturers  continue  their  pattern 
of neglect, then we must turn to Congress to make sure children are protected. 
I. Child Safety Is Undermined by Unnecessary Information Gaps 

A  core  issue  for  child  safety  is  how  little  information  is  available  to  guide  policy-
makers  and  help  the  public  hold  NHTSA  and  the  motor  vehicle  industry  account-
able. One problem is that information which NHTSA has at its disposal is not read-
ily  accessible  to  the  public.  For  example,  a  researcher  interested  in  learning  the 
number  of  children  killed  in  rear-impact  crashes  or  side-impact  crashes  in  a  given 
year cannot find this information through the public interface for NHTSA’s Fatality 
Analysis Reporting System (FARS). NHTSA can and will generate reports from that 
data, but only upon request. 

NHTSA’s data gathering systems have focused on injuries and deaths from crash-
es on the Nation’s roadways and have never tracked the deaths and injuries related 
to  motor  vehicles  in  non-traffic  incidents.  The  invisibility  of  non-traffic  incidents  in 
NHTSA data has resulted in decades of neglect of several kinds of alarming yet pre-
ventable  child  deaths  and  injuries,  such  as  back-overs  in  driveways  and  strangula-
tions in power windows of parked vehicles. Thanks to the enterprising work of KIDS 
AND  CARS,  we  know  much  more  about  the  gravity  of  these  risks  to  children. 
NHTSA is only now taking the initial steps to begin gathering this kind of data sys-
tematically, thanks to Congress’s decision in 2005’s Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Effi-
cient  Transportation  Equity  Act:  A  Legacy  for  Users  (SAFETEA–LU)  to  require 
NHTSA to do so. 

Meanwhile, the agency is undermining our ability to know about potential defects 
in  child  safety  seats.  Outraged  by  the  revelation  that  NHTSA  had  known  of  the 
Ford-Firestone  deaths  but  failed  to  act,  Congress  demanded  in  the  Transportation 
Recall Enhancement, Accountability, and Documentation (TREAD) Act of 2000 that 
NHTSA  create  an  early  warning  system—a  database  to  alert  the  public  of  trends 
suggesting  a  potential  safety  defect.  NHTSA  has  created  that  system,  but  it  has 
inexplicably  opted  in  its  implementing  rule  to  keep  most  of  that  data  secret  from 
the public. (In fact, when NHTSA created the database and starting gathering infor-
mation  from  manufacturers  in  2003,  it  kept  all  such  data  secret,  pending  the  out-
come of litigation challenging the agency’s first rule to exempt the data from public 
disclosure.  After  NHTSA  lost  in  court,  it  returned  to  the  drawing  board  and  pro-
posed a rule that would keeps most of this data secret. Meanwhile, at present none 
of this data is yet available to the public.) 5 

In  addition  to  monitoring  NHTSA’s  efforts  to  implement  the  data  gathering  re-
quirements of SAFETEA–LU, I encourage Congress to hold the agency’s feet to the 
fire  on  its  decision  to  keep  the  TREAD  Act’s  early  warning  data  (including  data  on 
child  safety)  a  dark  secret.  I  also  call  on  Congress  to  require  the  agency  to  close 
the  information  gap  by  compiling  the  latest  safety  data  on  children  and  other  vul-
nerable populations (such as seniors and pregnant women) in readily available peri-
odic reports. 
II.  Children  Are  Unnecessarily  at  Risk  From  Insufficient  Motor  Vehicle 

Safety Standards 

It  is  no  easy  task  to  try  to  catalogue  all  the  vehicle-related  harms  that  children 
face.  Of  course,  there  are  all  the  risks  that  are  specific  to  children,  such  as  unsafe 
booster seats, inadequate child restraints, and vehicle back-overs. There are also all 
the  risks  that  adults  face—frontal,  rear,  side-impact,  and  rollover  crashes—which 
may  be  magnified  for  children.  I  want  to  focus  on  a  few  of  the  most  urgent  risks, 
and  I  believe  it  would  be  useful  to  group  them  in  three  categories:  risks  children 
face inside the vehicle, those they face outside the vehicle, and those they face when 
they are entrusted to school buses. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

A. Protecting Children Inside the Vehicle 

Children  face  a  range  of  harms  while  they  are  inside  the  vehicle—as  passengers 
in cars on the road, and as occupants (often active occupants) in cars that have been 
parked. I want to focus on a few core issues that are most in need of oversight and 
legislative action. 
1. The Child Safety Gap in Motor Vehicle Safety Standards 

Federal motor vehicle safety standards protect all of us, including children, every 
day. The increase in the number of passenger vehicles and drivers since 1966 is sub-
stantial,  yet  both  the  number  of  deaths  and  the  death  rate  have  declined  dramati-
cally  in  the  last  40  years.  NHTSA’s  motor  vehicle  safety  standards  have  played  a 
large  role  in  achieving  these  savings.  Nonetheless,  there  are  significant  gaps  in  ex-
isting and developing safety standards: just as manufacturers fail to design vehicles 
to  protect  children,  NHTSA  is  not  doing  enough  to  develop  safety  standards  that 
will adequately address the particular needs of children. 

Side  impact  crashes.  Perhaps  the  most  important  example  is  side-impact  crash 
protection. The current side-impact crash protection standard (FMVSS No. 214) does 
not  address  rear  occupants.  NHTSA  proposed  in  2004  to  amend  the  side-impact 
standard  to  include  demanding  new  tests  for  front  seat  occupants,  essentially  re-
quiring the use of upper and lower interior side-impact air bags. The proposed rule’s 
requirements  for  rear  seat  occupants,  however,  are  far  less  demanding  and  can  be 
met  with  foam  padding  instead  of  dynamic  side-impact  airbags,  which  offer  greater 
protection.  What  does  this  inadequate  proposal  mean  for  children?  Simple:  parents 
are  instructed  to  place  children  in  the  rear  seats,  precisely  where  the  current  and 
proposed  side-impact  standards  fail  to  offer  sufficient  protection. 6 Moreover,  the 
proposed  rule  endangers  children  under  12  who  are  in  the  front  seat  of  a  vehicle, 
because side-impact airbags for front seat occupants that comply with the proposed 
rule  still  allow  children  to  be  ejected  from  the  vehicle.  In  short,  NHTSA’s  new  pro-
posal  offers  no  protection  for  children  whether  they  ride  in  the  front  or  back  seat. 7 
Meeting  the  needs  of  children  in  side-impact  crashes  should  be  a  higher  priority, 
given  that  side-impact  collisions  account  for  42  percent  of  vehicle-related  child  fa-
talities for rear-seated children ages 0–8. 8 

Rollover crashes. The safety gap for children also means that weak standards will 
be doubly weak for children. A significant portion of vehicle-related child fatalities— 
around 30 percent of child deaths from motor vehicle crashes—is attributable to roll-
over  crashes. 9 Unfortunately,  NHTSA  has  proposed  a  standard  for  roof  strength  in 
rollover crashes that will not adequately protect anyone, much less children. Among 
its  problems:  it  maintains  the  static  platen  test,  which  fails  to  accurately  replicate 
the damage and forces a vehicle is subjected to during a rollover crash, and its inad-
equacy will not mitigate the deaths and injuries specifically attributable to the cas-
cading  effects  of  a  weak  roof,  which  include  the  creation  of  ejection  portals  when 
the window glazing fails, belt failure, door retention failure, and injury from the vio-
lent  intrusion  of  the  roof  itself.  I  look  forward  to  this  particular  issue  being  ad-
dressed in more detail in the months to come, as this Committee conducts oversight 
of  the  Administration’s  implementation  of  the  Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible,  Efficient 
Transportation  Equity  Act:  A  Legacy  for  Users  (SAFETEA–LU),  which  requires 
NHTSA to issue roof crush and ejection mitigation standards. 

Seat backs. Unmet needs for adult safety protection can put children at particular 
risk.  One  case  in  point  is  the  need  for  stronger  seat  backs.  In  a  rear-impact  crash, 
the  vehicle’s  front  seats  can  collapse  rearward.  The  result  is  not  just  back  injury, 
paraplegia,  and  quadriplegia  for  the  front-seat  occupant:  the  rearward  collapse  of 
the  back  of  the  front  seat  injures  any  occupants  behind  it,  in  the  rear  seat.  All  too 
often, the rear seat occupants injured or killed in cases of seatback collapse are the 
vehicle owners’ own children. NHTSA does currently have a seat strength standard, 
but  it  remains  so  pathetically  inadequate  that  some  believe  vehicle  seats  are  held 
to  a  weaker  standard  than  lawn  chairs.  Manufacturers  are  well  aware  of  the  dan-
gers  of  seat  back  failures  in  crashes, 10 and  NHTSA  is  likewise  aware 11—although 
it nonetheless aborted its proposal in 2000 to remedy the problem. 12 Congress must 
insist that NHTSA make necessary updates to this important rule. 
2. Child Restraints 

The revolution that was supposed to fill, or at least bridge, this safety gap for the 
youngest  children  was  the  widespread  use  of  child  restraints  and  booster  seats. 
Child restraints have definitely had a positive effect on child safety, even when they 
are misused. Nonetheless, there is much more NHTSA can do to improve child safe-
ty by focusing its safety and consumer information programs on child restraints. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

The Need for Safety Standards 

24 

Under  FMVSS  213,  the  only  test  child  safety  restraints  must  pass  is  a  standard 
for 30 mile per hour frontal-impact crashes. Children are at risk in all crashes, not 
just  frontal-impact  crashes.  For  example,  side-impact  collisions  account  for  42  per-
cent  of  child  fatalities  for  rear-seated  children  ages  0–8, 13 and  on  average  32  per-
cent of children killed in motor vehicle crashes die in rollovers. 14 Federal motor ve-
hicle  safety  standards  are  designed  to  ensure  that  our  motor  vehicles  meet  a  very 
basic  level  of  safety  and  are  capable  of  protecting  occupants  from  common  crashes 
and  other  safety  concerns.  Is  it  unreasonable  to  expect  these  standards  to  require 
basic  protections  for  children,  the  most  precious  cargo  our  vehicles  will  ever  carry, 
in common vehicle crashes? 

In  2000,  Congress  instructed  NHTSA  in  section  14  of  the  TREAD  Act  to  initiate 
a  rulemaking  on  side-impact  crash  test  standards  for  child  restraints,  which  was 
supposed to be completed 2 years later. After considering the issuance of such a rule 
NHTSA  decided  that  more  research  was  necessary  and  then  promptly  abandoned 
the  rulemaking  it  was  explicitly  required  to  complete.  Congress  never  authorized 
NHTSA  to  abandon  this  rulemaking.  Congress  must  ensure  that  NHTSA  does  not 
continue  to  stall  on  this  important  issue  but  instead  pushes  forward  with  research 
and the timely issuance of a much needed standard. 

In  addition  to  failing  to  issue  safety  standards  for  child  restraints  in  even  the 
most  basic  of  vehicle  crashes,  NHTSA  also  fails  to  guarantee  that  child  restraints 
are  safe  and  appropriate  for  the  upper  age/size  range  recommended  to  use  them. 
FMVSS 213, the only standard applicable to child restraints, which includes booster 
seats  used  by  older  children,  is  severely  limited  because  it  tests  safety  seats  only 
for children weighing up to 65 pounds, even though booster seats are recommended 
for children up to 80 pounds. 15 

Finally,  it  is  essential  for  NHTSA  to  issue  standards  for  child  restraints  for  the 
crash types discussed above, while including a full range of representative child test 
dummies,  including  the  10-year-old  child  test  dummy  for  children  up  to  80  pounds 
which  the  agency  has  developed  but  not  included  in  performance  standards.  Cur-
rently,  the  one  standard  test  required  for  child  restraints  only  requires  child  re-
straints  to  perform  adequately  in  frontal  crash  tests  at  30  miles  per  hour.  This  is 
dangerously  inadequate.  NHTSA  must  also  test  child  safety  seats  in  side-impact, 
rear-impact,  and  rollover  crashes  in  order  to  guarantee  that  children  are  properly 
protected. 
The Need for Built-In Restraints 

Properly installed child restraints can reduce the chance of a fatality in a vehicle 
crash  by  71  percent  for  infants  and  by  54  percent  for  children  1–4  years  old. 16 A 
recent  NHTSA  study  that  evaluated  the  effectiveness  of  a  new  standardized  instal-
lation  method,  however,  found  that  many  parents  still  improperly  install  child  re-
straints  in  vehicles. 17 Child  car  seats  are  the  only  consumer  product  mandated  by 
law that requires a 32-hour training course to learn how to install correctly. 

In  2002,  a  new  safety  technology  known  as  LATCH  (Lower  Anchors  and  Tethers 
for Children) became mandatory in new vehicles. NHTSA mandated these new child 
restraint attachment standards in order to end confusion about installation methods 
and  to  help  parents  safely  install  restraints  for  their  children.  In  December  2006, 
however,  NHTSA  released  a  final  report  on  the  study  it  conducted  to  evaluate  the 
LATCH system. The results show that the system is so confusing that many parents 
and caregivers are not properly using the system, and the need for education about 
the system is great. 18 

To NHTSA’s credit, the agency has acknowledged that there is a widespread prob-
lem with poor child restraint installation, and it has promised to work to eliminate 
this confusion so that all children can be properly restrained in vehicles. 19 Working 
to  educate  people  about  proper  installation  methods,  however,  does  not  go  far 
enough to address the many installation difficulties and confusion surrounding child 
restraint  systems.  Only  with  built-in  child  restraint  systems  can  parents  avoid  the 
problem of mis-installation. 

Built-in  child  restraint  systems,  also  known  as  integrated  child  restraints,  when 
combined with 5-point harness systems are the most effective way to safely restrain 
children  in  motor  vehicles.  Currently,  integrated  child  restraints  can  accommodate 
children  other  than  infants  over  the  age  of  one.  Their  mandatory  installation  in  all 
new vehicles would eliminate widespread restraint mis-installation problems for for-
ward-facing seats, ensuring that children over the age of one are properly restrained 
in motor vehicle crashes. 

Furthermore, integrated child restraints would ensure easy notification if a safety 
defect  is  discovered.  Currently,  child  seat  purchasers  must  register  themselves  for 
notice  in  case  of  a  recall,  in  contrast  to  the  automatic  registration  that  takes  place 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

when a vehicle is purchased. Built-in restraints eliminate the need for self-registra-
tion, which can reduce parents’ likelihood of receiving timely recall notification. 

Finally,  integrated  restraints  would  instantly  make  it  possible  that  child  safety 
seats  could  be  included  in  all  the  safety  standards  for  which  the  vehicle  is  tested. 
The Need for Consumer Information 

In the absence of any requirement for integrated child restraints, NHTSA should 
at a minimum provide consumers more information about the child restraints on the 
market. The New Car Assessment Program (NCAP), which NHTSA launched under 
my watch in 1978, provides consumers information about vehicle performance under 
conditions  which  are  more  stringent  than  those  used  for  safety  standards.  NCAP 
has  been  quite  successful  in  creating  market  incentives  for  manufacturers  to  im-
prove  safety.  Additionally,  NCAP’s  most  important  success  has  been  in  educating 
consumers  about  the  safety  of  available  vehicles,  empowering  consumers  to  make 
educated  choices  about  the  vehicles  they  choose  to  purchase  for  themselves  and 
their families. 

Despite NCAP’s importance to consumers and the program’s success at motivating 
manufacturers to strive for higher safety ratings, NHTSA has failed to include child 
restraint systems in its NCAP testing. The only evaluation rating NHTSA conducts 
on  child  restraint  systems  for  consumers  is  an  ease-of-use  rating.  Although  impor-
tant for consumers, the ease-of-use rating should not be NHTSA’s top rating priority 
for  child  restraints  when  the  safety  of  these  restraint  systems  is  left  unevaluated. 
NHTSA’s  failure  to  test  child  restraints  through  the  NCAP  program  leaves  parents 
and caregivers at a great loss and children at great risk. Parents and caregivers are 
denied  information  necessary  to  make  safe  and  educated  decisions  about  the  re-
straint systems they choose, and a valuable opportunity is squandered to encourage 
manufacturers  to  build  safer  restraint  systems.  (Of  course,  with  built-in  child  re-
straints,  the  child  systems  would  be  tested  every  time  the  vehicle  itself  is  put 
through its paces.) NHTSA should inform consumers about child restraint perform-
ance in frontal, side, rear, and rollover crashes. 

Europe  and  Japan  administer  programs  similar  to  NCAP  in  order  to  inform  con-
sumers about the safety of available vehicles. 20 In both of these programs, child re-
straints  are  tested,  and  consumers  are  provided  with  a  safety  rating  system  that 
informs them of the different products’ safety performance levels. 21 In Europe, child 
restraints  are  tested  and  rated  in  both  frontal  and  side-impact  crashes,  and  in 
Japan  child  restraints  are  tested  and  rated  in  frontal-impact  tests. 22 Although  it 
would  be  ideal  for  these  programs  to  test  and  rate  child  restraint  performances  in 
a  greater  variety  of  crash  scenarios,  these  programs  are  still  admirably  providing 
people  with  an  important  and  necessary  service.  If  Europe  and  Japan  can  provide 
their  citizens  with  this  valuable  safety  information,  the  United  States  can  do  so  as 
well. 
3. Power Windows and Strangulation 

Child  safety  is  not  a  static  issue:  as  motor  vehicle  technology  develops  and 
evolves,  potential  safety  hazards  themselves  evolve.  Power  windows  are  a  case  in 
point: as this technology has added convenience, it has also added risk. Power win-
dows  pose  a  serious  threat  to  children  who,  time  and  again,  are  killed  or  injured 
when they are trapped in a power window as it rises. 

Congress moved forward to force NHTSA to address one factor of this risk. In the 
Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible  and  Efficient  Transportation  Equity  Act:  A  Legacy  for 
Users (SAFETEA–LU), Congress required all power window switches in motor vehi-
cles to have safer pull-up designs rather than the dangerous rocker or toggle switch 
designs. The risk from rocker and toggle switches was that children would uninten-
tionally  engage  the  window  by  pushing  on  the  switch  and  then  kill  or  injure  them-
selves from the rising window. 

These  new  switches,  however,  will  not  completely  eliminate  the  risk  of  a  child 
being  injured  or  killed  by  a  power  window.  Even  with  safer  designs  for  window 
switches,  children  are  still  at  risk  if  someone  begins  to  close  a  power  window  with-
out realizing that the child’s head or other body part is in the way of the rising win-
dow. A child has been killed by a power window every month for the last 3 months: 
one  in  Canada  this  month,  one  in  New  Mexico  last  month,  and  one  in  Detroit  in 
December.  The  Detroit  incident  is  particularly  noteworthy  because  the  vehicle  in-
volved  was  a  Pontiac  Vibe,  which  has  the  safer  power  window  switches.  (In  fact, 
protecting  children  from  being  trapped  in  power  windows  could  also  protect  adults 
in  some  cases—such  as,  for  example,  the  Illinois  paramedic  who  was  injured  when 
his arm was trapped in the window of a vehicle attempting to drive around an am-
bulance.) 23 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

One  solution  to  prevent  these  tragic  injuries  and  deaths  is  to  require  automatic 
reversal technology in power windows when the window meets an obstruction. Auto-
matic reversal technology would ensure that power windows would reverse direction 
whenever they detect a trapped object. This simple, lifesaving technology is already 
widely  available  throughout  Europe,  and  it  is  even  included  as  a  feature  in  many 
of  the  same  vehicle  models  that  do  not  include  this  feature  in  the  United  States. 
Currently  pending  in  the  Senate  and  the  House  of  Representatives,  the  Cameron 
Gulbransen  Kids  and  Cars  Safety  Act  of  2007  would  address  this  need  with  a  re-
quirement  for  a  performance  standard  that  could  be  met  by  auto-reverse  tech-
nologies. 
4. Brake-Transmission Shift Interlock 

Another danger children face in motor vehicles is the risk of shifting a parked ve-
hicle into gear and causing it to roll away and crash. Since 1998, over 100 children 
have  died  in  vehicle  roll-away  incidents,  though  this  statistic  is  likely  an 
undercount. 24 

A  proven  way  to  prevent  roll-away  incidents  is  with  Brake-Transmission  Shift 
Interlock (BTSI), a basic safety feature for automatic transmission vehicles that re-
quires the brake pedal to be depressed before the driver can shift out of park. Since 
most  children  cannot  reach  the  brake  pedal,  BTSI  prevents  them  from  putting  the 
vehicle into gear, thus preventing the vehicle from rolling and crashing. NHTSA has 
recommended  since  1980  that  manufacturers  include  BTSI  in  all  vehicles,  yet  to 
date  only  about  80  percent  of  new  vehicles  include  this  necessary  safety  feature. 25 
Additionally,  many  of  the  vehicles  that  do  include  BTSI  do  not  include  BTSI 
versions that work in all ignition key positions. 

Since  the  1980s,  auto  manufacturers  have  opposed  mandatory  BTSI  standards 
and  have  attempted  to  avoid  them  by  proffering  voluntary  standards.  Voluntary 
standards  rarely  work  and  are  often  just  a  tactical  delay  employed  by  manufactur-
ers to avoid regulations. Automakers’ repeated failure to include BTSI in all vehicles 
is another example that voluntary standards are unreliable, subject to manufacturer 
caprice,  set  without  a  public  process,  and  not  subject  to  compliance  requirements. 
The  Cameron  Gulbransen  Kids  and  Cars  Safety  Act  of  2007  would  require  that 
BTSI be included in the vehicle safety standards for all light vehicles and in all igni-
tion key positions. 
B. Protecting Children Outside the Vehicle 

Children  also  face  serious  vehicle-related  hazards  outside  the  vehicle.  We  are  fa-
miliar,  of  course,  with  back-over  deaths,  which  occur  when  a  parent  is  backing  out 
a driveway and cannot see a child who has appeared in the path of the car. Children 
are  also,  like  all  of  us,  exposed  to  potential  danger  as  pedestrians.  Further  action 
is needed to protect children from these risks. 
1. Improving the Driver’s Ability To See Children in the Path of the Vehicle 

Drivers  must  be  able  to  view  the  environment  in  which  they  are  operating  their 
vehicles. It is a simple premise, one that takes on a tragic dimension when children 
are hurt or killed simply because the driver could not see them. 

Among  the  dangers  vehicles  pose  to  child  pedestrians  are  back-over  incidents. 
Backovers occur when a motor vehicle backs up and hits or rolls over a child. These 
terrible tragedies occur because drivers can’t see the children behind their vehicles. 
Many light trucks and SUVs have blind zones behind the vehicles that can be star-
tlingly  large:  in  fact,  the  latest  Consumers  Union  analysis  shows  that  the  worst  of-
fender  is  the  2006  Jeep  Commander  Limited,  which  has  a  blind  zone  of  44  feet  for 
a  driver  who  is  5  feet  8  inches  tall,  or  69  feet  for  a  driver  5  feet  one  inch  tall. 26 
Dozens of children could fit in such a large blind zone and be hidden from the driv-
er’s view. 

Because  of  NHTSA’s  historical  failure  to  assess  these  risks,  we  have  relied  on 
other  sources  to  reveal  the  magnitude  of  the  problem.  KIDS  AND  CARS  has  found 
evidence  pointing  to  100  children  killed  in  back-overs  each  year,  and  the  Centers 
for  Disease  Control  and  Prevention  report  7,500  children  treated  in  hospital  emer-
gency  rooms  between  2001  and  2003  for  back-overs. 27 NHTSA  has  subsequently 
confirmed the gravity of this risk in a November 2006 report (which was mandated 
by  SAFETEA–LU)  on  technology  designed  to  prevent  back-over  incidents  from  oc-
curring.  NHTSA  concluded  that,  every  year,  thousands  of  children  are  injured  and 
at least 183 people die in back-overs. The study also found that camera-based detec-
tion systems were much more effective than sensor-based systems at helping drivers 
detect child pedestrians behind their vehicles. 28 

Children  are  also  at  risk  precisely  where  everyone  assumes  they  must  be  most 
visible:  in  front  of  vehicles.  Especially  with  the  rise  in  popularity  of  large  SUVs, 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

drivers cannot see the area immediately in front of them, which puts small children 
in intersections and driveways at increased risk. 

Children  are  like  the  canary  in  the  coal  mine,  their  heightened  risk  alerting  us 
to  a  problem  that  affects  all  of  us:  the  need  for  standards  to  secure  drivers’  ability 
to  see  the  environment  in  which  vehicles  are  operated.  When  I  was  the  adminis-
trator  of  NHTSA,  I  supervised  the  completion  of  a  decade-long  effort  to  develop  a 
conspicuity  standard.  I  issued  this  standard  in  1980,  but  it  was  revoked  before  it 
could take effect. NHTSA has not relaunched the rulemaking in the 20 years since. 
The Cameron Gulbransen Kids and Cars Safety Act of 2007 would require a per-
formance  standard  for  rearward  visibility  to  help  end  the  tragedy  of  back-overs.  In 
addition  to  a  rearward  visibility  standard,  however,  Congress  should  require 
NHTSA  to  issue  a  general  conspicuity  standard.  Clearly,  the  importance  of  driver 
visibility  has  been  recognized  for  sometime,  and  the  issuance  of  a  new  standard  is 
long overdue. 
2. Improving Protection for Child Pedestrians 

In  2005,  339  child  pedestrians  were  killed,  and  an  estimated  16,000  child  pedes-
trians  were  injured. 29 In  addition  to  visibility  standards,  NHTSA  also  needs  to  ad-
dress the design of motor vehicles, which through proper engineering can minimize 
the injuries inflicted on pedestrians hit by a moving motor vehicle. 

In Japan and Europe, motor vehicles are routinely tested and rated for their per-
formance  in  crashes  with  pedestrians.  Vehicles  receive  stars  based  on  their  ability 
to  inflict  the  least  amount  of  possible  injury  on  a  pedestrian.  These  ratings,  which 
are  a  part  of  Europe  and  Japan’s  New  Car  Assessment  Programs  (NCAP),  help  to 
encourage auto manufacturers to invest in design and technology innovations for pe-
destrian safety. Additionally, the European Union has also issued a pedestrian safe-
ty directive, in which European, Japanese, and Korean (but not, notably, U.S.) auto 
manufacturers  have  agreed  to  voluntarily  improve  pedestrian  protections  in  their 
vehicles. 

Although  a  voluntary  agreement  is  inadequate  to  address  the  importance  of  pe-
destrian safety (and European safety groups, accordingly, are advocating mandatory 
pedestrian safety standards), the European Union is still taking greater steps to ad-
dress the importance of pedestrian safety than the United States. Pedestrian protec-
tion is not rocket science: numerous technologies already exist which auto manufac-
turers could incorporate into new vehicles, such as sensor systems that detect pedes-
trians  and  automatically  reduce  vehicle  speeds  and  vehicle  hoods  that  give  way, 
thereby reducing impact forces, when they collide with pedestrians. I challenge Con-
gress  to  follow  the  lead  of  the  rest  of  the  world  by  taking  a  far  more  aggressive 
stand  against  the  dangers  vehicles  pose  to  pedestrians.  Congress  should  instruct 
NHTSA to issue safety standards to protect all pedestrians, including children. 
C. Protecting Children on School Buses 

We have NHTSA safety standards to thank for the nationwide implementation of 
safety features that school buses have enjoyed for so long it is difficult to remember 
a  time  without  them.  Among  the  important  safety  features  are  the  stop  sign  arm 
that  extends  out  when  the  bus  is  loading  or  unloading  children  and  improvements 
to  fuel  tanks.  The  statistics  bear  out  these  benefits:  according  to  NHTSA,  between 
the years of 1990 to 2000, an estimated 26,000 school buses crashed each year, with 
only 10 children dying and 9,500 children being injured each year. 30 

The  leading  safety  feature  on  school  buses  for  several  decades  has  been 
compartmentalization:  the  design  of  the  seats  as  compartments  that  contain  chil-
dren in a crash. Historically, compartmentalization has served as an effective safety 
measure in frontal school bus crashes; however, in other crash modes, children have 
been  left  unprotected  and  unrestrained.  For  compartmentalization,  seats  are  posi-
tioned  close  together  so  that  in  frontal  crashes  children  impact  into  deformable 
seatbacks  that  absorb  the  impact  force.  In  other  crash  modes,  such  as  side-impacts 
and  rollovers,  compartmentalization  is  ineffective  and  children  can  be  thrown 
around  the  bus  and  hit  their  heads  on  unpadded  structures.  In  crashes  of  this  na-
ture, specially designed restraints can be effectively used to protect children, but no 
Federal standard exists to require restraints in school buses. 

Currently,  states  have  been  left  to  themselves  to  develop  laws  for  school  buses, 
with  no  guidance  from  the  Federal  Government.  The  only  Federal  standards  regu-
lating school bus crashworthiness require occupant protection only in frontal crash-
es,  and  even  for  frontal  crashes  the  standards  do  not  require  dynamic  testing  with 
child dummies. 

In the absence of Federal guidance, the states are embarking upon their own pol-
icy plans, with the result that we are on the brink of seeing a confusing mish-mash 
of different laws in all of the states, rather than one uniform law that provides com-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

prehensive  safety  for  all  child  passengers.  At  this  point  there  are  five  states  with 
school  bus  seat  belt  laws,  including  Florida,  where  most  safety  advocates  fear  that 
the  law  will  cause  more  harm  than  good.  Restraints  cannot  simply  be  retrofitted 
into existing bus designs. 

State  policymakers  have  requested  guidance  from  NHTSA  on  developing  these 
laws,  but  NHTSA  has  declined  to  offer  any  assistance,  claiming  that  3  years  (min-
imum) of research and development are necessary before any recommendations can 
be  made.  The  Federal  Government’s  failure  to  address  this  issue  is  unacceptable. 
The  only  way  to  ensure  that  children  are  safe  in  school  buses  is  to  pass  com-
prehensive  Federal  standards  that  will  protect  children  in  all  crash  modes  and  re-
quire  appropriately  designed  restraint  systems  in  all  school  buses.  With  states  left 
to themselves to develop these regulations on a state by state basis, the country will 
be left with an inconsistent hodgepodge of school bus restraint systems, which would 
hinder and confuse school bus safety developments. 
III. Congress Must Improve NHTSA’s Capacity To Protect Children 

I want to conclude by reiterating the very important role NHTSA has played and 
should  be  playing  in  improving  safety  for  children,  and  for  us  all,  in  and  around 
motor vehicles. I have advocated for motor vehicle safety improvements for 40 years, 
from  the  very  birth  of  NHTSA  to  today.  We  cannot  ever  forget  how  far  we  have 
come from the time that people were routinely impaled by steering columns and air 
bags were an achievable but nonetheless neglected safety technology. After 40 years 
of being caught in a tug of war between industry interests and its statutory mission, 
NHTSA  still  has  much  to  do  to  protect  the  public,  especially  children.  Unfortu-
nately,  this  important  agency  has  been  pulled  away  from  its  mission  and  stuck  in 
a morass of analyses, reviews, and indifference for far too long. 

If Congress expects that this hearing, or the Cameron Gulbransen Kids and Cars 
Safety  Act  of  2007,  will  result  in  a  renewed  dedication  to  child  safety,  then  it  will 
have to take additional steps to improve NHTSA’s capacity to meet these compelling 
needs. Throughout my testimony, I have already identified many specific steps that 
are  needed  to  address  particular  issues  for  children.  What  I  want  to  address  now 
is  the  bigger  picture:  what  Congress  can  do  to  ensure  that  any  of  the  specific  rem-
edies discussed so far will actually result in improved protections for children. 

Most  important,  of  course,  is  that  NHTSA  needs  funds  for  testing  and  analysis 
of child dummies and the development of performance tests for needed safety stand-
ards. Moreover, as we have found repeatedly over the years, NHTSA also needs spe-
cific  mandates  and  clear  deadlines  in  order  to  make  issuance  of  new  or  improved 
standards  a  real  priority.  I  would  like  to  conclude  by  discussing  a  factor  that  Con-
gress will need to address but which often goes unmentioned: the need to shield the 
agency  from  the  political  interventions  of  the  Office  of  Information  and  Regulatory 
Affairs (OIRA) in the White House Office of Management and Budget. 

Although Congress delegates authority to act directly to the Department of Trans-
portation,  which  acts  through  NHTSA  to  meets  its  safety  obligations,  the  White 
House has for over 20 years asserted the right to interfere with that delegation and 
impose  its  political  priorities  in  the  rulemaking  process.  Through  Exec.  Order  No. 
12,866, the successor to Exec. Order No. 12,291, the White House arrogates to itself 
the  power  to  weaken  or  eliminate  proposed  motor  vehicle  safety  standards,  power 
it executes by requiring the agency to submit its draft regulations to OIRA. 

OIRA  has  long  stood  in  the  way  of  improved  motor  vehicle  safety.  For  example, 
OIRA ordered NHTSA to weaken its proposed rule for tire pressure monitoring sys-
tems—the  telltales  that  alert  drivers  whenever  their  tires  are  dangerously  under-
inflated.  Although  Congress  required  NHTSA  to  mandate  a  TPMS  that  alerts  driv-
ers  whenever  a  tire  is  under-inflated,  OIRA  intervened  to  force  the  agency  to 
produce  a  weak  rule  that  would  fail  to  alert  drivers  whenever  all  four  tires  were 
underinflated  or  if  two  tires  diagonal  from  each  other  were  under-inflated.  OIRA’s 
interference  has  resulted  in  unnecessary  harm  to  the  Nation’s  motoring  public  and 
litigation  that  is  still  being  waged  to  force  the  agency  to  do  what  Congress  told  it 
to do. 

I  fear  that,  even  if  the  Cameron  Gulbransen  Kids  and  Cars  Safety  Act  of  2007 
were  passed,  and  even  if  Congress  were  to  require  NHTSA  to  address  the  other 
issues  I  have  identified,  children  will  still  be  in  unnecessary  danger  because  of  the 
political  machinations  of  OIRA.  The  White  House  signaled  its  hostility  to  any  fur-
ther  improvements  in  safety  standards  by  nominating  Susan  Dudley,  an  anti-regu-
latory  extremist  from  the  industry-funded  Mercatus  Center,  to  head  OIRA.  Dudley 
has  been  no  friend  to  motor  vehicle  safety;  in  fact,  she  opposed  advanced  air  bag 
standards, based incredibly on the argument that if consumers truly valued air bag 
protections  they  would  have  already  compelled  recalcitrant  auto  makers  to  install 
them. 31 Dudley’s  history  of  regulatory  comments  and  other  public  pronouncements 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

has led me and others in the public interest community to conclude that she would, 
as  OIRA  administrator,  demand  the  impossible  of  agencies,  standing  in  their  way 
until they prove a case for regulating that Dudley will ensure cannot be proven. 

Although  the  Senate  wisely  declined  to  allow  Dudley’s  nomination  to  leave  com-
mittee  in  the  109th  Congress,  the  White  House  decided  to  renominate  her  in  the 
110th—and  to  put  her  in  office  through  the  backdoor,  while  her  nomination  is  offi-
cially  pending,  as  an  appointed  ‘‘senior  advisor.’’  The  Bush  Administration  then 
moved  to  give  her  even  more  power  by  releasing,  on  January  18,  Exec.  Order  No. 
13,422  and  the  Final  Bulletin  on  Good  Guidance  Practices.  These  proclamations, 
combined,  give  OIRA  the  power  to  review  not  just  regulations  but  also  ‘‘guidance,’’ 
an  amorphous  category  of  agency  information  that  apparently  includes  any  ‘‘pro-
nouncement about the conditions under which [an agency] believes a particular sub-
stance  or  product  is  unsafe.’’ 32 The  new  order  and  bulletin  give  Dudley  a  powerful 
new  ax  she  can  use  to  chop  this  Congress  off  at  the  knees. 33 Whatever  this  Con-
gress  decides  to  do  for  the  important  issues  of  the  day—global  warming,  fuel  econ-
omy, and, yes, child safety—Dudley will be able to undo. 
Conclusion 

Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  I  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  today  to  testify 
on  these  critical  needs  of  children  for  improved  motor  vehicle  safety.  I  am  eager  to 
address your questions. 
ENDNOTES 

1 National  Highway  and  Traffic  Safety  Administration,  2005  Traffic  Safety  Facts: 
Children  available  at  http://www-nrd.nhtsa.dot.gov/pdf/nrd-30/NCSA/TSF2005/ 
2005TSF/810l623/810623.htm. 

2 Id. 
3 Id. 
4 See KIDS AND CARS, National Data Base of Non-Traffic Incidents, available at 

http://www.kidsandcars.org/ . 

5 Public Citizen’s comments on the latest rulemaking to keep the data secret out-
line  the  legislative,  rulemaking,  and  litigation  history  of  this  disastrous  plan.  See 
http://www.citizen.org/documents/EarlyWarningCBIComments.pdf. 

6 Consider  other  deficiencies  regarding  back  seats:  we  lack  reminder  telltales 
alerting  drivers  when  backseat  passengers  are  unbelted,  and  we  have  no  reminder 
systems to alert parents that a child has been left in the backseat of a parked vehi-
cle, where the child could overheat and die. 

7 Meanwhile, although it is beyond the scope of child safety issues, it is also worth 
noting  that  the  2004  proposal  came  out  before  Congress  required,  in  2005’s 
SAFETEA–LU,  that  NHTSA  upgrade  the  side-impact  standard  for  occupants  in  all 
seating positions. The proposed rule clearly does not meet that test. 

8 Children’s  Hospital  of  Philadelphia,  Researchers  Release  New  Findings  on  Pro-

tecting Children in Side Impact Crashes, Press Release, Sept. 13, 2005. 

9 From  1993  to  1998,  31.8  percent  of  children  who  died  in  motor  vehicle  crashes 
died  in  rollovers.  See  F.P.  Rivera,  P.  Cummings  &  C.  Mock,  Injuries  and  Death  to 
Children in Rollover Motor Vehicle Crashes in the United States, 9 Injury Prevention 
76 (2003). 

10 Internal  GM  documents  obtained  by  CBS  News  reveal  that  General  Motors 
(GM)  knew  of  the  dangers  of  weak  seats  in  1966.  See  CBS,  ‘‘Collapsing  Car  Seats,’’ 
Nov.  19,  2002.  Also,  in  a  recent  court  case,  a  former  Chrysler  manager  responsible 
for  minivan  safety  issues  testified  that  his  investigation  team  determined  that 
Chrysler  seat  backs  needed  to  be  redesigned.  Chrysler,  however,  did  not  redesign 
the  seats  and  disbanded  the  investigation  team.  Experts  at  the  trial  also  testified 
that  minivan  seats  collapsed  in  nearly  every  rear-impact  crash  test  that  Chrysler 
conducted.  In  the  case,  the  jury  ultimately  awarded  $105.5  million  to  the  parents 
of an infant who died when the seat back collapsed and a family friend was thrown 
backward  into  the  child.  See  R.  Robin  McDonald,  $105  Mil.  Verdict  Returned  Over 
Minivan Seats, THE LEGAL INTELLIGENCER, Dec. 2, 2004. 

11 NHTSA has long acknowledged the need to improve Federal seating system re-
quirements.  Over  30  years  ago,  NHTSA  proposed  a  rulemaking  that  would  address 
seating system safety and consolidate FMVSS No. 202 ‘‘head restraints’’ and No. 207 
‘‘seating systems.’’ Most recently, in a 2000 Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM), 
NHTSA  stated  that  in  crash  tests  the  agency  conducted  ‘‘the  values  of  head  and 
neck  injury  criteria . . . were  much  higher  than  acceptable  thresholds.  Direct  con-
tact  of  the  head  of  the  dummy  with  the  interior  of  the  vehicle  compartment,  which 
occurred  when  the  front  seat  rotated  backward  excessively  due  to  the  high  impact, 
contributed  to  these  high  values.’’  65  Fed.  Reg.  67,702.  Additionally,  fuel  integrity 
crash  tests  revealed  significant  seat  back  failures  that  caused  the  front  seat  occu-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

pants to become projectiles into the rear seat. However, to this day, the agency has 
not  updated  Federal  safety  standards  to  adequately  protect  occupants  from  seat 
back failure. 

12 NHTSA spokesman Rae Tyson stated that ‘‘the seatback rulemaking was termi-
nated  for  the  simple  reason  that  we  believe  it  may  be  wiser  to  approach  the  seat 
as  part  of  an  integrated  unit  rather  than  treat  it  as  a  separate  part.’’  Jeff  Plungis, 
$106  Million  Judgment  Against  Chrysler  and  New  Safety  Studies  Intensify  the  De-
bate  Over  Federal  Standards,  DETROIT NEWS,  Dec.  19.  2004.  This  is  what  NHTSA 
proposed  to  do  in  1974.  It  appears  that  the  agency  has  dragged  its  feet  hardly  an 
inch in three decades. 

13 See Children’s Hospital of Philadelphia, supra note 8. 
14 See Rivera et al., supra note 9. 
15 For more information about children in this vulnerable category, see Public Cit-
izen, The Forgotten Child: The Failure of Motor Vehicle Manufacturers to Protect 4- 
to 8-Year-Olds in Crashes (April 2002). 

16 National Highway and Traffic Safety Administration, 2005 Traffic Safety Facts: 
<http://www-nrd.nhtsa.dot.gov/pdf/nrd-30/NCSA/ 

Children 
TSF2005/2005TSF/810l623/810623.htm>. 

17 Lawrence  E.  Decina,  Kathy  H.  Lococo,  and  Charlene  T.  Doyle,  Child  Restraint 
Use  Survey:  LATCH  Use  and  Misuse,  National  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administra-
tion, December 2006. 

18 National Highway Traffic Safety Administration, LATCH Child Safety Seat Sys-

available 

at 

tem Confusing Says NHTSA Study, News Release, December 12, 2006. 

19 Nation’s  Top  Highway  Safety  Official  Calls  on  Manufacturers,  Retailers  and 
Consumer  Groups  to  Make  Child  Safety  Seats  Easier  to  Install,  NHSTA  news  re-
lease. 

20 Vehicle  Safety  Opportunities  Exist  to  Enhance  NHTSA’s  New  Car  Assessment 

Program, Government Accountability Office, April 2005. 

NCAP: 

21 Japan 

http://www.nasva.go.jp/mamoru/english/2006/child/ 
howto.html;  European  NCAP:  http://www.euroncap.com/content/safetylratings/ 
ratings.php?id1=6. 

22 Id. 
23 See EMS Network, Woman Assaults Paramedic With Car—Illinois, Dec. 5, 2006, 

available at <http://www.emsnetwork.org/artman/publish/articlel24279.shtml>. 

24 Automakers  Agree  to  Add  Break-to-Shift  Interlocks  The  Safety  Record  Sep-

tember/October 2006, Volume 3 issue 5. 

25 Id. 
26 See Attachment 1. 
27 See id. 
28 NHTSA’s  report  is  not,  despite  this  positive  conclusion,  the  last  word  on  back- 
over  issues.  See  Attachment  3  for  safety  groups’  response  to  NHTSA’s  inexplicable 
conclusions  that  back-over  avoidance  technologies,  such  as  cameras,  are  somehow 
other than cost-effective. 

29 NHTSA Traffic Safety Fact Sheet 2005 Child Safety. 
30 School  Bus  Restraint  Study  National  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administration, 

2000 PowerPoint presentation. 

31 See  Public  Citizen  &  OMB  Watch,  The  Cost  Is  Too  High:  How  Susan  Dudley 
Threatens Public Protections (Sept. 2006), available at <http://www.citizen.org/doc-
uments/dudleyreport.pdf>. 

32 OMB,  Final  Bulletin  on  Good  Guidance  Practices,  available  at  <http:// 

www.whitehouse.gov/omb/memoranda/fy2007/m07-07.pdf>, at 10. 

33 More information is included in Attachment 2. 

ATTACHMENT 1—CONSUMERS UNION RELEASE ON BLIND ZONES 

Consumer Reports Releases New Vehicle Blind Zone Data, Listing 2006 Jeep 

Commander Limited as Worst Overall 
CR cautions: the area behind your vehicle can be a danger zone for youngsters. 
YONKERS,  NY—Consumer  Reports’  latest  examination  of  vehicle  blind  zones— 
the area behind a car or truck that’s hidden from the driver’s view—shows that the 
2006 Jeep Commander Limited ranks as the worst vehicle overall. 

Consumer Reports measured the blind zone behind the Commander at 44 feet for 
a driver who is five feet, eight inches tall and a stunning 69 feet for a shorter driver 
(five feet, one inch tall) with all three rows of seats raised. The Commander’s blind 
zone is considerably larger than that for other mid-sized and large sport-utility vehi-
cles (SUVs). 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

Until  now,  the  vehicle  with  the  worst  blind  zone  in  Consumer  Reports’  tests  was 
the  2002  Chevrolet  Avalanche  1500,  a  pickup  truck,  which  had  a  blind  zone  of  29 
feet for a five-foot, eight-inch driver and 51 feet for a five-foot, one-inch driver. But 
the redesigned, 2007 Chevrolet Avalanche LT has no blind zone when equipped with 
the  optional  rearview  camera.  Without  the  camera,  the  vehicle  had  a  31-foot  blind 
zone for a five-foot, eight-inch driver and 50 feet for a short driver. The Commander 
also offers an optional rearview camera, which CR’s test vehicle lacked. This camera 
can significantly reduce or eliminate the blind zone. 

To help consumers understand how large some blind zones are, Consumer Reports 
has  been  measuring  the  blind  zones  on  vehicles  that  it  tests  and  rates  since  2003. 
CR’s  database  now  covers  about  200  vehicles  from  model  years  2002  through  2007. 
To measure the blind zones, a 28-inch traffic cone was positioned behind the vehicle 
at the point where the driver could just see the top. This cone simulates the height 
of a small child. 

‘‘Consumer  Reports  findings  illustrate  that  the  danger  of  vehicle  blind  zones  cor-
relates with the use of large SUVs, minivans and pickups trucks as common family 
vehicles.  Consumers  must  be  cognizant  of  this  danger—and  the  value  of  rearview 
cameras—when going out to purchase a new vehicle,’’ said Don Mays, Senior Direc-
tor for Product Safety and Consumer Science at Consumer Reports. 

KIDS  AND  CARS,  the  safety  group,  estimates  that  more  than  100  children  were 
killed by vehicles whose drivers simply could not see them in the blind zone behind 
the vehicle. According to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention in Atlanta, 
nearly 7,500 children were treated in United States emergency rooms between 2001 
and 2003 for back-over injuries. Many of these incidents could have been prevented 
if  drivers  had  a  way  to  see  or  detect  what  is  behind  them  while  backing  up.  Every 
vehicle has blind zones. Side and rearview mirrors are insufficient to combat them. 
Consumer Reports tests show that, in general, the longer and higher the vehicle, the 
bigger the blind zone is likely to be. 

There  are  no  Federal  Government  requirements  for  back-up  warning  sensors  or 

rearview cameras on any passenger vehicle sold in the United States. 

‘‘Unfortunately,  the  few  vehicles  that  now  come  with  this  technology  are  higher- 
end models, and most devices are available as an extra-cost option—often requiring 
the  purchase  of  other  equipment  like  an  expensive  navigation  system,’’  said  Sally 
Greenberg,  Senior  Product  Safety  Counsel  for  Consumers  Union  in  Washington, 
D.C. ‘‘We believe that back-up technologies, such as rearview cameras are essential, 
and  should  be  a  requirement  by  Federal  law.  Their  cost  is  small  compared  to  the 
cost of a child’s life. And once this technology becomes standard equipment in vehi-
cles, systems will become more economical for manufacturers to produce.’’ 

‘‘Without  these  devices,  parents  and  families  will  continue  to  suffer  the  terrible 
tragedy of accidentally backing over a child,’’ Greenberg said. ‘‘That is why it is crit-
ical  that  Congress  pass  the  Cameron  Gulbransen  Kids  and  Cars  Safety  Act  of 
2005—to  require  a  rearward  visibility  standard  that  will  provide  drivers  with  a 
means of detecting a child behind the vehicle.’’ 

Consumers  who  wish  to  improve  the  safety  of  their  current  vehicle  can  add  an 
aftermarket  rearview  camera.  Consumer  Reports  tests  have  shown  that  most  work 
well.  Such  cameras  typically  cost  several  hundred  dollars  and  are  best  installed  by 
a professional. 

To  learn  more  about  the  vehicle  blind  zones,  and  see  measurements  for  models 

tested by Consumer Reports, visit www.ConsumerReports.org. 

Consumer  Reports  is  one  of  the  most  trusted  sources  for  information  and  advice 
on  consumer  products  and  services.  It  conducts  the  most  comprehensive  auto-test 
program  of  any  U.S.  publication  or  website;  the  magazine’s  auto  experts  have  dec-
ades  of  experience  in  driving,  testing,  and  reporting  on  cars.  To  subscribe  to  Con-
sumer  Reports,  call  1–800–234–1645.  Information  and  articles  from  the  magazine 
can be accessed online at www.ConsumerReports.org. 

CONSUMER REPORTS Tested Best & Worst Rear Blind Zones 

Vehicle Class 

Driver 
Height 

Best 

Worst 

Average 

Small Sedans 

Mid-sized Sedans 

5′ 8″  2006 Subaru Impreza 2.5i 
5′ 1″  2006 Subaru Impreza 2.5i 

(6′) 
(11′) 

5′ 8″  2006 Hyundai Sonata GLS 

(9′ ) 

2003 Suzuki Aerio GS 

2003 Suzuki Aerio GS 

(23′) 
(49′) 

2005 Cadillac STS ( 21′) 

12′ 
24′ 

13′ 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

CONSUMER REPORTS Tested Best & Worst Rear Blind Zones—Continued 

Vehicle Class 

Driver 
Height 

Best 

Worst 

Average 

5′ 1″  2004 Acura TSX (12′) 

2006 Mercury Milan (35′) 

2004 Ford Taurus SES 

(21′) 

2005 Mitsubishi Galant 

GTS (21′) 

5′ 8″  2003 Lexus LS430 (9′) 
5′ 1″  2003 Lexus LS430 (16′) 

2004 Audi A8L (20′) 
2006 Cadillac DTS (30′) 

5′ 8″  2004 Chevrolet Aveo LS 

2005 Chevrolet Malibu LS 

5′ 1″  2004 Chevrolet Aveo LS 

2005 Chevrolet Malibu LS 

Maxx (17′) 

Maxx (23′) 

(5′) 

(10′) 

Large Sedans 

Wagons & 

Hatchbacks 

Small SUVs—Four 

Door 

5′ 8″  2006 Subaru Forester 2.5X 

(9′) 

5′ 1″  2006 Subaru Forester 2.5X 

(12′) 

(18′) 

(18′) 

(35′) 

2003 Honda Element EX 

2006 Toyota RAV4 Base 

2003 Honda Element EX 

5′ 8″  2004 Volkswagen Touareg 

2006 Jeep Commander 

5′ 1″  2005 Nissan Pathfinder 

2006 Jeep Commander 

(11′) 

LE (18′) 

5′ 8″  2002 Toyota Sequoia Ltd. 

2004 Dodge Durango Ltd. 

5′ 1″  2004 Dodge Durango Ltd. 

2007 Chevrolet Tahoe (38′) 

Ltd. (44′) 

Ltd. (69′) 

(19′) 

2004 Nissan Armada LE 

Midsized SUVs 

Large SUVs 

Minivans 

Pickups 

Coupes 

22′ 

12′ 
22′ 

10′ 

16′ 

13′ 

21′ 

18′ 

29′ 

17′ 

27′ 

15′ 

26′ 

23′ 

35′ 

15′ 

23′ 

(14′) 

(24′) 

(24′) 

(16′) 

(16′) 

(24′) 

(10′) 

5′ 8″  2005 Dodge Grand Cara-

2005 Saturn Relay FWD 

van SXT (12′) 

5′ 1″  2004 Ford Freestar SEL 

2005 Toyota Sienna XLE 

5′ 8″  2005 Nissan Frontier LE 

2004 Ford F–150 XLT 

5′ 1″  2005 Dodge Dakota SLT 

2007 Chevrolet Avalanche 

5′ 8″  2003 Hyundai Tiburon GT 

2005 Chevrolet Cobalt SS 

5′ 1″  2004 Mazda RX–8 (19′) 

2005 Chevrolet Cobalt SS 

2006 Honda Civic Si (19′) 

(19′) 

(28′) 

(34′) 

(50′) 

(23′) 

(32′) 

In  this  chart  Consumer  Reports  identifies  the  length,  in  feet,  of  the  blind  zone  for  each  listed  vehicle.  The 
distance  noted  is  how  far  behind  the  vehicle  a  28-inch  traffic  cone  had  to  be  before  the  person,  sitting  in  the 
driver’s  seat,  could  see  the  cone’s  top  by  looking  through  the  rear  window.  Distances  are  provided  for  vehicles 
that  are  currently  sold  with  no  major  changes  from  the  vehicle  CR  tested.  This  chart  does  not  include  tests 
performed on vehicles using rear view camera systems, either standard or optional. 

ATTACHMENT 2—INFORMATION ON NEW EXECUTIVE ORDER AND GUIDANCE BUL-
LETIN—LATEST WHITE HOUSE POWER GRAB PUTS PUBLIC AT RISK—PROBLEMS OF 
THE JAN. 2007 EXECUTIVE ORDER AND BULLETIN ON GUIDANCE (JANUARY 2007) 
The White House released a double whammy attack on the public interest on Jan. 
18,  2007:  (1)  a  new  executive  order  increasing  burdens  on  the  regulatory  process, 
and (2) a final bulletin creating new burdens on agencies ability to inform the pub-
lic.  Together,  this  double  whammy  is  an  enormous  challenge  to  the  ability  of  the 
Federal Government to protect and inform the public. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

Market Failure .

.

. and New Excuses for Failing the Public 

The  White  House  already  demanded,  under  Exec.  Order  No.  12,866  (1993),  that 
agencies  state  the  reason  for  a  new  regulation  in  an  economic  impact  assessment. 
The  new  Bush  executive  order  now  changes  the  language,  putting  the  spotlight  on 
‘‘market failure’’ as the chief rationale—and adding that the purpose of the justifica-
tion is ‘‘to enable assessment of whether any new regulation is warranted.’’ 

Exec. Order No. 12,866 

Revised Text 

Each agency shall identify 
the  problem  that  it  intends  to  address  (includ-
ing,  where  applicable,  the  failures  of  private 
markets  or  public  institutions  that  warrant 
new agency action) 

as  well  as  assess  the  significance  of  that  prob-

lem. 

Each agency shall identify in writing 
the 

specific  market 

failure 

as 
externalities, market power, lack of informa-
tion)  or  other  specific  problem  that  it  in-
tends  to  address  (including,  where  applica-
ble,  the  failures  of  public  institutions)  that 
warrant new agency action, 

(such 

as well as assess the significance of that prob-

lem, 

to enable assessment of whether any new reg-

ulation is warranted. 

Market  failure  is  an  economics  term  describing  situations  in  which  private  mar-
kets, left to themselves, fail to bring about results that the public needs. This order, 
however,  will  be  enforced  by  Susan  Dudley,  the  radical  extremist  that  the  White 
House is setting up for a recess appointment to become the administrator of the Of-
fice of Information and Regulatory Affairs (OIRA) in the White House Office of Man-
agement and Budget. Based on an evaluation of Dudley’s record in a report released 
last year, Public Citizen has concluded that, in her hands, the market failure provi-
sion will become a barrier to the protections that the public needs. 
Deputy Dudleys in Every Agency 

Although  Congress  delegates  power  directly  to  the  agencies  themselves,  thereby 
diffusing  authority  throughout  the  Executive  Branch  and  preventing  any  single  of-
fice  from  becoming  all-powerful,  the  White  House  has  claimed  yet  more  power  to 
control agencies and distort regulatory policy with political goals. The new executive 
order commands every agency to designate a Presidential appointee to serve as the 
‘‘Regulatory  Policy  Officer.’’  Agencies  will  not  be  allowed  to  add  new  regulatory  ini-
tiatives to their annual plans without the approval of the new officer. 
Putting Industry Costs Above the Public Interest 

The  new  order  requires  agencies  to  develop  annual  plans  for  upcoming 
rulemakings  that  identify  ‘‘the  combined  aggregate  costs  and  benefits  of  all  regula-
tions  planned  for  that  calendar  year  to  assist  with  the  identification  of  priorities.’’ 
This  new  requirement  will  make  cost/benefit  analysis  the  central  factor  in  setting 
priorities  for  needed  protections  of  the  public  interest.  These  cost/benefit  analyses 
are  notoriously  biased  against  regulation,  especially  long-term  goals  such  as  pre-
venting  global  warming  or  cancers  that  manifest  years  after  exposure  to  toxic  sub-
stances. 
From Guidance to Darkness 

The  executive  order  and  the  new  bulletin  on  guidance  work  together  to  create  a 
new bureaucratic bottleneck that would slow down agencies’ ability to give the pub-
lic information it needs. 

Guidance 

agency policy other than a rulemaking which sets forth: 
• a policy on a statutory issue 
• a policy on a regulatory issue 
• a policy on a technical issue 
• an interpretation of a statutory issue 
• an interpretation of a regulatory issue 

Significant Guidance 

guidance which: 
• leads  to  an  annual  effect  of  $100  million  or  more  or  materially  and  ad-
• creates inconsistencies with another agency’s activities 

versely affects the economy 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

• materially alters budgetary impact of grants, entitlements, etc. 
• raises novel legal or policy issues 
• implicates the President’s priorities 

The bulletin requires significant guidance to be approved by a senior-level agency 
official,  and  the  executive  order  adds  another  layer  of  review  by  the  White  House 
itself.  By  requiring  White  House  approval  of  important  guidance,  the  White  House 
will  insert  its  political  agenda  and  pro-business  bias  into  every  level  of  agency  pol-
icy,  so  that  our  Federal  Government  will  handcuff  itself  instead  of  the  companies 
that violate the law and put the public in danger. 

The  bulletin  also  requires  the  agencies  to  create  a  webpage  listing  all  significant 
guidance  and  creating  a  public  challenge  process,  for  industry  to  demand  changes 
to the policy statements, interpretations, and so on that it opposes. 
So Much for the New Congress 

The upshot of this whole executive order is that the White House is already work-
ing to undermine not just agencies but also the new Congress’ ability to protect the 
public.  Whatever  gains  might  come  to  consumers  and  other  public  interest  sectors 
in the 110th Congress are already vulnerable to being rendered meaningless by the 
powers the White House is giving itself. 

ATTACHMENT 3—SAFETY GROUPS’  RESPONSE TO NHTSA  BACKOVER REPORT—RE-
VIEW AND RESPONSE OF SAFETY GROUPS TO NHTSA’S  VEHICLE BACKOVER AVOID-
ANCE TECHNOLOGY STUDY,  REPORT TO CONGRESS—AGENCY’S CONCLUSIONS CON-
TRADICT STUDY FACTS 
The  National  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administration  (NHTSA)  Study,  Vehicle 
Backover  Avoidance  Technology  Study,  Report  to  Congress  (Nov.  2006),  reaches  a 
number  of  negative  conclusions  about  the  state  of  back-over  detection  technology, 
even  though  the  Study  itself  contains  many  positive  factual  findings—findings  that 
support  both  the  need  to  adopt  this  technology  and  the  readiness  of  the  technology 
for use in motor vehicles. This review and response evaluates the major conclusions 
reached by NHTSA and shows why those conclusions are not backed up by the facts 
in the Study. 
Scope of the Safety Problem 

The  Study  admits  that  estimates  of  almost  200  people  killed  and  thousands  in-
jured  each  year  in  back-over  crashes  is  too  low,  NHTSA  does  not  yet  collect  data  on 
this issue. 

The  Study  uses  available  sources  of  data  to  estimate  that  each  year  at  least  183 
people  are  killed  and  between  6,700  and  7,400  are  injured,  at  least  1,000  seriously 
enough  to  need  hospitalization,  in  back-over  crashes.  The  Study  estimate  is  based 
on  samples  taken  in  a  single  year  and  on  older  data  (1998)  that  does  not  capture 
the  full  effect  of  the  sales  of  larger  vehicles  over  the  past  decade.  The  Study  ac-
knowledges that in light of current data limitations the reported deaths and injuries 
are  only  a  rough  estimate.  Yet,  NHTSA  dismisses  the  data  collected  by  KIDS  AND 
CARS which has documented news reports of back-over incidents indicating that the 
annual death toll of children continues to rise. 

Due  to  limitations  of  available  data  on  back-over  crashes,  NHTSA  asserts  that  it 
‘‘is unable to conclude . . . that there is an increasing trend in back-over crashes.’’ 
This  does  not  mean,  however,  that  back-over  crashes  are  not  on  the  rise.  NHTSA 
does  not  have  annual  data  on  back-over  and  other  non-traffic  deaths  and  injuries, 
and  only  began  to  consider  how  to  collect  such  data  in  response  to  a  mandate  from 
Congress  in  SAFETEA–LU  (2005).  The  Study  admits  that  ‘‘there  are  no  accurate 
trend  data  specifically  for  the  non-traffic  incidents’’  in  Federal  databases,  and  also 
acknowledges that ‘‘the extent and nature of back-over crashes are difficult to deter-
mine  because  many  crashes  are  not  reported  in  currently  available  crash  data-
bases.’’  Without  comparative  data,  collected  over  a  number  of  years,  no  conclusive 
determination can be made about whether there is an increasing trend in back-over 
crashes. 

The  Study  confirms  that  young  children  are  at  greatest  risk.  Yet,  NHTSA  has  not 
developed  plans  to  use  technology  currently  available  in  many  high-end  vehicle 
makes and models to protect these children. 

The  Study  confirms  the  KIDS  AND  CARS  data  showing  that  children  under  5 
years old, especially toddlers up to age 2, are the highest risk group. Despite infor-
mation  dating  back  to  1971  that  children  are  at  risk  in  back-over  crashes,  NHTSA 
relies on general education messages that are not part of an overall strategy to pre-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

vent back-over crashes. Moreover, NHTSA has not included this issue as part of its 
crash avoidance program or its advanced vehicle safety technology (AVST) initiative. 
The Study also confirms that many, if not most, back-over crashes involve parents 
or  neighbors,  people  who  are  highly  motivated  to  avoid  injuring  their  children.  Yet, 
NHTSA  mistakenly  concludes  that  technology  is  not  currently  an  appropriate  rem-
edy. 

The  Study  points  out  that  people  in  their  20s  and  30s  have  a  greater  exposure 
as  drivers  in  back-over  crashes  because  they  are  parents  of  young  children  and  are 
involved  in  more  backing  situations  when  young  children  are  present.  The  Study 
also  cites  data  from  Utah  indicating  that  48  percent  of  back-over  incidents  involve 
a  family  member  and  another  24  percent  involve  a  neighbor.  These  drivers  can  be 
expected  to  be  highly  motivated  to  avoid  such  incidents,  probably  have  greater 
awareness  of  nearby  children  and  many  may  already  heed  some  or  all  of  the  exist-
ing  educational  messages  intended  for  their  benefit.  Such  drivers  are  also  highly 
motivated to use back-over prevention technology properly. 
Feasibility of Backover Prevention Technology 

The  Study  finds  existing  back-over  prevention  technology  can  detect  children  and 
other  objects  in  the  rear  blind  zone.  Yet,  as  child  deaths  continue  to  mount  NHTSA 
dithers and concludes much more research is needed. 

The Study found that camera systems provide drivers with a clear image of most 
of the rear blind zone behind their vehicle and that these systems ‘‘have the poten-
tial of providing a good field of view of the objects including pedestrians behind the 
vehicles.’’  Also  ‘‘[t]he  rearview  camera  systems  examined  had  the  ability  to  display 
pedestrians  or  obstacles  behind  the  vehicle  clearly  in  daylight  and  indoor  lighted 
conditions.’’  The  Study  found  these  facts  even  though  it  reviewed  only  a  limited 
number  of  so-called  ‘‘parking  aids’’  and  did  not  evaluate  technology  specifically  de-
signed for use as a back-over prevention system. 

Even  though  the  Study  finds  that  rearview  camera  systems  allow  drivers  to  see 
pedestrians  in  ‘‘the  majority  of  the  rear  blind  zone  areas[,]’’  NHTSA  concludes  that 
more research is necessary because current sensor and video/camera systems do not 
always  provide  a  view  of  obstacles  in  the  entire  rear  blind  zone.  However,  drivers 
without any back-over avoidance technology have absolutely no warning that pedes-
trians are in the rear blind zone. Backover prevention technology would at least pro-
vide drivers with an opportunity to avoid backing collisions. 

NHTSA is actively engaged in developing and promoting other, similar radar- and 
sensor-based crash avoidance technologies, such as advanced cruise control which is 
already  in  the  market,  lane  departure  warning  systems  which  are  now  being  field 
tested and used in some commercial vehicles, as well as intersection collision warn-
ing systems. Despite this active effort to use the same type of technology to provide 
driver  warnings  in  other  crash  modes,  NHTSA  is  highly  negative  about  the  use  of 
back-over  prevention  systems  despite  the  fact  that  a  version  of  that  technology  is 
already  standard  equipment  in  many  vehicle  lines  and  is  already  being  used  by 
drivers for that purpose. 
Detection Technology Testing 

The  Study  finds  that  existing  rear  visibility  technology  provides  drivers  with  a 
view  of  rear  blind  zones  that  prevents  back-over  crashes  even  when  children  move 
into the vehicle path. Yet, NHTSA surprisingly concludes that these technologies are 
not effective. 

The  Study  cites  research  to  show  that  some  rear  object  detection  systems  were 
successful  in  detecting  and  preventing  impact  with  rear  objects  most  of  the  time. 
Sixty  five  percent  of  drivers  avoided  unexpected  obstacles  that  appeared  suddenly 
during  backing  when  relying  on  a  combination  of  existing  technologies.  Another 
study showed ‘‘Rear video cameras [are] effective in 23 percent of rear backing ma-
neuvers  when  [an]  ‘‘unexpected’’  obstacle  is  placed  2–3  feet  behind  the  vehicle.’’ 
Thus,  nearly  one-fourth  and  possibly  as  many  as  two-thirds  of  incidents,  including 
those in which a child runs immediately behind the vehicle while it is backing, may 
be  prevented  by  existing  back-over  prevention  technology.  This  would  represent  a 
vast safety improvement and could save as many as 46 (23 percent) or 123 (65 per-
cent)  lives  annually  based  on  NHTSA’s  rough  estimate  of  183  deaths  each  year  (an 
estimate that may understate the problem). 

The  Study  documents  that  in  2006  there  were  already  36  vehicle  makes  and  100 
model  lines  offering  some  form  of  back-over  ‘‘parking  aid’’  technology  as  standard 
equipment.  The  use  and  installation  of  such  technology  is  clearly  feasible  as  back- 
over  detection  technology.  Many  drivers  are  already  using  ‘‘parking  aids’’  for  this 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

purpose. The widespread proliferation and use of these systems to improve rearview 
visibility  appears  to  have  a  high  level  of  driver  acceptance.  The  Study  cites  survey 
results  of  drivers  who  own  ‘‘parking  aid’’  equipped  vehicles.  The  majority  of  drivers 
found the systems to be helpful in parking, at least 85 percent felt the systems are 
effective  or  very  effective  in  giving  warnings,  and  80  percent  thought  that  the  sys-
tem  would  lower  their  risk  of  being  in  a  backing  crash.  Overall,  it  appears  these 
drivers know how to properly use the technology. 

The  Study  also  mentions  that  the  effectiveness  of  back-over  prevention  systems, 
especially  cameras,  could  be  diminished  as  a  result  of  practical  problems  caused  by 
weather  conditions  such  as  snow,  rain,  fog  and  glare  from  the  sun.  However,  this 
is largely a red herring. Based on a review of cases in NHTSA’s databases the Study 
finds  that  ‘‘[t]he  weather  did  not  appear  to  be  a  major  factor  in  these  back-overs, 
as the weather was classified as ‘normal’ in the majority of crashes. . . .’’ 

The Study also combines two research and testing issues. The first is whether the 
technology  itself  can  perform  the  function  required,  that  is,  provide  the  driver  with 
visual  notice  of  obstacles  in  the  rear  blind  zone.  Statements  in  the  Study  support 
a conclusion that current camera-based or combination video-sensor systems do pro-
vide  drivers  with  a  view  of  obstacles  in  the  rear  blind  zone.  As  the  Study  admits, 
the  existing  technology  is  capable  of  detecting  objects  in  the  blind  zone  behind  the 
vehicle and warning the driver. 

The  second  issue  is  whether  the  technology  will  be  properly  used  by  drivers,  i.e., 
the human factors issue common to all technological applications. While both issues 
are  related  to  the  overall  effectiveness  of  the  system,  the  human  factors  issue  goes 
beyond  the  evaluation  of  whether  the  technology  itself  can  perform  the  task  re-
quired. Human factors evaluation is highly dependent on the complexity of the sys-
tem,  clear  user  instructions,  the  amount  of  time  permitted  to  become  familiar  with 
the  system,  and  repeated  use.  In  this  respect,  use  of  a  back-over  avoidance  system 
is  analogous  to  use  of  the  required  vehicle  rearview  mirror  system,  including  the 
need  to  properly  arrange  and  pay  frequent  attention  to  the  inside  as  well  as  both 
the  driver  and  passenger  outside  rearview  mirrors.  The  same  type  of  attention  and 
appropriate response is required for back-over prevention technology. 
Rearward Visibility Standard: 

The Study documents the need for a rearview visibility performance standard. Yet, 

NHTSA defers and delays while children are at risk. 

Large  rear  blind  zones  exist  that  threaten  everyone—children,  seniors,  the  dis-
abled,  and  all  pedestrians—despite  a  Federal  safety  standard  for  rearview  mirrors, 
intended  to  reduce  the  number  of  deaths  and  injuries  that  occur  when  the  driver 
does  not  have  a  clear  view  to  the  rear  of  the  vehicle.  The  Study  acknowledges  that 
‘‘[a]lmost all vehicles have rear blind zones that could obscure the driver’s visibility 
of  small  children.’’  This  confirms  research  conducted  by  Consumers  Union  showing 
the size of the average blind zone behind different types of vehicles. The Study also 
documents  that  current  back-over  technologies  are,  to  varying  degrees,  effective  in 
providing drivers with a view of the rear blind zone. Still, NHTSA presents no plans 
to  conduct  rulemaking  on  a  rearward  visibility  performance  standard  to  limit  the 
size  of  the  vehicle  blind  zone  and  enhance  the  ability  of  drivers  to  see  behind  their 
vehicle. Furthermore, there is no stated timeline for agency action to develop speci-
fications for the performance of the technology to prevent back-over crashes and no 
intention to make the specifications mandatory. 
Backover Crash Education: 

The  Study  finds  that  current  back-over  awareness  and  educational  efforts  are  not 
scientifically  sound  countermeasures  that  have  proven  effective.  NHTSA  concludes 
that such educational efforts have value but available technology does not. 

The Study finds that current back-over prevention programs ‘‘have been designed 
based  on  specific  back-over  incidents  rather  than  on  a  data-driven,  research-based 
back-over  strategy.’’  Despite  the  disconnect  in  logic,  NHTSA  promotes  these  types 
of  education  and  awareness  efforts  even  though  the  agency  states  that  none  of  the 
programs  have  an  evaluation  component  to  establish  their  effectiveness  as  a  coun-
termeasure.  NHTSA  concludes  that  such  efforts  may  make  drivers  sensitive  to  the 
problem  and  provide  common  sense  safety  tips.  At  the  same  time,  NHTSA  dis-
approves of requiring the use of available technology that has shown positive results 
in  tests  and  already  is  in  wide  use,  as  part  of  a  comprehensive  approach  to  back- 
over prevention. 

The  educational  programs  reviewed  in  the  Study,  as  well  as  in  NHTSA’s  ‘‘Safety 
Tips for Parents’’ found on their website in Preventing Backovers in America’s Drive-
ways,  call  for  checking  the  area  around  the  vehicle  before  backing  the  vehicle.  The 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

Study,  however,  relies  on  research  testing  of  rearview  back-over  prevention  tech-
nology that uses ‘‘surprise’’ or ‘‘unexpected’’ obstacles that are introduced after back-
ing has begun or near the end of a backing maneuver. Merely education and aware-
ness  programs  that  rely  on  checking  around  the  vehicle  before  backing  begins  can-
not  address  such  dynamic  situations.  Backover  prevention  technology  systems  that 
detect  people  and  objects  in  the  vehicle  blind  zone  are  needed  to  allow  drivers  to 
continuously check behind their vehicle during backing. 

The  educational  messages  also  caution  parents  to  ‘‘know  where  your  children  are 
and have them stay in your full view and well away from your vehicle’’ and to listen 
for  children  who  may  have  dashed  behind  your  vehicle  suddenly’’  while  you  are 
backing up (‘‘Safety Tips for Parents’’). 

First,  parents  are  highly  motivated  to  protect  their  children  and  may  be  already 
aware  of  these  educational  safety  tips.  Second,  some  of  these  safety  tips  may  actu-
ally divert the driver’s attention from the driving task during backing by constantly 
trying to keep children in full view with conventional mirrors or turning your head. 
Third, reliance on your sense of hearing (auditory cues) to detect children who have 
moved into the vehicle path during backing is not only unreliable but can be masked 
by  other  interfering  sounds.  This  safety  tip  ignores  the  fact  that  children  often  as-
sume that they can be seen and may make no sound to attract attention. Although 
these  safety  tips  may  be  good  advice  for  drivers  with  no  other  means  of  detecting 
children and objects in the vehicle blind zone when backing, they are an inadequate 
substitute when far more direct and effective detection and warning technology sys-
tems are available. 

Education and awareness are not an adequate substitute for lifesaving technology 
to  prevent  back-over  deaths  and  injuries.  Legislation  is  necessary  to  direct  NHTSA 
to advance a comprehensive strategy that couples reasonable information with back- 
over detection technology to assist drivers. 
Cost-Effectiveness Analysis: 

The Study states that, at present, meaningful estimates of safety benefits and cost- 
effectiveness cannot be calculated. In contradiction NHTSA offers up an unsupported 
conclusion  that  back-over  systems  will  have  low  effectiveness  and  do  not  appear  to 
be particularly cost-effective. 

The Study clearly asserts that data on which to base accurate benefit/cost assess-
ments  of  back-over  detection  technology  is  not  available.  Therefore,  no  conclusions 
can be drawn. Nevertheless, the Study attempts to analyze the cost-effectiveness of 
existing  ‘‘parking  aids’’  as  a  surrogate  for  back-over  prevention  systems.  The  anal-
ysis,  however,  is  based  on  a  series  of  assumptions  that  are  not  supported  by  data 
or  evidence,  including  assumptions  about  incremental  system  cost,  the  cost  of  sys-
tem repairs due to damage, crash speed distribution and human reaction using the 
system. No data was collected or presented to support any of these assumptions. 

The  Study  also  failed  to  include  any  estimate  of  savings  from  reduced  damages 
and costs avoided as a result of rear-end collisions prevented by the ‘‘parking aids.’’ 
The  failure  to  include  any  such  savings  was  based  on  the  unsupported  reasoning 
that  ‘‘parking  aids  only  mitigate  the  cost  of  the  smaller  number  of  minor  backing 
crashes  which  tend  to  have  smaller  total  costs.’’  However,  no  data  was  collected 
from drivers using ‘‘parking aids’’ to determine the accuracy of this conclusion. 

Finally,  this  analysis  also  assumes  that  there  are  no  safety  benefits,  that  is,  po-
tential  deaths  and  injuries  that  would  be  prevented,  because  the  agency  believes 
that  ‘‘parking  aids’’  are  not  intended  to  function  as  back-over  prevention  systems 
and,  therefore,  would  not  provide  such  benefits.  In  actuality,  reports  indicate  that 
drivers  with  ‘‘parking  aid’’  systems  are  in  fact  using  the  systems  for  back-over  pre-
vention purposes as well as to avoid damages from low-speed backing crashes. Thus, 
NHTSA uses its analysis of ‘‘parking aids’’ to eliminate the inclusion of safety bene-
fits  and  to  conclude  that  none  of  the  currently  installed  rear  object  detection  sys-
tems are cost-effective. 

As  a  result,  the  Study  casts  a  pall  over  the  cost-effectiveness  of  back-over  detec-
tion  systems  even  though  it  readily  admits  that  without  studying  a  true  back-over 
crash  detection  technology  system  ‘‘meaningful  estimates  of  death  and  injury  bene-
fits and cost effectiveness cannot be calculated.’’ 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
David McCurdy? 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

STATEMENT  OF  HON.  DAVE  MCCURDY,  PRESIDENT/CEO,  ALLI-
ANCE  OF  AUTOMOBILE  MANUFACTURERS;  ACCOMPANIED 
BY 
ROBERT  STRASSBURGER,  VICE  PRESIDENT,  SAFETY  AND 
HARMONIZATION 
Mr.  MCCURDY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Mr.  Chairman,  Sen-
ator  Sununu,  and  other  Senators—Senator  Carper—thanks  for  the 
comments, earlier. 

I am President and CEO of the Alliance of Automobile Manufac-
turers.  The  Alliance  represents  the  BMW  group,  DaimlerChrysler, 
Ford Motor Company, General Motors, Mitsubishi, Porsche, Toyota, 
and  Volkswagen,  close  to  85  percent  of  the  manufacturers.  Now,  I 
will  tell  you,  unlike  some  of  my  colleagues  here,  I’ve  only  been  in 
this job 3 weeks. So—— 

[Laughter.] 
Mr.  MCCURDY.  But  I  come  to—so,  this  is  somewhat  of  a  bap-
tism—but I come to the industry from the tech community, having 
been  the  CEO  of  the  Electronic  Industries  Alliance  and  then  pre-
viously served with my colleagues. But I first want to commend, ac-
tually,  the  advocates  and  the  parents  who  are  pushing  this.  And 
we  all,  I  think,  have  heartfelt  sympathy  and  concern,  and  can’t 
imagine  the  horrific  images  and  memories  that  they  have  to  deal 
with  on  a  daily  basis.  My  wife,  by  the  way,  is  a  child  psychiatrist, 
and I would tell you, children are a top priority for us, as well. 

Mr.  Chairman,  in  your  office  you  have  a  little  plaque  that  says, 
‘‘Arkansas comes first.’’ Well, Mr. Chairman, for automakers, ‘‘Safe-
ty  comes  first.’’  And  it’s  seen  as  a  public  health  challenge.  Our  in-
dustry  invests  more  in  research  and  development  than  any  other 
industry,  including  pharmaceuticals  and  computers.  And  I  encour-
age  the  Chairman  and  the  Ranking  Member,  plus  staff—and,  as  a 
matter of fact, I extended an invitation to Representative Campbell 
this  morning,  to  visit  one  of  the  test  and  safety  facilities.  I  did  it 
yesterday,  flew  to  Detroit  to  a  4,000-acre  facility  with  5,000  em-
ployees  there  dedicated  to  testing  and  safety.  I  saw  crash  tests. 
They  didn’t  set  them  up  for  me.  They  have  two  a  day.  There’s  a 
regular ongoing process. Got to test drive for—to see electronic sta-
bility  control,  antilock  brake  systems.  I  saw  demo  on  backup  tech-
nology.  I  looked  at  this  almost—incredible  army  of  test  dummies 
that  they  now  have,  each  of  them  costing  well  over  100-and-some- 
odd-thousand dollars per piece, saw the deployment of side airbags, 
some  of  these  new  technologies.  And  so,  I  would  encourage  you  to 
actually visit. We could arrange that. 

Despite  some  of  the  common  perception  and—I  think  the  recent 
record proves that safety developments often happen faster through 
market-based initiatives rather than just legislative mandates. Our 
companies’  intense  competitiveness  has  already  accelerated  safety 
feature  introductions  to  speeds  faster  than  would  be  developed 
through  regulation.  And  I  want  to  point  to  one  thing  that  Senator 
Sununu,  as  an  engineer,  knows:  data,  data,  data.  And  I  think  it’s 
really  critical.  And  actually,  the  parts  of  the  bill,  the  Gulbransen 
bill,  we  support  wholeheartedly,  and  that  is  collection  of  much  of 
this  information  and  data,  because  I  don’t  think  you  can  get 
enough. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

Recent  technologies,  like  side  airbags  and  stability  control,  have 
been  introduced  ahead  of  Federal  legislation  or  a  legislative  man-
date. As I stated, safety is our highest priority. Ours is a high-tech 
industry,  using  cutting-edge  safety  technology  to  put  people  first. 
In  2005,  automakers  invested  $40  billion  in  research  and  develop-
ment,  roughly  $2,400  for  every  car  and  light  truck  sold  in  the 
United  States  that  year.  The  challenge  is  that  the  development 
costs  may  total  up  to  a  billion  dollars  for  a  new  product—I’m  not 
talking about some of these—but it may take 3 to 5 years to bring 
a  product  to  market.  Automakers  lead  legislative  and  regulatory 
initiatives with the invention, development, and implementation of 
advanced technologies focused upon safety improvements, including 
dual-stage  frontal  airbags.  History  of  airbags—let  me  tell  you,  I 
saw  the  introduction,  and  see  the  difference  between  a  dual-stage; 
de-powering  of  airbags,  which  were  serious  reasons  for  injuries  in 
the  past;  side-impact  airbags;  safety-belt  pre-tensioners—didn’t 
know exactly what that was—saw it in action yesterday in a crash 
test;  load-limiting  retractors;  side-curtain  airbags;  advanced  light-
ing;  adaptive  speed  control;  lane-departure  warnings;  brake-assist 
systems;  and  much  more.  And  those  were  not—and  most  of  these 
are  voluntary,  implemented  by  the  manufacturers.  These  items 
were  not  mandated.  Antilock  brakes,  stability  control,  side  airbags 
for head and chest protection, side curtains, pre-crash occupant po-
sitioning,  which  is  a  very  important  thing—pre-crash  occupant  po-
sitioning, especially with children—lane-departure warnings, radar 
use for collision avoidance. Seatbelts and restraint systems, by the 
way,  as  you  see  the  statistics,  43,434  people  killed  in  the  United 
States,  fatalities  in  automobiles,  a  huge  portion  of  those,  because 
the occupant was unrestrained, didn’t use seatbelts. 

We’ve  supported  the  10-year  Air  Bag  and  Seatbelt  Safety  Cam-
paign.  We’ve  seen  progress  in  the  States.  We  believe  there  should 
be  more.  The  Alliance  is  also  actively  participating  in  blue-ribbon 
panels, and working in conjunction with NHTSA. The LATCH pro-
vision  that  Mr.  Medford  mentioned,  helped  standardize  the  way 
children  restraints  attach  to  vehicles,  is  an  important  step  from 
that.  I  actually  saw  demonstrations  on  that,  as  a  matter  of  fact, 
yesterday. 

Last  summer,  alliance  members  joined  others  in  developing  and 
implementing  brake-transmission  shift  interlock  systems,  in  re-
sponse to some of the concerns of this Committee, that work in all 
key positions. There is real progress there, and we will continue to 
make progress. 

In  the  end,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  just  say  that  market-driven 
innovation,  combined  with  comprehensive  and  current  data,  are 
necessary to make insightful and sound public-policy decisions. And 
with  regard  to  the  bill,  the  thing,  I  think,  that’s  important—and 
the  Senator  mentioned  it  in  his  opening  statement—that  they’re 
not  trying  to  prejudge  the  rulemaking  by  picking  the  technology. 
That  was  a  very  important  statement,  and  one  that  opens  up,  I 
think  an,  opportunity  for  manufacturers  to  work  with  this  Com-
mittee  and  the  authors  of  this  bill  to—and  NHTSA—to  make  sure 
that we achieve an objective that I think we share. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  could  go  into  detail,  but,  perhaps  in  questions, 
with  regard  to  S.  1948  that  was  introduced  yesterday,  I  think  the 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

Committee  would  be  interested  to  know  the  manufacturers’  posi-
tion with regard to that bill, and I’ll be glad to go into it in detail, 
but my time has run out, so I will stop at that point. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. McCurdy follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DAVE MCCURDY, PRESIDENT/CEO, THE ALLIANCE OF 
AUTOMOBILE MANUFACTURERS;  ACCOMPANIED BY ROBERT STRASSBURGER,  VICE 
PRESIDENT, SAFETY AND HARMONIZATION 
Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman.  My  name  is  Dave  McCurdy  and  I  am  President  and 
CEO  of  the  Alliance  of  Automobile  Manufacturers.  Within  Alliance  membership, 
safety  is  our  highest  priority.  Ours  is  a  high-tech  industry  that  uses  cutting-edge 
safety  technology  to  put  people  first.  In  fact,  automakers  invest  more  in  research 
and  development  than  any  other  industry,  including  pharmaceuticals  and  com-
puters, according to the National Science Foundation. In 2005 alone, automakers in-
vested $40 billion, roughly $2,400 for every car and light truck sold in the U.S. that 
year.  The  Alliance  of  Automobile  Manufacturers  (Alliance)  is  a  trade  association  of 
nine  car  and  light  truck  manufacturers  including  BMW  Group,  DaimlerChrysler, 
Ford  Motor  Company,  General  Motors,  Mazda,  Mitsubishi  Motors,  Porsche,  Toyota 
and Volkswagen. 
Industry, Consumers and Motor Vehicle Safety 

Automakers lead legislative and regulatory initiatives with the invention, develop-
ment  and  implementation  of  advanced  technologies  focused  upon  safety  improve-
ments.  Consider  for  example  the  installation  of:  dual  stage  frontal  air  bags,  side- 
impact  air  bags,  safety  belt  pretensioners,  load  limiting  retractors,  side  curtain  air 
bags (for side-impact and some with roll over capacity), advanced lighting, adaptive 
speed control, lane departure warnings, brake assist systems, adjustable torso belts 
for  small  passengers,  child  security  door  locks,  automatic  door  locks,  electronic  sta-
bility  control  systems,  battery  isolation  in  severe  collisions,  automatic  post  collision 
notification  to  emergency  responders,  engineered  structures  for  car  to  truck  colli-
sions  and  other  crash  modes.  All  of  these  technologies  are  voluntarily  installed  by 
manufacturers on their own initiative. 

The  automobile  industry  engineers,  manufacturers,  and  markets  the  most  com-
plex consumer product that is offered for sale in the global economy. It is a product 
of  great  utility,  essential  to  the  day-to-day  flow  of  people,  goods  and  services  in  de-
veloped and developing economies and a key contributor to economic growth. Motor 
vehicle manufacturers’ institutional successes are contingent upon the desire of indi-
vidual consumers to purchase the products our manufacturers offer for sale. In mak-
ing  their  independent  purchase  decisions,  consumers  balance  many  considerations, 
style,  color,  fuel  economy,  performance,  reputation,  safety,  technology  content,  inte-
rior noise levels, accommodation for passengers, cargo, pets and all those things we 
transport frequently or rarely. 

The  industry  is  brutally  competitive  with  little  margin  for  error.  A  new  product 
program  may  consume  as  much  as  $1B  in  development,  take  3  to  5  years  to  bring 
a  product  to  market  and  in  a  strong  economy,  may  sometimes  actually  have  a 
chance to earn a positive return on investment. Globally and here in the U.S., man-
ufacturing  capacity  significantly  exceeds  market  demand.  This  condition  makes  for 
great  consumer  choice,  value  and  competative/lower  product  prices.  We  have  seen 
the  effects  of  global  and  local  excess  capacity  in  our  market  here  in  the  U.S.  re-
flected by real lower prices for vehicles that are increasing equipped with more per-
formance  and  technology  content.  Much  of  that  additional  performance  and  tech-
nology  content  is  safety  related.  Consumers  expect  more  safety  performance  and 
technology  content  and  manufacturers  respond  to  those  customer  needs  and  de-
mands. 

Before  addressing  specific  performance  conditions  and  technology  installations,  it 
is  important  to  understand  the  industry’s  approach  to  motor  vehicle  safety.  There 
are  several  principles  to  which  the  industry  adheres  and  it’s  important  to  explain 
these precepts. 

First,  we  consider  motor  vehicle  safety  to  be  a  public  health  challenge.  Collisions 
result in a human toll and in direct economic loss. This is why we work to improve 
safety.  In  every  respect,  it  is  in  the  interest  of  the  industry  and  society  to  reduce 
these losses. 

Second, as with any public health challenge, it is essential to base policy and im-
provement  initiatives  on  good  scientific  understandings  of  the  priorities,  cause  and 
pathology of specific concerns. It is also important to use good science in identifying 
and  prioritizing  specific  opportunities  for  improvement.  To  do  so,  good  solid  data 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

about the human victim and injury morphology, the environment in which collision 
events  occur  (roadways),  and  the  vehicle  are  necessary.  Therefore,  we  support  the 
collection  and  analysis  of  collision  data  and  the  prioritization  of  collision  problems 
by measures of harm (numbers of fatalities, serious injuries, total economic cost, lost 
days of productivity, etc.). Ideally, with a good understanding of collision related in-
jury patterns, problem areas can be identified, prioritized and addressed in sequen-
tial order to ensure the maximum safety return and to facilitate continued improve-
ment. 

Third, there are many public institutions with an interest in improving motor ve-
hicle  safety;  think  of  this  effort  as  injury  control.  Auto  makers  have  an  interest  in 
injury  control  as  do  many  public  institutions  and  classes  of  individuals:  drivers, 
other  roadway  users,  law  enforcement  agencies,  municipal  and  state  governments 
responsible  for  roadway  safety,  medical  practitioners,  first  responders,  legislative 
bodies,  government  regulators,  and  various  nongovernmental  organizations.  All  of 
these  institutions  and  groups  are  partners  in  injury  control  and  our  common  inter-
ests are to improve motor vehicle safety. 

Fourth,  safety  resources  should  be  expended  so  as  to  maximize  the  safety  return 

and injury reduction consequent to the expenditures. 
Alliance  Members  Are  Aggressively  Pursuing  Safety  Advancements, 

Collectively and Individually 

Advancing motor vehicle safety remains a significant public health challenge—one 
that  automakers  are  addressing  daily,  both  individually  and  collectively.  Alliance 
members make huge investments in safer vehicle design and technology. Most of the 
new,  significant  safety  features  currently  available  on  motor  vehicles—antilock 
brakes,  stability  control,  side  airbags  for  head  and  chest  protection,  side  curtains, 
pre-crash  occupant  positioning,  lane  departure  warnings,  radar  use  for  collision 
avoidance—in the U.S. were implemented voluntarily by manufacturers, not as a re-
sult of any regulatory mandate. While the industry is engaged in high-tech research 
and  implementation  of  new  safety  technologies,  it  continues  to  add  safety  features 
voluntarily,  even  such  mundane  features  as  right-hand  side  mirrors  for  passenger 
cars,  obstacle  detection  devices  for  sliding  doors  and  automatic  liftgates,  automatic 
lights  on  with  wiper  use,  etc.  Those  who  claim  that  vehicle  safety  will  not  be  ad-
vanced in the absence of regulatory requirements are living in the past and are not 
paying attention to today’s marketplace. 

The Alliance also has engaged in collective activities, not only of its member com-
panies, but also with other vehicle manufacturers and interested safety partners. A 
number  of  these  initiatives  are  intended  to  enhance  child  safety  directly  or  indi-
rectly.  However,  it  is  important  to  state  here:  Auto  manufacturers,  as  well  as  all 
other safety advocates, implore parents and caregivers to NEVER leave children un-
attended either in or around automobiles and NEVER leave the key in the ignition. 
Vehicle Safety for Children—Traffic Related 

According  to  Federal  Government  statistics,  in  2005  there  were  a  total  of  43,443 
traffic  fatalities  in  the  United  States.  The  14  and  younger  age  group  accounted  for 
4 percent (1,946) of these traffic fatalities. The majority of young children riding in 
motor vehicles in the United States are restrained by some type of child safety seat 
or  seat  belt,  with  98  percent  of  infants  and  89  percent  of  children  ages  1  to  3  so 
restrained  in  2006.  Children  between  the  ages  of  4  and  7  are  also  restrained  at 
somewhat  lower  rates  than  younger  children,  with  78  percent  of  these  children  re-
strained  by  a  safety  seat  or  seat  belt  in  2006.  Most  children  now  ride  in  the  rear 
seat  of  vehicles.  In  2006,  93  percent  of  infants,  94  percent  of  children  ages  1  to  3, 
and  91  percent  of  children  ages  4  to  7  rode  in  the  rear  seat.  National  fatality  data 
show, however, that of the more than 400 tweens—children 8 to 12 years old—killed 
in  crashes  each  year,  nearly  50  percent  are  unrestrained  and  one-third  were  riding 
in the front seat. In 2004, a Partners for Child Passenger Safety (PCPS) study found 
that  35  percent  of  9  to  12  year-olds  were  riding  in  the  front  seat,  compared  to  only 
7 percent of 4 to 8 year-olds. Research shows that children are 40 percent more like-
ly  to  be  injured  in  a  front  seat  than  if  they  had  been  seated  in  back.  Finally,  child 
restraint  use  continues  to  be  lower  when  the  driver  was  unbelted  than  for  belted 
drivers.  National  fatality  data  show  when  adult  drivers  are  not  restrained  91  per-
cent  of  8  to  15  year-old  fatals  are  unrestrained.  However,  when  adult  drivers  are 
restrained, 48 percent of 8 to 15 year-old fatals are restrained. 

Research  has  shown  that  lap/shoulder  belts,  when  used,  reduce  the  risk  of  fatal 
injury to front seat occupants (age 5 and older) of passenger cars by 45 percent. For 
light-truck  occupants,  safety  belts  reduce  the  overall  risk  of  fatal  injury  by  60  per-
cent.  But  in  light  truck  rollover  crashes,  seat  belts  reduce  the  risk  of  being  killed 
by  80  percent.  Research  on  the  effectiveness  of  child  safety  seats  has  found  them 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

to reduce fatal injury by 71 percent for infants (less than 1 year old) and by 54 per-
cent for toddlers (1–4 years old) in passenger cars. For infants and toddlers in light 
trucks, the corresponding reductions are 58 percent and 59 percent, respectively. 

Alliance  members’  support  of  the  Air  Bag  and  Seat  Belt  Safety  Campaign  con-
ducted  over  the  last  decade  has  worked  to  get  children  in  back  seats  properly  re-
strained  in  a  restraint  appropriate  for  their  age  and  size.  Moreover,  the  Campaign 
has  been  very  successful  in  increasing  seat  belt  usage—20  percentage  points  in  the 
last 10 years. Further still, the Campaign has been successful in securing the adop-
tion  of  primary  enforcement  seat  belt  laws.  States  with  primary  enforcement  laws 
have  average  safety  belt  usage  rates  approximately  11  percentage  points  higher 
than states having secondary enforcement laws. NHTSA estimates that a single per-
centage  point  increase  in  safety  belt  use  nationwide  would  result  in  an  estimated 
280 lives saved per year. In 1996, 11 states had primary enforcement laws covering 
38 percent of the population. As of 2006, 25 states and the District of Columbia have 
primary enforcement laws covering 65 percent of the population. When an adult re-
straint  is  used,  it  is  far  more  likely  that  children  riding  with  that  adult  are  re-
strained as well. 

Alliance  members  were  also  active  participants  in  two  Blue  Ribbon  Panels  on 
child  passenger  safety.  The  Automotive  Coalition  for  Traffic  Safety  (ACTS),  at  the 
request of the U.S. Department of Transportation, served as the facilitator for both 
Panels. The first endeavor was the Blue Ribbon Panel on Child Restraint and Vehi-
cle  Compatibility.  This  panel  was  announced  in  February  1995  and  recommenda-
tions were released that May. One key recommendation resulted in the new LATCH 
(Lower  Anchors  and  Tethers  for  CHildren)  system  created  to  help  standardize  the 
way child restraints are attached to vehicles without using a seat belt. All child re-
straints  and  most  new  vehicles  manufactured  on  or  after  September  1,  2002  were 
required by NHTSA to include hardware components designed to simplify child seat 
installation and to reduce the incidence of misuse and incorrect installation of child 
safety seats. A study released by NHTSA in December 2006 concluded that LATCH, 
‘‘appear(s)  to  be  helping  to  reduce  insecure  installation  of  child  safety  seats.’’  The 
study  further  concluded  that  people  who  have  experience  with  LATCH  appear  to 
prefer its use over the conventional method using the vehicle seat belt. Finally, the 
study concluded that the primary reason that people do not use LATCH is that they 
don’t know about it or because LATCH was not available in some center-rear seats. 
The  Alliance  has  committed  to  work  with  NHTSA  to  resolve  these  and  other  ques-
tions about LATCH. 

The  second  panel,  the  Blue  Ribbon  Panel  on  Protecting  Our  Older  Child  Pas-
sengers  was  announced  in  November  1998.  Panel  members  focused  recommenda-
tions on getting 4 to 16 year-olds into the correct restraint systems and seating posi-
tions for their age and size. 

Please  see  http://www.actsinc.org/blueribbon.cfm  for  more  information  about 

both of these Panels. 

To  address  the  large  number  of  tweens  who  are  needlessly  at  risk  when  riding 
in  motor  vehicles  because  they  are  not  always  wearing  seat  belts  and  many  sit  in 
front  seats,  the  Alliance  turned  to  ACTS.  According  to  research  released  by  ACTS, 
parents  have  more  influence  on  tween  behavior  than  many  people  realize.  Tweens 
are well aware of safety messages, including the benefits of buckling up and dangers 
associated  with  sitting  in  front  of  a  deploying  air  bag.  However,  safety  awareness 
alone  has  limited  influence  on  how  tweens  ride  in  vehicles  because  other  factors 
may  be  more  important  to  them.  Even  though  tweens  are  becoming  more  inde-
pendent, they still need parental guidance to ensure their safety in cars. 

Surveys  showed  when  parents  take  control,  tweens  tend  to  sit  in  the  back.  Two- 
thirds  of  tweens  sit  in  a  back  seat  when  parents  make  the  decision,  compared  to 
only half of tweens who independently decide where to sit. When tweens in two pilot 
sites  were  asked  what  might  encourage  them  to  sit  in  a  back  seat,  most  said  being 
told  by  a  parent  or  the  vehicle’s  driver.  This  was  especially  true  for  those  tweens 
who were less likely to buckle up. To reach out to tweens, their parents and others 
who  influence  their  behavior—to  increase  the  number  of  tweens  who  are  properly 
restrained  in  back  seats—ACTS  established  a  new  interactive  website,  http:// 
www.tweensafety.org. 

In 2005, a total of 414, or 21 percent, of the fatalities among children age 14 and 
younger  occurred  in  crashes  involving  alcohol.  Another  48  children  age  14  and 
younger who were killed in traffic crashes in 2005 were pedestrians or pedalcyclists 
who  were  struck  by  drinking  drivers  (BAC  of  0.01  g/dL  or  higher).  The  Alliance’s 
support  of  MADD’s  Campaign  to  Eliminate  Drunk  Driving—described  below—is 
aimed  at  ending  drunk  driving  in  the  United  States  and  the  associated  fatalities 
and injuries including those involving children. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Vehicle Safety for Children—NonTraffic Related 

43 

Turning  to  the  issues  that  were  before  this  Committee  in  the  109th  Congress  as 
presented in S. 1948, ‘‘The Cameron Gulbransen Kids and Cars Safety Act of 2005,’’ 
the  Alliance  supports  the  establishment  of  a  data  collection  system  for  non-traffic, 
non-crash events involving motor vehicles. Good solid data about the human victim, 
injury  morphology,  the  environment  in  which  events  occur,  and  the  vehicle  are  a 
necessary  first  step  to  identifying  possible  interventions  that  might  be  effective. 
However,  before  determining  whether  action  by  this  Committee  on  this  point  is 
needed, please consider that Congress has already acted on this issue with the pro-
visions  of  Sections  2012  and  10305  of  Pub.  L.  109–59  (119  Stat.  1539  and  1941 
(2005)) that was enacted as part of the Safe, Accountable, Flexible, Efficient Trans-
portation Equity Act: A Legacy for Users (SAFETEA–LU). 

Similarly, the Alliance supports the establishment of a consumer information pro-
gram to provide information about hazards to children in non-traffic, non-crash inci-
dent  situations.  However,  implementation  of  such  a  provision(s)  could  and  should 
be  timelier  that  the  18  months  proposed  in  S.  1978.  The  Alliance  believes  90  days 
following  enactment  may  be  possible.  Such  a  directive  could,  for  example,  com-
plement SAFE KIDS Worldwide’s ‘‘Spot the Tot’’ program designed to prevent injury 
to  children  in  non-crash  events.  The  program  is  a  nationwide  expansion  of  the  suc-
cessful  program  of  the  same  name  created  by  SAFE  KIDS  Utah.  It  is  designed  to 
raise parents’ awareness of the risk of vehicle back-overs in driveways and parking 
lots by providing a few simple tips for adults and kids to make sure the area around 
the vehicle is safe before driving away. 

With regard to the mandated rulemakings on vehicle technology, we offer the fol-

lowing. 

The  109th  Congress  specifically  addressed  power  window  switches  in  motor  vehi-
cles.  Power  window  safety  has  been  addressed  by  Congress  previously.  Section 
10308 of SAFETEA–LU directed: 

‘‘The  Secretary  [of  Transportation]  shall  upgrade  Federal  Motor  Vehicle  Safety 
Standard  118  to  require  that  power  windows  in  motor  vehicles  not  in  excess  of 
10,000  pounds  have  switches  that  raise  the  window  only  when  the  switch  is 
pulled  up  or  out.  The  Secretary  shall  issue  a  final  rule  implementing  this  sec-
tion by April 1, 2007.’’ 

In April 2006, NHTSA implemented the changes to FMVSS No. 118 that were re-
quired  by  SAFETEA–LU.  See  71  Fed.  Reg.  18673,  April  12,  2006.  (‘‘The  agency  is 
amending . . . the  standard  to  require  that  any  actuation  device  for  closing  a 
power-operated window must operate by pulling away from the surface in the vehi-
cle on which the device is mounted [i.e., ‘‘pull-to-close’’ switches]. This provision im-
plements the mandate of section 10308 of SAFETEA–LU.’’) 

NHTSA’s  April  2006  final  rule  also  responded  to  petitions  for  reconsideration  re-
ceived in response to the agency’s September 2004 power window final rule. Wheth-
er  the  installation  of  automatic  reversal  systems  for  power  windows  and  panels 
should be mandated was evaluated by NHTSA in response to separate petitions for 
rulemaking submitted to the agency seeking such a mandate. NHTSA denied these 
petitions  to  include  an  automatic  reversal  requirement  under  FMVSS  No.  118  in 
part  because  the  petitioners  did  not  provid  any  new  data  regarding  the  incidence 
of  fatalities  and  injuries  for  inadvertent  or  intentional  actuation  of  power  window 
switches.  NHTSA  concluded  that  their  most  recent  amendments  to  the  standard 
‘‘. . . will  prevent  the  types  of  power-window  incidents  that  have  been  docu-
mented.’’  The  agency  further  rejected  some  hypothetical  scenarios  offered  by  peti-
tioners  by  stating,  ‘‘. . . there  is  not  any  documentation  that  any  such  cases  have 
actually  occurred.  Even  so,  the  risk  of  unintentional  switch  operation . . . is  al-
ready  addressed  by  the  safer  switch  requirement  of  the  final  rule . . . we  do  not 
believe that the speculative arguments in the Advocates, et al., petition about mag-
nitude of risk justify their request for the agency to require automatic reversal sys-
tems, absent data demonstrating a safety problem. It is not feasible to eliminate all 
potentially conceivable risks through regulation.’’ (emphasis added). 

Regarding  rearward  visibility,  again  Congress  has  addressed  the  issue  of  back- 
over incidents by requiring several studies on the magnitude of the problem and the 
potential  effectiveness  of  different  technologies  to  address  the  problem.  A  report  on 
one  such  study  was  released  by  NHTSA  in  November  2006.  That  study  concluded 
that  back-over  crashes  involving  all  vehicle  types,  ‘‘are  estimated  to  cause  at  least 
183  fatalities  annually . . . [and]  between  6,700  and  7,419  injuries  per  year . . .’’ 
The report also described the results of tests conducted by NHTSA involving several 
systems currently available as original equipment on vehicles and aftermarket prod-
ucts to evaluate their performance and potential effectiveness. The report concluded 
that, ‘‘the performance of sensor-based (ultrasonic and radar) parking aids in detect-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

ing  child  pedestrians  behind  the  vehicle  was  typically  poor,  sporadic  and  limited  in 
range.’’  The  testing  by  NHTSA  did  find  that  camera  based  systems,  ‘‘may  have  the 
greatest  potential  to  provide  drivers  with  reliable  assistance  in  identifying  people 
in  the  path  of  the  vehicle  when  backing.’’  However,  NHTSA  cautions,  ‘‘readers  of 
this report about relying on the results of our testing or other published test results 
to promote such systems as an effective means to address the back-over crash risk.’’ 
The agency cited numerous reasons for this caution, including the need to better un-
derstand  the  environmental  factors  (e.g.,  rain,  fog,  or  other  inclement  weather,  or 
sun  glare)  that  limit  the  effectiveness  of  cameras  and  the  limits  of  driver  perform-
ance using such systems. The report observed that: ‘‘Even if cameras allow the driv-
er to identify an object in the back of a vehicle, the driver must look at the display 
and  have  the  capability  to  identify  an  object  or  person  in  the  path  when  backing 
up, and to react and brake quickly enough to prevent the incident. The speed being 
traveled,  the  level  of  driver  attention  and  reaction  time  all  play  significant  roles  in 
estimating  the  systems’  effectiveness.’’  Therefore,  the  Alliance  believes  that  a  man-
date to require technology that may or may not be effective in addressing a problem 
whose exact nature is not objectively known would be premature. 

Finally  a  mandate  to  require  brake  transmission  shift  interlocks  (BTSI)  to  work 
in  all  ignition  key  positions  is  simply  not  needed.  A  BTSI  requires  the  operator  of 
the  vehicle  to  be  positioned  in  the  driver’s  seat  and  to  depress  the  service  brake 
pedal in order to shift the automatic transmission control out of the ‘‘Park’’ position. 
Virtually  all  automatic  transmission-equipped  cars  and  light  trucks  have  a  BTSI, 
but not all of them work in all ignition key positions. In August 2006, Alliance mem-
bers,  and  others,  completed  development  of  and  immediately  began  implementing 
an  initiative  to  further  reduce  the  incidents  of  shift  selector  movement  in  vehicles 
equipped  with  automatic  transmissions  in  circumstances  where  an  unsupervised 
and  unattended  child  has  gained  access  to  both  a  vehicle  and  its  ignition  keys  by 
requiring  that  the  vehicle’s  service  brake  be  depressed,  in  all  key  positions,  before 
the  transmission  can  be  shifted  out  of  ‘‘Park’’.  Approximately  80  percent  of  2006 
model year cars and light trucks are already equipped with an all-key-position BTSI 
and all new vehicles will have it no later than September 1, 2010. More information 
about  this  agreement  can  be  found  at  http://www.nhtsa.dot.gov  under  ‘‘Agreement 
on Brake Transmission Shift Interlock’’ or by entering docket number ‘‘25669’’ in the 
search box found at http://dms.dot.gov/search/searchFormSimple.cfm. 

Other Alliance initiatives are providing real-world safety benefits to the public, in-

cluding children. These are described below. 

In  December  2003,  auto  manufacturers  committed  to  a  plan  developed  by  an 
international  group  of  safety  experts  for  enhancing  the  crash  compatibility  of  pas-
senger cars and light trucks. The plan established new performance criteria for fur-
ther enhancing occupant protection in front and side crashes between cars and light 
trucks.  It  also  defined  research  programs  to  investigate  future  test  procedures  and 
performance  criteria.  The  Insurance  Institute  for  Highway  Safety  (IIHS)  facilitated 
the development of this plan with the sponsorship of the Alliance. 

By  September  2009,  100  percent  of  each  participating  manufacturer’s  applicable 
vehicles will be designed to these criteria. However, participating auto manufactur-
ers began implementing the front-to-front and front-to-side performance criteria im-
mediately  upon  industry’s  agreement.  Manufacturers’  recent  progress  in  imple-
menting this commitment is described below. 

Approximate Percentage of Production Designed in Accordance w/Performance Criteria 

Crash Mode 

Front-to-Front Criteria 
Front-to-Side Criteria 

Production 
Year 2005 

Production 
Year 2006 

62% 
33% 

75% 
53% 

The  frontal  component  of  the  commitment  established  criteria  to  further  reduce 
the potential for vehicle override and under-ride in serious front-to-front crashes be-
tween cars and light trucks by requiring sufficient overlap between the primary en-
ergy-absorbing structures (PEAS) of the two vehicle types. This may be achieved by 
‘‘geometric  matching’’  or  alignment  of  these  structures  or  by  providing  additional 
structure  in  light  trucks  (called  secondary  energy  absorbing  structures  (SEAS))  for 
this  purpose.  In  November  2005,  new  test  procedures  were  added  by  safety  experts 
to measure the performance of the SEAS. An updated version of the December 2003 
compatibility commitment, reflecting this change, was submitted to NHTSA on May 
10, 2006. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

In  2006,  IIHS  completed  an  analysis  of  the  safety  benefits  of  the  front-to-front 

compatibility agreement. 

45 

In  front-to-front  crashes  involving  light  trucks  into  passenger  cars,  IIHS  found 
that  the  passenger  car  driver  was  16  percent  less  likely  to  be  killed  if  struck  by  a 
sport  utility  vehicle  (SUV)  with  a  front-end  design  that  met  the  compatibility  per-
formance  criteria.  Similarly,  the  passenger  car  driver  was  20  percent  less  likely  to 
be  killed  if  struck  by  a  pickup  truck  with  a  front-end  design  that  met  the  compat-
ibility performance criteria. The overall reduction in passenger car driver deaths in 
front-to-front crashes involving both SUVs and pickup trucks was 19 percent. 

In front-to-side crashes involving light trucks into passenger cars, IIHS found that 
the  passenger  car  driver  was  30  percent  less  likely  to  be  killed  if  struck  by  a  sport 
utility  vehicle  (SUV)  with  a  front-end  design  that  met  the  front-to-front  compat-
ibility  performance  criteria.  The  passenger  car  driver  was  10  percent  less  likely  to 
be  killed  if  struck  by  a  pickup  truck  with  a  front-end  design  that  met  the  front-to- 
front compatibility performance criteria. The overall reduction in passenger car driv-
er  deaths  in  front-to-side  crashes  involving  both  SUVs  and  pickup  trucks  was  19 
percent. 

The front-to-side crash component of the commitment established performance cri-
teria  that  further  enhances  head  protection  for  people  riding  in  passenger  vehicles 
that are struck in the side. Manufacturers have voluntarily agreed to engineer their 
vehicles  using  two  test  options:  (1)  the  Federal  Government’s  (NHTSA)  optional 
side-into-pole  test  (see  FMVSS  201),  or  (2)  the  Insurance  Institute  for  Highway 
Safety (IIHS) test for consumer information, using a moving deformable barrier with 
front-end  geometry  to  simulate  an  SUV  or  pickup.  Use  of  the  NHTSA  pole  test  op-
tion will sunset in 2009, and all manufacturers will then have to use the IIHS test. 
In  2006  the  IIHS  updated  its  estimate  of  the  real-world  benefits  of  side  airbags 
in  reducing  struck  vehicle  driver  fatalities.  The  results  show  that  side  airbags  that 
protect  people’s  heads  are  reducing  driver  deaths  in  cars  struck  on  the  driver  side 
by  an  estimated  37  percent.  Airbags  that  protect  the  chest  and  abdomen  but  not 
the head are reducing deaths by 26 percent. The results also show an estimated 52 
percent  reduction  in  fatality  rates  for  drivers  of  SUVs  equipped  with  side  airbags 
with head protection. These real-world findings corroborate the good crash test per-
formance  of  these  devices  in  crashes  simulating  an  SUV  striking  the  driver  side  of 
a vehicle and suggest that the manufacturer’s voluntary front-side commitment will 
lead to significant reductions in struck vehicle driver fatality rates. 

To  learn  more  about  the  Crash  Compatibility  initiative,  please  see  http:// 
http://dms.dot.gov/search/ 

www.autoalliance.org/safety/ 
searchFormSimple.cfm and enter docket number ‘‘14623’’ in the search box. 

Another  voluntary  initiative  led  to  the  establishment  of  test  procedures  and  per-
formance  criteria  to  assure  that  in  the  event  an  occupant  is  out-of-position  at  the 
time  of  deployment  of  a  side  air  bag,  the  risk  of  serious  injury  is  limited  to  5  per-
cent.  In  response  to  concerns  about  potential  injury  risk  to  out-of-position  (OOP) 
women  and  children  from  deploying  side  airbags,  the  Alliance,  the  Association  of 
International  Automobile  Manufacturers  (AIAM),  the  Automotive  Occupant  Re-
straints Council (AORC), and IIHS used a joint working group to develop test proce-
dures  with  injury  criteria  and  limits  to  ensure  that  the  risk  of  injury  to  OOP  occu-
pants  from  deploying  side  airbags  would  be  very  limited.  The  initiative  produced 
recommended procedures for evaluating occupant injury risk from deploying side air 
bags that were finalized in August 2000 and updated in September 2003. Currently, 
90 percent of Alliance member company side airbags have been designed in accord-
ance with the recommended procedures. More importantly, the field performance of 
side  air  bags  remains  positive.  For  more  information,  please  visit  http:// 
twg.iihs.org/  or  visit  http://dms.dot.gov/search/searchFormSimple.cfm  and  enter 
docket number ‘‘5098’’ in the search box. 

In  July  2006,  Canada’s  Minister  of  Transport,  Infrastructure  and  Communities 
(The  Honourable  Lawrence  Cannon)  announced  the  signing  of  three  memoranda  of 
understanding (MOUs) with vehicle manufacturers. Each of the agreements will ad-
vance the safety by: 

or 

visit 

sit next to an air bag; 

• updating the side-impact protection requirements to better protect children who 
• improving  compatibility  between  vehicles  of  different  sizes  to  reduce  the  sever-
• promoting  the  use  of  new  technologies  in  the  design  and  manufacture  of  vehi-

ity of occupant injury in side and frontal collisions; and 

cles to ensure optimal seatbelt fit for front seat passengers. 

Each of these MOUs are based on voluntary agreements first initiated and devel-
oped  by  the  Alliance.  In  announcing  these  agreements,  Transport  Canada  stated 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

that,  ‘‘The  department  continues  to  modernize  its  system  of  regulatory  governance 
by  making  smarter  regulations  through  innovative  consultation  mechanisms  and 
processes, harmonized initiatives and voluntary agreements with the transportation 
industry.’’ 

interactions—often  called 

‘‘driver  distraction’’—with  new 

These  efforts  to  develop  voluntary  standards  to  enhance  motor  vehicle  safety, 
when combined with an industry commitment to design vehicles in accordance with 
them,  is  a  model  for  responsible  industry  action.  These  programs  are  proven  to  be 
a  very  effective  way  to  bring  significant  safety  improvements  into  the  fleet  faster 
than  has  been  historically  possible  through  regulation.  The  voluntary  standards 
process also has the flexibility to produce rapid modifications should the need arise. 
The  Alliance  has  also  developed  a  set  of  principles  to  address  the  safety  aspects 
of  driver 
in-vehicle 
telematics systems. The Alliance’s Driver Focus—Telematics Guidelines relate to the 
design,  use,  and  installation  of  invehicle  information  and  communications  systems. 
The Guidelines contain 24 principles to enhance the safety of driver interaction with 
telematics systems. Each principle includes verification procedures and performance 
criteria  for  the  safe  operation  of  advanced  in-vehicle  information  and  communica-
tions  systems  intended  for  use  by  the  driver  while  the  vehicle  is  in  motion.  The 
Guidelines  were  first  issued  in  draft  form  in  2002  and  continue  to  be  updated  as 
research,  field  data,  and  technology  become  available.  Alliance  members  are  volun-
tarily  using  the  Guidelines  to  minimize  driver  distraction  and  collaborate  with 
NHTSA  on  efforts  to  further  enhance  efficiency  using  in-car  systems.  Transport 
Canada is also in negotiations with automakers to establish a Memorandum of Un-
derstanding  (MOU)  which  would  set  out  the  general  terms  and  conditions  with  re-
gard to limiting driver distraction from in-vehicle telematics devices pursuant to the 
Alliance  Guidelines.  Finally,  the  United  Nations  Inland  Transport  Committee  has 
accepted these Guidelines and has presented them to its World Forum for the Har-
monization  of  Vehicle  Regulations  (WP.29),  the  internationally-recognized  govern-
mental body that helps set the future direction of global motor vehicle safety activi-
ties. For more information, please visit http://www.autoalliance.org/safety/. 

Alliance  members  are  also  individually  pursuing  initiatives  to  enhance  motor  ve-
hicle safety. One such initiative that has received widespread support is the instal-
lation  of  vehicle-based  technologies  to  encourage  safety  belt  usage.  Preliminary  re-
search  on  one  system  deployed  in  the  United  States  by  one  Alliance  member  found 
a  statistically  significant  5  percentage  point  increase  in  safety  belt  use  for  drivers 
of vehicles equipped with that system compared with drivers of unequipped vehicles. 
NHTSA estimates that a single percentage point increase in safety belt use nation-
wide would result in an estimated 280 lives saved per year. Beginning in model year 
2004,  all  members  of  the  Alliance  began  deploying  various  vehicle-based  tech-
nologies to increase safety belt use. Eighty-five percent of model year 2006 cars and 
light trucks were equipped with safety belt reminder systems. 
Significant  Progress  Has  Been  Made  to  Reduce  Fatalities  and  Injuries 

From Motor Vehicle Crashes, but Challenges Remain 

Over the past 25 years, significant progress has been made in reducing the traffic 
fatality rate. In 1981, the number of fatalities per 100 million vehicle miles traveled 
stood at 3.17. By 2005, this rate had been driven down by 54 percent to 1.45 fatali-
ties per 100 million vehicle miles traveled. The level of competitiveness among auto-
makers  has  helped  to  accelerate  the  introduction  of  safety  features  in  the  absence 
of  regulation,  aiding  in  the  progress  made.  In  fact,  all  of  the  most  recent  tech-
nologies  like  side  airbags  and  stability  control  have  been  introduced  ahead  of  Fed-
eral regulation or legislative mandate. 

Safety  is  an  area  in  which  manufacturers  compete  and  seek  competitive  advan-
tage.  Manufacturers  leverage  their  safety  performance  and  equipment  in  efforts  to 
distinguish  their  products  from  competitors.  Manufacturers  continue  to  make  inno-
vative  safety  features  available  to  consumers  across  their  entire  product  line.  For 
example,  side  airbags  with  head  protection  were  available  on  84  percent  of  model 
year cars and light trucks. Two-thirds of these air bags were side curtains and one- 
quarter were rollover-activated devices. Another example: electronic stability control 
was  available  on  63  percent  of  model  year  2006  cars  and  light  trucks.  These  two 
breakthrough  technologies,  as  well  as  the  others  mentioned  and  the  growing  use  of 
electronics and radar to take advantage of the time prior to a crash to either elimi-
nate  it  or  reduce  its  severity  through  automatic  braking,  demonstrate  the  commit-
ment of manufacturers to improving safety. 

Despite the progress made, however, data show that 43,443 people lost their lives 
on  U.S.  highways  in  2005  and  almost  2.7  million  were  injured.  Tragically,  55  per-
cent  of  vehicle  occupants  killed  in  crashes  were  not  restrained  by  safety  belts  or 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

child  safety  seats.  Alcohol  was  a  factor  in  39  percent  of  all  fatalities.  This  is  unac-
ceptable. As a Nation, we simply must do better. 

As  the  General  Accounting  Office  reaffirmed,  vehicle  factors  contribute  less  often 
to crashes and their subsequent injuries than do human or roadway environmental 
factors. 1 We  will  never  fully  realize  the  potential  benefits  of  vehicle  safety  tech-
nologies until all vehicle occupants are properly restrained and all impaired drivers 
are off the road. 
Increased  Safety  Belt  Usage  and  Preventing  Impaired  Driving  Are  Needed 

Today To Prevent Needless Fatalities and Injuries 

The  single  most  effective  way  to  reduce  traffic  fatalities  and  serious  injuries  in 
the  short-term  is  to  increase  the  proper  use  of  safety  belts  and  child  safety  seats. 
Alliance  members  have  a  long  and  proud  record  of  working  to  increase  safety  belt 
usage. Over the past two decades, efforts, nearly totally funded by automakers, have 
lead to a 44 percentage point increase in safety belt usage; from 37 percent in 1986 
to 81 percent in 2006, resulting in an estimated 12,000 additional lives saved annu-
ally. 

However, we are still working to make that number higher, and with good reason. 
Safety experts say an additional 3,000 lives a year could be saved if the safety belt 
usage  rate  increased  to  92  percent.  Belt  use  in  5  states  and  one  jurisdiction  (CA, 
HI,  MI,  OR,  WA,  and  PR)  currently  exceed  92  percent  confirming  that  high  belt 
usage is possible. The proper use of safety belts and child safety seats is the single 
most effective way to reduce traffic fatalities and serious injuries. 

The significant increase in belt use over the years is largely due to high visibility 
enforcement mobilizations. Last May, the most successful mobilization ever was con-
ducted  with  more  than  10,000  law  enforcement  agencies  providing  stepped  up  en-
forcement and close to $31 million in state and national paid advertising to augment 
the  enforcement  effort.  Funding  for  the  enforcement  ads,  both  national  and  state, 
comes from funds earmarked by Congress for this purpose. These mobilizations have 
consistently achieved dramatic increases in safety belt use. We believe that it is im-
portant for Congress to continue to provide funding for these law enforcement mobi-
lizations and the paid ads informing the public about them. 

Primary enforcement safety belt use laws are significantly correlated with higher 
safety  belt  usage  levels.  States  with  primary  enforcement  laws  have  average  safety 
belt  usage  rates  approximately  11  percentage  points  higher  than  states  having  sec-
ondary  enforcement  laws.  Currently,  only  25  states  and  the  District  of  Columbia 
have  primary  safety  belt  laws.  Efforts  to  enact  primary  enforcement  laws  are  now 
being  enhanced  by  the  Section  406  incentive  grants  Congress  provided  in 
SAFETEA–LU  for  states  passing  primary  enforcement  laws  or  achieving  high  belt 
use rates. Primary enforcement bills have been introduced in at least a dozen states 
this year and the Alliance is actively working to secure their enactment. 

Impaired  driving  is  also  a  significant  highway  safety  problem.  While  substantial 
progress  in  reducing  impaired  driving  has  been  made  in  the  last  quarter  century, 
more  must  be  done  to  prevent  these  needless  tragedies.  Just  one-half  of  1  percent 
of  the  trips  taken  annually  in  the  United  States  by  personal  motor  vehicles  are 
made by alcohol-impaired drivers. Yet, these trips result in nearly 40 percent of all 
motor vehicle fatalities occurring in the United States each year. 

In  November  2006,  the  Alliance  joined  with  the  U.S.  Department  of  Transpor-
tation,  the  Insurance  Institute  for  Highway  Safety  (IIHS),  the  Governors  Highway 
Safety Association, The Century Council, the Distilled Spirits Council of the United 
States  (DISCUS),  and  the  International  Association  of  Chiefs  of  Police,  to  support 
MADD’s Campaign to Eliminate Drunk Driving. There is no single solution that will 
eliminate  drunk  driving.  Drunk  driving  remains  a  behavioral  challenge,  a  law  en-
forcement challenge and a challenge requiring innovative new approaches, including 
exploring new technologies. Recognizing this, the Campaign has initiated a bold new 
4-point plan intended to end drunk driving in the United States. The plan is leading 
the Nation toward the goal of eliminating drunk driving through: 

1.  Intensive  high-visibility  law  enforcement,  including  twice-yearly  crackdowns 
and  frequent  enforcement  efforts  that  include  sobriety  checkpoints  and  satura-
tion patrols in all 50 states. 
2.  Full  implementation  of  current  alcohol  ignition  interlock  technologies,  includ-
ing  efforts  to  require  alcohol  ignition  interlock  devices  for  all  convicted  drunk 
drivers.  A  key  part  of  this  effort  is  working  with  judges,  prosecutors  and  state 
driver’s license officials to stop repeat offenders. 

1 ‘‘Highway Safety—Research Continues on a Variety of Factors That Contribute to Motor Ve-

hicle Crashes.’’ U.S. General Accounting Office, GAO–03–436, March 2003. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

3.  Exploration  of  advanced  vehicle  technologies  through  the  establishment  of  a 
Blue Ribbon Panel of international safety experts to assess the feasibility of, the 
potential  benefits  of,  and  the  public  policy  challenges  associated  with  a  range 
of  advanced  technologies  that  might  help  prevent  drunk  driving.  These  tech-
nologies  must  be  moderately  priced,  absolutely  reliable,  and  unobtrusive  to  the 
sober driver. This element of the Campaign is being led by the Alliance. 
4.  Mobilization  of  grassroots  support,  led  by  MADD  and  its  400+  affiliates,  to 
make the elimination of drunk driving a reality. MADD is uniting drunk driving 
victims, families, community leaders, and policymakers in the fight to eliminate 
drunk driving. 

Comprehensive  and  Current  Data  Are  Necessary  To  Make  Insightful  and 

Sound Public Policy Decisions 

Sound science provides the foundation on which we build true progress. Data col-
lection  is  critical  to  assessing  a  promising  idea’s  expected  real-world  benefits.  Our 
extensive  research  starts  with  knowledge  of  human  behavior  and  how  people  act— 
and react—in autos. 

The Alliance sponsors a significant amount of safety research that is shared with 
the  safety  community.  The  Alliance  is  sponsoring  a  program  to  collect-real  world 
crash  data  on  the  performance  of  de-powered  and  advanced  air  bags  at  three  sites 
around  the  U.S.  (Dade  County,  Florida;  Dallas  County,  Texas;  and  Chilton,  Coosa, 
St. Clair, Talledega, and Shelby Counties in Alabama). This program adds valuable 
information about air bag performance to the extensive crash data already being col-
lected  by  NHTSA  through  NASS.  The  Alliance  project  observes  all  the  NASS  data 
collection  protocols  so  that  the  Alliance  funded  cases  can  be  compared  with,  and 
evaluated consistently with, other cases in the NASS dataset. For more information, 
please visit http://groups.iihs.org/brp/. 

In  December  2006,  NHTSA  issued  a  technical  report,  titled  An  Evaluation  of  the 
1998–1999 Redesign of Frontal Air Bags. The Alliance estimates that approximately 
25  percent  of  the  crash  investigations  considered  as  part  of  this  evaluation  were 
cases  investigated  by  the  Alliance.  The  report  finds  that,  compared  to  first-genera-
tion  air  bags,  redesigned  air  bags  reduced  fatalities  to  infants  and  children  by  83 
percent  and  to  out-of-position  drivers  by  70  percent  in  low-to-25  moderate  speed 
crashes.  Yet  they  entirely  preserved  the  overall  life-saving  benefits  of  first-genera-
tion air bags for belted drivers and for passengers age 13 and up. 

Consistent  with  need  for  more  real-world  data,  some  Alliance  members  have  vol-
untarily installed Event Data Recorders (EDRs) that provide improved data to assist 
safety  researchers,  auto  engineers,  government  researchers  and  trauma  doctors  in 
their work. EDRs can improve our collective understanding of crash events and lead 
to  improvements  in  vehicle  safety  systems.  Recording  certain  data  elements  in  the 
moments  just  prior  to  and  during  a  crash  can  contribute  to  the  breadth  and  reli-
ability  of  the  crash  data  already  gathered  by  state  and  Federal  governments  and 
widely used by public and private entities to study and improve transportation safe-
ty.  NHTSA  and  NTSB  have  noted  the  important  safety  benefits  of  EDRs  and 
NHTSA  has  recently  issued  a  regulation  federally  mandating  performance  and  dis-
closure  requirements  for  voluntarily  installed  EDRs.  NHTSA’s  regulation,  acknowl-
edging the importance of consistent EDR requirements and encouraging the contin-
ued  voluntary  installation  of  EDRs  by  automakers,  preempts  conflicting  state  and 
local requirements and any requirement that would affect EDR performance, design, 
or operation, including ‘‘On/Off Switches’’. 

Mandated  EDR  ‘‘On/Off  Switches,’’  which  were  considered  and  dismissed  by 
NHTSA  as  technically  unfeasible,  have,  nonetheless,  been  proposed  in  a  recent 
House bill. As certain parties fail to acknowledge, the EDR’s in today’s vehicles are 
typically  integrated  into  the  air  bag  control  module.  They  are  not  stand-alone  de-
vices  that  can  be  deactivated  without  disabling  the  airbag  system.  Disabling  the 
EDR  would  also  be  prohibited  by  Federal  law.  Federal  motor  vehicle  safety  stand-
ards  (FMVSS)  No.  208  requires  that  ‘‘[a]n  occupant  protection  system  that  deploys 
in  the  event  of  a  crash  shall  have  a  monitoring  system  with  a  readiness  indicator.’’ 
(49 CFR Part 208, S4.5.2). These monitoring systems are integrated with EDR func-
tions.  And,  it  would  also  violate  Federal  law  to  install  a  switch  that  would  disable 
the airbag system. 2 

2 Section 30122 of Title 49, United States Code, forbids a manufacturer, dealer, or motor vehi-
cle  repair  business  from  ‘‘making  inoperative’’  anything  that  is  installed  in  a  motor  vehicle  to 
comply with a Federal motor vehicle safety standard. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

The  Potential  Benefits  of  Vehicle  Safety  Technologies  Can  Not  Be  Fully 
Realized  Until  Vehicle  Occupants  Are  Properly  Restrained  and 
Impaired Drivers Are Off the Road 

Motor vehicle safety is a shared responsibility among government, consumers and 
vehicle manufacturers. Auto manufacturers are more committed than ever to devel-
oping  advanced  safety  technologies  to  reduce  fatalities  and  injuries  resulting  from 
motor vehicle crashes. But as a nation, we will never fully realize the potential ben-
efits  of  vehicle  safety  technologies  until  occupants  are  properly  restrained  and  im-
paired drivers are off the road. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
I want to thank all the panelists for your opening statements. 
And  I  have  two  very  quick  motions.  First  is  that  all  the  written 
testimony and exhibits offered by the witnesses be made part of the 
record. 

Is there any objection? 
[No response.] 
Senator PRYOR. If not, so ordered. 
Senator  PRYOR.  And,  second,  that  Senator  Stevens,  from  Alaska, 
will  be  added  as  an  original  cosponsor  to  the  Clinton-Sununu  bill 
that we’ve been talking about today. 

Is there any objection to that? 
[No response.] 
Senator PRYOR. If not, then so ordered. 
We’ve  been  joined  by  Senator  Klobuchar,  of  Minnesota,  who,  by 
the way, thinks that we’re all wimpy here in Washington when our 
kids don’t have school when there’s 3 inches of snow on the ground. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. That would be correct. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  PRYOR.  But,  Senator,  we  normally  allow  Senators  to 
make an opening statement of a couple of minutes. If you’d like to, 
feel free. 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Well,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  I’m 
very  pleased  to  be  on  this  subcommittee.  My  background  involves 
work  as  a  prosecutor,  and  I’ve  dealt  with  public  safety  issues  be-
fore, and I wanted to be on this committee for that reason. 

I thank you also for holding this important hearing. I know, from 
my  own  experience  with  car  safety  for  kids—my  daughter  is  now 
11, but I had many difficult situations with car seats. I thought I’d 
have  them  installed  right,  and  then  I  would  turn  and  she  would 
be  halfway  over  in  the  car  seat.  And  I  think  it  just  shows—and  I 
had  tried  my  best  and  pulled  those  seatbelts  as  tight  as  I  could, 
and  then  trained  and  done  everything—that  clearly  there  is  more 
work  to  be  done.  I  also  remember  going  on  vacation  and  trying  to 
get,  when  she  was  a  little  older,  one  of  those  booster  seats  from  a 
car rental place, and they only had ones for little kids, and we had 
to go to Target and buy one. I have found it to be a confusing area, 
and  I  think  it’s  something  that  is  ripe  for  making  sure  that  we  do 
everything  that  we  can  to  protect  kids  in  cars,  because  I  appre-
ciated  the  work  that’s  been  done  with  education  efforts  with  seat-
belts, Mr. McCurdy, but the issue for these kids is, they’re just re-
lying  on  adults  to  take  care  of  them,  and  manufacturers  to  take 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

care  of  them,  and  they  don’t  have  as  much  say  in  what’s  hap-
pening. 

50 

And I’ve read the statistics about how a child dies in this country 
almost every other year from a non-traffic accident. They’re backed 
over, strangled by—or every other day—they’re backed over, stran-
gled  by  a  power  window,  killed  when  a  car  is  accidentally  shifted 
into  gear.  And  the  CDC  has  found  that  more  than  9,000  children 
were treated in a single year in hospital emergency rooms for non- 
traffic-related  issues  with  cars.  And,  most  of  the  time,  a  parent  or 
other  family  member  is  involved,  and  clearly  they  didn’t  intend  to 
do this, but we need to put every safety measure we have in place, 
so this doesn’t happen. 

Senator  Clinton  and  Senator  Sununu’s  bill  calls  upon  the  Sec-
retary of Transportation to craft and implement some of those tools 
to create new rules that regulate rearward visibility, power-window 
performance,  and  shifting  from  park  to  drive.  And  I  fully  support 
this bill and look forward to asking some questions. 

Thank you. 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Senator. 
Mr.  Medford,  let  me  start  the  questions  by  asking  you  one.  In 
2000,  under  the  TREAD  Act,  Congress  directed  NHTSA  to  initiate 
a  rulemaking  to  consider  whether  to  require  more  comprehensive 
safety  tests  for  child  restraints  in  side-impact  and  rear-impact 
crashes.  But,  ultimately,  the  agency  concluded  that  there  were  too 
many  uncertainties  to  issue  a  proposed  rule.  What  uncertainties 
are out there? 

Mr.  MEDFORD.  Thank  you,  Senator.  The  uncertainties  that  were 
considered at the time that rule was issued in an ANPR, advanced 
notice of proposed rulemaking, in 2002, as the agency began to look 
at it, and got comments from the public, there was no performance 
standard. Remember, child seats are actually tested on a simulator 
or a sled, not in a vehicle, per se. So, there are some challenges in 
developing  a  test  for  a  sled,  which  generally  uses  a  frontal  crash 
simulation.  So,  there  was  test  method  development  that  hadn’t 
been  worked  out.  Then  there  were  no  side-impact  dummies  that 
could  actually  measure  the  injuries  sustained  to  children  effec-
tively. And then, there was a lack of injury criteria for those dum-
mies.  So,  the  agency—it  was  the  time  before  I  was  there—but  the 
agency withdrew that and continued to do research. And just in the 
past  few  months  we’ve  continued  to  do  research,  and—as  have 
most other parts of the world—looking at an effective standard for 
side-impact for children. And we think we’re close, and expect, this 
year, to have a test method and at least one 3-year-old dummy that 
we can use to begin to consider rulemaking in this area. But it has 
been a technical challenge, and that was why it was withdrawn at 
the time. 

Senator  PRYOR.  So,  in  other  words,  it  sounds  like  you’re  in  the 
process  of  coming  up  with  a  new  test  that  you  feel  would  provide 
you the data that would be helpful. 

Mr. MEDFORD. Yes, sir. We don’t have the final test results, and 
we haven’t finished the research, but we will finish it this year and 
make a decision this year. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

Senator  PRYOR.  Great.  At  this  point,  I’m  going  to  turn  it  over  to 
my  colleague  Senator  Sununu,  because  it’s  his  bill  that  we’re  talk-
ing  about  today.  And  then  we’ll  turn  it  over  to  Senator  Klobuchar. 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you very much. 
Mr.  McCurdy,  you  spoke  a  little  bit,  generally,  about  improve-
ments  that  have  been  made  in  safety  over  the  last  10–15  years, 
and  Ms.  Claybrook  used  the  phrase—and  I  think  we  understood 
what  she  meant  when  she  used  it—that  cars  aren’t  designed  for 
kids.  In  other  words,  we’re  adults,  we  buy  the  cars,  we  drive  the 
cars, we’re concerned about safety, generally speaking, but, histori-
cally,  all  the  design  criteria  haven’t  focused  on  5-year-olds—or  10- 
year-olds,  for  that  matter.  But  the  LATCH  system  was  mentioned 
in some of the earlier testimonies. That’s obviously focused on chil-
dren.  Could  you  expand  a  little  bit  on  systems  that  either  have 
been  implemented,  or  that  you  believe  the  industry  is  close  to  im-
plementing, that are focused on child safety? 

Mr.  MCCURDY.  Well,  thank  you,  Senator.  As  we  mentioned,  the 
BTSI  voluntary  work  that  this  alliance  led  and—in  conjunction  on 
the  brake-transmissions  interlock,  I  think  is  an  important  step.  I 
saw,  yesterday,  as  a  matter  of  fact—and,  again,  that’s  why  I  want 
to encourage you all to take advantage of this—you know, side air-
bags  that,  when  you  look  at  some  of  the  test  results—and  I 
watched  a  number—not  only  the  live  ones,  but  some  previous 
ones—a  lot  of  the  injuries  would  not  have  been  protected—or  pre-
vented  from  existing  technologies,  because  young—adults  average, 
you know, the size of—that they replicate with dummies, and chil-
dren often become flying objects within vehicles if it’s a rollover or 
something.  That’s  why  both  the  head  protection  airbags  develop-
ment,  I  think,  is  critical.  The  LATCH  system  a  children  were 
young,  there  wasn’t  such  thing,  but—you  know,  it  may  be  a  little 
cumbersome,  quite  frankly,  and  I  think  they’re  working  to  try  to 
find  out  how  to  make  that  more  usable.  But  it  is  a  serious  re-
straint. 

We’re  actually  working—and  I  think  the  manufacturers  are  co-
ordinating—with  the  car  seat  manufacturers,  that  are  separate 
from the auto manufacturers. And I think that’s an area that prob-
ably needs to have some focus to see if there are—is some compat-
ibility  there,  and  some  standards,  and  so  that  they  can  work  to-
gether to ensure that they are secured there. 

The dual-stage airbags and the de-powering of airbags for young 
children,  I  think,  was  particularly  designed  to  protect  them,  be-
cause we saw, in the first iteration of airbags, that—such explosive 
force—that  small  adults  and  children  were  often  injured  severely 
and  fatally  because  of  that.  They  actually  had  to  go  back  and  get 
some real changes, I believe, so that they could go through a proc-
ess  of  de-powering.  So,  again,  the  unintended  consequences  of  a 
well-intended,  you  know,  objective,  but  we  actually  had  to  go  back 
through  the  rulemaking  process  and  change  that  in  order  to  see 
that it was amended and workable to actually save lives. So, there 
are  a  number  of  those  kinds  of  developments.  Again,  I—this  is  my 
third week, so I probably don’t have the complete compendium, but 
I  can—I  will  gladly  find  more  specifics  and  provide  those  to  you 
and to the Committee. 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

Mr.  Medford,  you  spoke  little  bit  about  the  testing  or  review  of 
some  of  the  camera  systems  that  are  available  now  on  many  vehi-
cles,  some  as  standards  equipment  on  cars  that  are  sold  today, 
some  as  optional  equipment.  But  as  I  think  you’re  well  aware,  the 
legislation  doesn’t  require  cameras,  it  doesn’t  require  any  specific 
piece  of  equipment.  It  simply  calls  for  NHTSA  to  establish  a  rule-
making to create a visibility standard so that we have good defini-
tion of how big a blind spot is, or should be, or how much visibility 
we have on the rear of the vehicle. 

Have you tested other systems, devices, or technology for improv-
ing  visibility  around  a  car?  What  types  of  approaches  have  you 
looked at to date? 

Mr. MEDFORD. Yes, Senator, we have tested, and included in the 
report in November, the available technology that we are aware of. 
And,  at  that  time,  it  was  sensor  technology,  which  was  both 
ultrasonics  and  radar-based  systems  that  were  often  included  in 
vehicles  today,  more-expensive  vehicles,  for  parking  aids,  as  you’re 
backing  slowly  into  a  parking  spot.  It  would—it’s  really  intended 
by  the  manufacturers  to  provide  an  aid  for  you  in  backing  into 
those  spots.  We  looked  and  examined  those,  and,  quite  frankly, 
found there are many dead zones, and we don’t believe they’re reli-
able for this purpose, and wouldn’t recommend them for protecting 
children, identifying them, because of the blind spots. 

We also looked at a couple of different mirror systems, one actu-
ally  used  by  Toyota,  in  the  rear  pillar  portion,  which  is  a  mirror 
system  that  allows  you  to  look  from  your  rearview  mirror  to  the 
pillar  mirror,  and  then,  that  provides  some  view  of  the  back  area, 
some  of  the  blind  spot—and  found  that  the  images  were  so  dis-
torted  that  they  were  not  helpful  for  people.  We  also  looked  at  an 
after-market mirror that would actually be placed on the rear win-
dow,  and  you’d  look—you’d  actually  turn  your  head  and  look 
through that, and also found that to be distorted. 

And  when  we  looked  at  the  camera  systems,  we  did  find  these 
are systems with good cameras that basically reveal almost the en-
tire  area  behind  the  vehicle.  And  so,  they  have  that  capability  of 
providing  good  views  behind  the  vehicle.  What  we  did  also  say  in 
that  report,  as  you  probably  know,  sir,  was  that  until  we  under-
stand  how  effectively  people  will  actually  use  those  systems—be-
cause  it—an  average  backing  speed  is  about  3  miles  an  hour,  and, 
as you go in reverse, there’s a little bit of a delay, and the camera 
comes on, you look—if you look quickly in there, and you recognize 
there’s something there, and you detect it, you should stop, and you 
put  on  your  brake,  everything  works  perfectly—when  you’re  back-
ing  at  3  miles  an  hour,  within  a  little  over  2  seconds  you’ve  actu-
ally  traveled  almost  10  feet.  So,  these  systems  are  relying  com-
pletely  on  human  behavior,  as  they  currently  exist.  And  what— 
we’re  not  saying,  at  the  moment,  that  that’s  not  good.  What  we’re 
saying is, we’d like to understand how effective human behavior is 
with  the  systems  that  exist.  And  we’re  studying  that  this  year  in 
our laboratories. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  What  about  the  collection  of  non-traffic  data? 

I mean—— 

Mr. MEDFORD. Right. We’re—— 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

Senator SUNUNU.—obviously, to any person who has experienced, 
or knows someone who has experienced one of these accidents, I’m 
sure it comes as a surprise that we haven’t collected good informa-
tion  on  non-traffic  injuries  or  fatalities.  What  are  we  doing  to  im-
prove that now? And—— 
Mr. MEDFORD. We—— 
Senator SUNUNU.—what should we be doing? 
Mr.  MEDFORD.  We  are  aggressively  expanding  our  data  systems. 
There was a requirement in SAFETEA–LU that the agency develop 
a surveillance system and publish, every 2 years, data, to the Con-
gress and to the public, about non-traffic injuries. We have a series 
of pilot studies going on now to make sure that—we’re actually try-
ing  to  identify  systems  that  are  going  to  be  effective  in  identifying 
these  non-traffic  injuries.  NHTSA’s  data  systems  that  were  origi-
nally put in play really were never intended for—to collect data on 
these  systems.  The  census  data  that  we  do  for  fatal  crashes—the 
FARS,  Fatal  Accident  Reporting  System—has  a  census  of  every 
death that occurs in a vehicle. Some of that data actually captures 
non-traffic injuries, and we’re trying to do all we can to ensure that 
we’re  capturing  those  cases.  We’re  also  expanding  our  state  data 
systems  to  include  police  action  reports  that  include  non-traffic  in-
juries, which were typically excluded from our collection system, to 
see  how  valuable  they  are.  We’ve  entered  into  a  program  with  the 
Consumer  Products  Safety  Commission  that  has  an  all-trauma 
data  system,  which  collects  from—daily—from  hospital  emergency 
rooms around the country, all incidents that are treated, regardless 
of whether or not they involve vehicles or any other consumer prod-
ucts,  to  see  what  value  they  have.  We’ve  initiated  a  special  crash 
investigation  initiative  on  back-over  crashes,  where  we  do  detailed 
investigations  to  try  to  understand  exactly  how  the—what  the  cir-
cumstances  are  for  the  back-over  crashes,  something  we’re  very 
concerned  about.  So,  those  are  the  initiatives.  And  we’ll  have—be 
revealing the results of those pilot studies this year, as the analysis 
gets completed. 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you. I have one final question, and I ap-
preciate  Chairman  Pryor  being  very  lenient  with  my  time.  Collec-
tion  of  data,  I  think,  is  absolutely  essential,  and  I  think  that’s  one 
of  several  areas  where,  I  think,  there’s  very  strong  consensus  on 
the  value  of  the  provisions  in  this  bill.  One  of  the  things  that  we 
require  to  be  collected,  and,  even  more  importantly,  disclosed,  are 
vehicles  that  do  and  do  not  have  the  brake-shift  interlock  safety 
feature that we’ve discussed here. 

Representative  Campbell,  after  your  son’s  death,  I’m  curious  to 
know,  How  were  you  able  to  determine  whether  your  car  had  this 
or, in this case, didn’t have this feature? Was the information avail-
able?  And  what  did  you  do  to  finally  get  the  answer  to  your  ques-
tions? 

Mr. CAMPBELL. The information was not available. And when my 
accident—my  tragedy  happened,  I  had  no  idea  that  this  was  pos-
sible.  And,  no,  the  information  wasn’t  available.  I  then  contacted 
NHTSA,  honestly,  about—almost  a  year  after  my  son’s  death,  be-
cause  I  thought  either  my  car  was  broken  or  I  was  a  bad  parent, 
because I let my child die. And I realized that great parents suffer 
great  tragedies,  and  that  I’m  not  a  bad  parent,  that  the  only  way 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

to  prevent  these  types  of  accidents  is  to  design  them  out.  Because 
whether  it  was  me  or  some  of  the  unfortunate  families  that  are 
here today, statistically, if you don’t design out these very hidden— 
very hidden safety problems, we will not start saving lives. 

I went down to Washington, contacted your office, and your staff. 
I  had  a  great  meeting  with  NHTSA.  I  remember  it  really  well  be-
cause  it  was—December  8th  was  my  birthday—and  there  were 
about  12  people  from  NHTSA  there.  And  that’s  when  I  began  to 
understand that this was actually a design feature, that 80 percent 
of  the  cars  didn’t  have  it.  You  know,  we  talked  a  little  bit  about 
the  voluntary  agreement.  I—you  know,  and  the  data  in  that  says 
that they’ll give me a list of vehicles that will have it. We actually 
didn’t  get  a  list  of  vehicles  that  didn’t  have  it  until  just  recently. 
And  it  took  writing  a  letter  and  putting  it  on  the  docket  to  say, 
‘‘Hey, we need this information.’’ 

I went so far as to pass a bill in New Hampshire and say, ‘‘Hey, 
we need to disclose—the automobile dealers need to tell people that 
BTSI  doesn’t  work  in  every  key  position,’’  because  I  haven’t  met  a 
person  who  hasn’t  said  to  me,  ‘‘In  a  million  years,  I  never  thought 
that  would  happen.’’  Even  the  people  at  NHTSA  said,  I  quote,  the 
term ‘‘sweet spot,’’ from Keith Brewer—I don’t know his job there— 
but he—one of the first people I met with at NHTSA—and was sur-
prised  that  his  2001  Ford  didn’t  work  in  every  key  position.  And 
that’s  when  I  realized  that  this  is  a  big,  big  problem,  and  a  big, 
big  tragedy  that—look,  I’m  not  mad  at  the  industry,  I’m  not  mad 
at NHTSA. I’m trying to be forgiving and understanding. I wouldn’t 
want to tell people, ‘‘Here’s some of the dangerous things about my 
product,’’  when  I’m  selling  it.  But  we  have  an  obligation,  as  Con-
gress,  as  leaders,  to  say,  ‘‘I’m  sorry.  You  must  tell  consumers.’’ 
There was no disclosure in the owner’s manual, there was no infor-
mation from dealers. 

When  Michael  Harrington  asked  the  big  three,  ‘‘Hey,  can  I  have 
this  list?’’  they  said,  ‘‘No.’’  That  was  back  in  November  of  2005. 
When  I  got  a  list,  it  was,  ‘‘Yes,  we  have  that  in  all  our  cars.’’  Un-
true  statement.  You  have  it  in  four  out  of  five  key  positions.  So, 
when I ask you, ‘‘Does your car have BTSI?’’ and you say, ‘‘Oh, yes, 
it  does,’’  I  expect  that  means  it  has  it  in  every  key  position,  not 
four  out  of  five.  And  we  were  left  with  a  situation  where  it  was— 
and  I—this  is  in  my  written  testimony,  and  I  hope  you’ll  read  it— 
but  it’s  important  to  restate  it—my  children  beat  me  out  the  door 
by  about  a  minute.  My  excited  little  4-year-old  and  his  younger 
brother, 2 years old, ran out and got in the car, and they were able 
to roll it in a matter of seconds. If they had gotten in the other ve-
hicle  in  my  driveway,  a  2002  Envoy  that  had  BTSI  in  every  key 
position,  which  was  the  normal  car  that  we  normally  use  for  our 
family,  my  son  would  be  alive,  because  that  type  of  accident  was 
impossible  in  a  car  that  had  BTSI  in  every  key  position.  Because 
they  got  in  my  Ford  F–350,  four-door,  that  accident  was  designed 
in  to  happen  on  purpose.  And  I  could  go  into  what  I’ve  discovered 
and why it happened, but I hope that’s—all that stuff will come to 
light when we have this process, this process of getting legislation. 
You will see, there is no alternative. 

I  appreciate  the  voluntary  agreement,  but  it  wasn’t  until  this 
Committee  hearing  that  we  got  the  follow-up  information  of  what 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

happened. I appreciate the industry, and I quote, ‘‘a shared respon-
sibility  of  manufacturers,  consumers,  and  government.’’  This  is  a 
big  step.  But  when  we  get  into  all  the  nitty-gritty  of  that  issue, 
you’ll find that it correlates the same way of not enough disclosure, 
not  enough  people  understanding  what  a  blind  zone  is,  or  people 
not  realizing  their  windows  don’t  go  back  down.  They  think  that 
they do. I mean, this is a—this is a problem. 

So,  I  thank  this  Committee,  and  I  thank  everyone  who’s  sup-

porting this bill. 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you very much. 
Senator PRYOR. Senator Klobuchar? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
And  thank  you,  Mr.  Campbell,  for  being  here,  and  sharing  this, 
and trying to take your grief to help other parents and other fami-
lies. 

I  had  some  questions,  for  you,  Administrator  Medford,  and  they 
relate to the back-over avoidance and the recent NHTSA study that 
found  that  it  wasn’t  cost-effective.  And  then  you  said,  just  now, 
that  the  cameras  might  work,  but  that  we’re  not  sure  if  people 
would  use  it  practically.  Many  consumer  groups  have  conducted 
their  own  studies  that  have  challenged  the  results  of  that  initial 
NHTSA  study,  and  I  just  wondered  how  you  responded  to  those 
challenges. 

Mr.  MEDFORD.  I  just  got,  this  morning,  a  copy  from  Consumer’s 
Union,  one  of  the  responses  to  their  studies  so,  I  must  apologize, 
I  haven’t  read  the  responses.  But  we  don’t  know  whether  the  sys-
tems  are  cost-effective  or  not.  We’ve  not  made  a  determination. 
What  we  have  said  is,  this  is  how  much  they  cost.  We  think  they 
provide a very good field of view in back of the vehicle. We’re posi-
tive about that. We just don’t know how effectively consumers will 
use them, in terms of doing the steps that they must do, in the lim-
ited time that they have, at the speed for which they back, to actu-
ally  prevent  the  tragedy.  We  are  very  serious  and  very  interested 
in  solving  this  problem.  We  grieve  terribly  at  the  deaths  of  these 
children. We share that concern. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. All right, thank you. 
Mr. MCCURDY. Senator? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Mr. McCurdy? 
Mr. MCCURDY. Senator, could I respond? Yes, if—thank you. Yes-
terday,  I  met  with  Dr.  Green,  who  has  been  conducting  some  of 
these  human-factor  studies  on  back-ups  with  these  different  sys-
tems,  including  video.  And  I  would  implore  and  ask  that,  perhaps 
in  later  hearings  or  independently,  we  can  get  a  copy  of  some  of 
those  tests  and  actually  show  you  the  video  of  individuals  who 
were put in those situations, to test their reaction time to obstacles 
or  objects  that  appeared  in  the  back.  And  I  will  also  tell  you,  kind 
of  personally  and  anecdotally,  I  happen  to  have  three  different  ve-
hicles,  I  have  three  different  types  of  sensors  right  now.  One  is  a 
camera,  one  is  a  more  sophisticated  kind  of  combination  of  radar, 
and  one  is  the  traditional  sound-based.  None  of  them  work  per-
fectly,  and  each  have  flaws.  My  wife  told  me—she  would  kick  me, 
but,  after  35  years,  I  guess  I  can  get  by  on  this  one—she  has  the 
car  that  has  the  camera  in  the  back—or  that  has  the  rear  view— 
and  it  was  new,  and  so  she  started  focusing,  kind  of,  on  that,  in 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

the  back-up  mode,  was  at  the  grocery  store  and  was  pulling  back, 
but  was  so  focused  on  the  camera,  forgot  to  look  to  the  right,  and 
another  car  was  coming  from  an  angle—you  know,  typically  you’re 
supposed  to  look  both  directions,  and—but  got  so  focused  on  the 
camera,  forgot  that,  and  backed  into  the  side  of  that  car.  So, 
there’s—— 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  But  why  would  they  be  putting  them  in 

models, then, though, if they’re—— 

Mr. MCCURDY. No, because—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR.—perceived to be ineffective—I’m just—— 
Mr.  MCCURDY.  No,  they’re  not—they  are  effective  for  certain 
things.  They’re  not  effective  for  every  conceivable  situation.  And 
what—the  technology,  I  think,  that  NHTSA  and  others  are  going 
to  have  to  look  at  is,  there  are  other  blind  spots,  there  are  other 
areas, there are 360s. Some of these incidents would not have been 
prevented by having a backup camera. And if they’re front wheels, 
you  have  other  kinds  of  potential  risks.  But,  you  know,  I  tell  you, 
from the industry standpoint, because—actually, safety sells. If you 
look at the J.D. Power listing, nine of the ten top criteria are safety 
features that people want. I think surround-sound kind of snuck in 
there  somewhere,  but  the  rest  of  them  were  all  safety  features. 
But, again, they’re not a panacea. That’s why we do say it’s shared 
responsibility.  We  accept  responsibility.  It’s  shared.  But  you  also 
have  to  have  the  educational  awareness  and,  again,  information, 
and  probably  some  training.  I’m  a  passionate  advocate  of  tech-
nology,  but,  I  will  tell  you  technology  does  not  solve  all  problems. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. You know, and I understand, now, that the 
manufacturers  have  agreed  with—Mr.  Campbell’s  tragedy  here— 
that they will agree, voluntarily, to equip all the new vehicles with 
the  all-key-position  BTSI,  which  is  great.  But  what  I’m  wondering 
about  is,  with  this  agreement  in  place,  what  objection  would  there 
be to have a mandatory rule? 

Mr. MCCURDY. I’ve already told the Senator that if the goal posts 
are not moved, that we will—I think we have a lot of room to work 
together on this bill. I come as an honest broker. I am new to this 
position. But I would tell you, in the—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. I’m new to mine, too. 
Mr. MCCURDY. Pardon? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. I’m new to mine, too. 
Mr.  MCCURDY.  Yes.  And—but  having  worked  on  both  sides  of 
this  daises,  or  these  dais,  on  Capitol  Hill,  I  would  tell  you  that,  to 
the  extent  that—where  there  are  reasonable  and  actionable  items, 
we’re  going  to  work  with  them,  and  we  think  there  areas  that  we 
can continue to support—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. 
Mr. MCCURDY.—and will actively support. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Good. 
Mr.  MCCURDY.  It’s  not  a  perfect  bill,  but,  again,  we  will  work  to 

try to see that this goes through the process. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. And thank you. 
Administrator  Medford,  the  issue  I  was  raising  earlier,  in  my 
opening  comments  about  the  car  seats,  and  you  talked  about  the 
fact that the LATCH system is designed to make it easier to prop-
erly install seats. But I think something like 40 percent of parents 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

are  still  using  seatbelts  instead  of  the  LATCH  system.  You’ve  also 
said before that NHTSA is working with vehicle and car seat man-
ufacturers,  child-seat  installation  instructors,  and  consumer  advo-
cates  to  develop  a  better  education  campaign.  I  wondered  if  you’ve 
explored  the  idea  of  an  actual  built-in  child-restraint  system  or 
other  steps  that  we  can  take  beyond  education  to  make  sure  that 
kids are properly restrained when riding in cars? 

Mr. MEDFORD. We have. As a part of that February 8th meeting 
that  I  mentioned  in  my  testimony,  Senator,  we  also  are  looking  at 
changing  the  LATCH  regulation  to  see  if  there  are  ways  to  make 
it  easier  and  actually  changing  the  ease-of-use  ratings  that  we’re 
currently  giving  to  car  seat  manufacturers.  We  have  a  system 
where we actually give star ratings, or grades, to car seat manufac-
turers about how easy it is to install their seats. We’re going to re-
vise that system this year. We think we’re giving too high of grades 
for  current  seats.  So,  we’re  taking  a  number  of  steps  to  make  it 
easier. 

I  think,  in  1995,  we  had  a  survey  that  showed  that  89  percent 
of  the  car  seats  that  were  installed  in  cars  were  incorrectly  in-
stalled.  Today,  we’re—we’ve  reduced  that  number  to  about  39  per-
cent,  but  there’s  still  a  lot  of  work  to  be  done.  Car  seats  are,  by 
far, the most important piece of safety device for children in a vehi-
cle,  but  it  has  to  be  properly  installed,  and  they  have  to  be  in  the 
right  seat.  But  if  those  two  things  are  done,  they  provide  tremen-
dous safety benefit to kids. 

Ms. CLAYBROOK. Can I comment on that? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Ms. Claybrook? 
Ms.  CLAYBROOK.  First  of  all,  integrated  seats  are  those  that 

would actually be built into the vehicle, and—— 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  You  mean,  so  I  wouldn’t  have  to  do  all 

the—— 

Ms. CLAYBROOK. So, you wouldn’t have—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR.—seatbelt? 
Ms.  CLAYBROOK.—to  buy  an  extra  seat,  so  you  wouldn’t  have  to 
worry about which LATCH you had in, or seatbelt you were using, 
so  that  when  the  car  is  tested  for  adult  crash  tests,  it  would  also 
be  tested—you  could  put  a  child  dummy  in  the  child  seat  and  test 
it at the same time, so it would reduce the cost of testing. If there 
was  a  defect  recall,  you’d  have  the  name  of  the  owner  of  the  vehi-
cle,  you  do  not  often  have  the  name  of  the  owner  of  the  child  re-
straint, because it is sold separately. And so, you would have a seat 
that fits, that’s tested with that vehicle, and the parents can know 
and  rely  on  that.  And  there  are  systems  that  have  been  designed 
that  are  built  in,  so  that  when  you  buy  that  car,  you  have  it.  And 
if  you  don’t  have  children,  but  you  still  carry  children  because 
you’re  an  aunt  or  an  uncle  or  a  grandparent,  you  have  that  seat, 
as  well,  so  you  don’t  have  to  go  buy  a  separate  seat  yourself.  And 
there have been systems that have been designed for 1- to 10-year- 
olds. And Volvo has done some, Chrysler did at some point. So the 
industry  has  not  really  addressed  this  issue—although  it’s  been 
talking  about  it  since  the  1970s—because  it  hasn’t  been  required 
to  do  so.  It’s  a  perfect  example  of  how  cars  are  not  built  for  chil-
dren. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  One  last  question  before—Mr.  McCurdy, 

you want to respond to that? 

Mr.  MCCURDY.  The  information  I  have  received  on  that—we  ac-
tually  asked  those  questions  yesterday  when  we  were  looking  at 
the  car  seats,  and,  I  will  tell  you,  that  LATCH  system  is  hard— 
was  not  an  easy  one  to  hook  up.  And,  again,  I  think  that’s  where 
we  have  to  work  with  the  car  seat  manufacturers.  I’m  not  trying 
to  dispute  Ms.  Claybrook’s  claim,  but  reports  that  I’ve  actually 
heard  is  that  parents  have  not  been  pleased  with  some  of  those 
built-in  systems,  that  they  are  not  as  convenient  and  not  as  uni-
formly accepted. So, again, consumers ultimately make the decision 
which vehicle, which—and I don’t think government is in a position 
to  design  those  features  in.  And  I  think  we  need  to  have  the  data 
and work with those manufacturers to understand that. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  OK.  I’ll  be  honest.  I  just  can’t  believe,  in 
this  day  and  age  that  there  isn’t  some  easier  way  to  design  this 
system.  And  I  don’t  believe  that,  you  know,  anyone  wants  to  hurt 
children. I just think that we need to make this more of a priority, 
because  this  is,  again,  based  on  my  own  experience,  and  we  all 
bring our own experiences to the Senate, but it seemed to me that 
there  must  be  an  easier  way  to  make  these  seats  so  that  they’re 
in  the  cars,  yourself  instead  of  having  to  pull  all  these  belts  and 
trying  to  do  it  yourself,  and  then  you’re  not  strong  enough,  and 
then they fall over on the side. 

Thank you. 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Let me follow-up, if I may. Ms. Claybrook, when I asked my first 
question earlier to Mr. Medford about the TREAD Act and the com-
prehensive  safety  test  with  child  restraints,  et  cetera,  you  commu-
nicated that they were working on something. I’d like to hear your 
comments. I should have asked for your comments, as well. 

Ms. CLAYBROOK. I appreciate that, Mr. Chairman. 
First  of  all,  the  TREAD  Act  said,  in  2000,  that,  within  2  years, 
they had to issue a child-safety standard that protected children in 
side-impact  crashes.  And  in  2002,  before  that  deadline  occurred, 
the agency issued a notice, which said that they just couldn’t do it. 
They  were  going  to  issue  an  advance  notice,  and  then  they  were 
going  to  work  on  it.  But  they  never  really  had  a  all-points  call  for 
help  on  this,  they  didn’t  have  a  public  hearing  on  it,  they  had  a 
notice,  but  that’s  it.  They  didn’t  inform  the  Committee.  And  it’s 
now  been  7  years  since  that—almost  7  years  since  that  law  was 
passed,  and  it’s  just,  to  me,  an  example  of  how  this  issue  is  not  a 
priority. 

Now,  there  is  a  safety  standard  for  side-impact  protection  that 
Dr.  Runge  issued  in  a  proposed  form  in  2004,  for  adults,  that  be-
cause  of  the  way  that  it’s  written—at  least  the  proposal  was  writ-
ten—would  require  side-head  airbags  for  adults.  But  in  that  side- 
impact  standard,  it  doesn’t  have  them  in  the  rear  seat,  which  is 
where  we  have  children,  including  older  children,  12-year-old  chil-
dren,  for  example;  and  in  the  front  seat  design  for  the  side-head 
airbags, it says that children under 12 would submarine and could 
be  ejected  from  the  vehicle,  the  way  they’ve  got  the  proposed  rule 
written. So, there are two side-impact issues here, and I think that 
the agency definitely ought to put a priority on them. I don’t know 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

how  much  money  they’ve  spent.  I  haven’t  had  a  chance  to  analyze 
their  budget  for  this  and  whether  they’ve  put  as  much  money  as 
they should have into it. 

But  clearly,  the  integrated  seat  is  really,  to  me,  the  answer  to 
this  issue,  because  a  lot  of  parents  don’t  realize  that,  in  a  side-im-
pact  crash—it’s  one  of  the  worst  crashes  you  can  have  for  a  child, 
because  the  child  is  thrown  sideways  in  a  side-impact  crash.  They 
have  very  small  bones  in  their  backbone,  and  so,  they  are  very 
often  likely  to  be  quadriplegic  and  paraplegic  as  a  result,  and,  if 
they’re  put  in  seatbelts,  which  some  children  at  those  ages  are, 
then they’re really in deep trouble. 

So,  I’m  not  telling  Mr.  McCurdy  how  to  design  his  integrated 
seats. That’s the genius of the auto industry. And I defer to the ge-
nius of the auto industry. But what happens is that when you have 
a  standard  that  is  required  in  performance  terms,  the  industry 
stops  lobbying  against  it,  and  they  start  settling  down  and  letting 
the engineers do their work. That’s the real issue here. And on the 
voluntary standards, by the way, on the brake interlock, I don’t un-
derstand  why  it  shouldn’t  just  be  required,  because  a  voluntary 
standard  means  the  public  is  excluded  from  any  participation  in 
the  rulemaking  process,  there’s  no  enforcement,  the  agency  has  no 
responsibility  to  do  anything,  and  the  companies  can  change  their 
mind.  And  they’ve  changed  their  minds  all  sorts  of  times,  and  the 
whole  issue  of  a  voluntary  standard  is,  ‘‘Don’t  regulate—don’t  re-
quire us to do it now. We’ll take care of it.’’ And then, if they don’t 
do  it  later,  well,  there’s  no  legislation  pending  at  that  moment,  so 
nothing happens. And no one knows they’ve stopped complying. I’ll 
submit to the Committee a list of when the industry has promised 
to  do  something  voluntarily,  which  is  an  avoidance-maneuver  de-
vice, as opposed to a real sincere interest in putting them in. 

[The information referred to follows:] 

AUTOMAKERS: SAFETY JUST ANOTHER ‘‘OPTION’’ 

The  Industry’s  False  Promises  to  Voluntarily  Improve  Vehicle  Compat-

ibility and Side Impact Safety 

Voluntary ‘‘Standards’’ Are Not Standards 

Voluntary  safety  ‘‘standards’’  do  not  work,  and  the  historical  path  of  automakers’ 
voluntary efforts is paved with broken promises. In fact, Congress rejected them al-
most three decades ago when it passed the National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safe-
ty Act in 1966. As the Senate Committee Report stated: 

The  promotion  of  motor  vehicle  safety  through  voluntary  standards  has  largely 
failed.  The  unconditional  imposition  of  mandatory  standards  at  the  earliest 
practicable  date  is  the  only  course  commensurate  with  the  highway  death  and 
injury toll. 1 

Not only were the 1966 Congressional legislators right, but voluntary ‘‘standards’’ 

violate core principles of democratic accountability and transparency: 

• Involve no mechanisms for accountability: If the voluntary proposal proves dan-
gerously  deficient,  automakers  shirk  liability  because  there  is  no  recourse  for 
injured  consumers,  nor  for  the  government  to  initiate  a  defect  investigation  or 
compel the industry to perform a recall; 
• Involve  closed,  secret  processes  and  meetings:  The  public,  which  is  at  risk,  is 
shut out of the development of the proposal, which instead is designed in secret 
by  industry  working  groups  who  are  not  subject  to  oversight,  compliance  with 

1 Committee  Report  on  S.  3005,  The  Traffic  Safety  Act  of  1966,  June  23,  1966,  at  271,  273, 

274. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

statutory  requirements,  responsibility  for  explaining  the  basis  for  their  deci-
sions, or judicial review of their decisions; 
• Lack  transparency:  The  public  has  no  means  to  secure  an  independent  evalua-
tion of the quality of the industry’s voluntary tests or standards. The public re-
ceives no verification that a particular vehicle actually complies with the indus-
try’s voluntary tests, as they do with government standards that are subject to 
public compliance testing and enforcement, and there is no vehicle sticker at the 
point-of-sale to indicate that a standard is met; 
• Lack a baseline for safety: High-income purchasers, who can afford safety extras 
may  be  protected,  but  low-income  purchasers  remain  vulnerable  to  cost-based 
decisions by manufacturers; and 
• Produce  weak  and  non-binding  results:  Proposals  are  invariably  weak  because 
they  represent  the  lowest  common  denominator  among  companies  looking  out 
for their own costs and product plans, and there is no obligation to install tech-
nology  in  compliance  with  the  group  standard,  meaning  that  companies  can 
change their minds at will and decide to withdraw any protection offered by the 
voluntary ‘‘standard.’’ 
History of Broken Promises 

When  it  comes  to  voluntary  agreements,  automakers  have  reneged  or  retreated 
on  promises  for  decades.  From  General  Motors’  promises  in  1970  to  voluntarily  put 
air bags in all its vehicles by the mid-1970s (GM installed just 10,000 in model year 
1974  and  1975  vehicles,  and  then  discontinued  the  program),  to  Ford, 
DaimlerChrysler and GM’s recent recanting of their widely publicized 2001 promises 
to  voluntarily  improve  the  fuel  economy  of  their  light  trucks  by  25  percent  (with-
drawn after the threat of Congressional action on fuel economy receded), ‘‘voluntary’’ 
is often just another name for the manufacturers’ tactical maneuvers and delay. 

The  industry’s  approach  to  interior  vehicle  head  protection  illustrates  how,  for 
automakers, safety is optional. In 1970s, General Motors began to improve head pro-
tection in its vehicles with such technologies as air gap head protection padding in-
stalled  in  critical  interior  roof  areas.  However,  by  the  1980s  GM  had  discontinued 
designing  in  such  protections  in  most  of  its  vehicles,  preferring  to  focus  on  more 
marketable performance characteristics, such as horsepower and acceleration. 

In 2003, as part of a supposed effort to improve vehicle compatibility, automakers 
announced  a  voluntary  plan  to  test  and  install  side  air  bags  in  most  new  vehicles. 
The  plan,  however,  does  not  make  any  specific  commitment  to  redesigning  vehicles 
to  improve  side-impact  safety.  Moreover,  there  is  no  requirement  that  all  vehicles 
become compliant with the plan, and no outside body will verify vehicle compliance. 
In  fact,  even  the  safety  tests  developed  for  the  side  air  bags  are  voluntary  and  un-
binding. The plan—developed in closed, secret deliberations—involves no procedural 
or judicial oversight, provides no mechanisms for accountability, and offers no base-
line for safety. 

Just  the  year  before,  General  Motors,  in  cost-cutting  measures,  made  side-air 
bags—as well as anti-lock breaks—optional equipment in a number of models where 
they had been standard. 2 
Industry’s Refusal To Improve Safety of ‘‘Cash Cows’’ 

Why  should  the  industry  be  trusted  on  safety  when  auto  manufacturers  have 
unblinkly  faced  the  carnage  inflicted  on  other  motorists  from  light  trucks’  high 
bumpers  and  menacing  front  grilles,  building  ever-more  heavy  and  terrible  SUVs 
over  time  and  continuing  to  market  them  militaristically,  such  as  with  ads  calling 
the  Lincoln  Navigator  an  ‘‘urban  assault  vehicle.’’  In  fact,  General  Motors’  new 
Hummer  is  a  direct  adaptation  of  a  military  vehicle.  The  chief  designer  of  the  up-
coming  2006  Toyota  Tundra  brags  that  his  aggressive  design  reflects  ‘‘the  power  of 
the fist.’’ 3 

In 1998, the auto industry promised the NHTSA Administrator Dr. Ricardo Mar-
tinez that it would make modifications to achieve safer designs, mainly by adjusting 
vehicle  suspension,  but  the  industry  refused  to  provide  any  details  of  their  plans. 
Consequently,  the  promise  rang  hollow  as  vehicles  continued  to  be  designed  large 
and aggressive, and the resulting highway carnage continued. 

In  December  2003,  auto  manufacturers  announced  a  voluntary  initiative  to  ad-
dress incompatibility and aggressivity. The plan, which would be phased in on most 

2 Incantalupo,  Tom.  ‘‘A  Drive  For  Safer  Autos  Advocates  Press  For  Action  As  U.S.  Weighs 

Costs, Benefits.’’ Newsday Long Island, NY) May 14, 2003. 

3 Rechtin,  Mark.  ‘‘Toyota  Concept  Truck  hints  at  next  Tundra.’’  Automotive  News  January  4, 

2004. <http://www.autonews.cominews.cms?newsId=7421&bt=fistT1>. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

vehicles  by  September  2009,  would  phase  in  side  air  bags  and  lower  bumpers  of 
SUVs or add a barrier to prevent them from riding over cars. 

Yet  the  Alliance  makes  no  specific  commitments  to  redesign  vehicles  to  protect 
consumers,  despite  the  fact  that  it  has  known  for  decades  that  pickup  trucks  act 
as battering rams in crashes, and that that the height and stiffness of SUVs makes 
them major killers on the highway. Moreover, there is no requirement that all vehi-
cles become compliant with the plan, and no outside body will verify vehicle compli-
ance. 

A  voluntary  ‘‘standards’’  program  is  a  particularly  inapt  solution  where,  as  here, 
thousands  of  lives  are  at  stake,  the  manufacturers  have  long  been  on  notice  of  the 
serious  safety  hazards  in  these  vehicles,  and  the  externalities  of  their  marketing- 
driven  decisions  to  produce  ever-more  aggressive  and  deadly  vehicles  are  imposing 
needless suffering and costs on all of us. 

Ms. CLAYBROOK. I’m not saying, in this case, they’re not sincerely 
interested. I’m not saying you haven’t done a great job, Mr. McCur-
dy, in designing these systems. I applaud you for that. Thank you. 
But let’s just make sure that everyone knows that they’re in every 
vehicle. That’s all. We just want to make sure they’re in every vehi-
cle. 

So,  I—the  other  point  that  I’d—if  I  could  take  one  or  more  min-

utes—— 

Senator PRYOR. Sure. 
Ms.  CLAYBROOK.—on  the  child  restraints,  which  is  that  the 
NCAP,  the  New  Car  Assessment  Program,  which  tests  cars  at  ap-
proximately  5  miles  an  hour  above  the  standard,  the  only  NCAP 
program,  New  Car  Assessment  Program,  for  child  restraints  is 
whether the restraints fit. They don’t test it at a higher speed than 
the standard. So, they don’t have a front, rear, rollover, side, or any 
kind of vehicle test under the New Car Assessment Program. Now, 
there’s  a  hearing  next  week  at  NHTSA  which—at  which  this  will 
be  raised,  but  I  just  wanted  the  Committee  to  realize  that,  again 
and again, the children are treated as second-class citizens in both 
the  NHTSA  rulemaking  and  in  the  auto  industry  decisionmaking. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Mr.  Medford,  let  me  also  say,  after  the  hearing,  I’ll  look  closer 
at that report that we’ve been talking about regarding the rear-fac-
ing  cameras.  We  actually  have  a  vehicle  that  has  one,  and  one  of 
the  things  I  believe  you  said  earlier  is,  the  effectiveness  at  night 
is in question. I find that to be opposite, because when you put the 
car  in  reverse,  the  reverse  lights,  which  are  white,  come  up,  and 
they illuminate the back side. But, again, I’ll look at your findings 
there.  And  you  also  mentioned  that  a  lot  of  this  depends  on  the 
user,  the  consumer,  the  person  who’s  driving.  And  that’s  exactly 
right. But you could make the same argument about rearview mir-
rors.  If  they  don’t  use  those  properly,  and  if  they  don’t,  you  know, 
pay  close  enough  attention,  there’s  no  point  in  having  a  rearview 
mirror.  So,  I’ll  look  at  that,  and  we’ll  follow  up  with  that  sepa-
rately. 

Dr. Gulbransen—— 
Dr. GULBRANSEN. Yes. 
Senator PRYOR.—I’m sorry I butchered your name earlier. I real-

Dr. GULBRANSEN. No, I—— 
Senator  PRYOR.—did  not  intend  to  do  that.  Let  me  ask,  just  on 
a personal note, Was—the tragedy that you faced—was that on pri-
vate property? 

ly—— 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

Dr. GULBRANSEN. Yes, it was. I lived in a townhouse at the time, 

and it was in the driveway. 

Senator PRYOR. And do you know if that was reported in—— 
Dr.  GULBRANSEN.  Well,  I  filled  out  a  police  report,  but  it  didn’t 

become a statistic—— 

Senator PRYOR. It did not. 
Dr. GULBRANSEN.—from what I was told. 
Senator PRYOR. That was my question. 
Dr. GULBRANSEN. That’s what I—— 
Senator PRYOR. Did not become—— 
Dr. GULBRANSEN.—was told. 
Senator PRYOR.—a statistic. 
Dr. GULBRANSEN. Right. 
Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  And  so,  when  we  were  talking  about  statis-

tics earlier—— 

Dr. GULBRANSEN. Wasn’t in there. 
Senator PRYOR.—you would agree that we need a better—— 
Dr. GULBRANSEN. Right. 
Senator PRYOR.—statistical collection—— 
Dr.  GULBRANSEN.  In  order  to  make  changes,  you  have  to  learn 

from information. You’ve got to collect the information. 

I just wanted to make one comment. I know I’m just a—— 
Senator PRYOR. Sure. 
Dr. GULBRANSEN.—study of one, or ‘‘an’’ of one, and I’m just, you 
know,  sort  of  a  grassroots  general  pediatrician.  And  I  wouldn’t 
want  to  be  in  the  position  of  Mr.  McCurdy,  of  going  back  to  the 
automobile  industry,  or  Mr.  Medford,  who’s  got  to  design  these 
studies, which are very difficult to design, I can imagine. As a pedi-
atrician  who  reads  a  lot  of  research,  a  lot  of  stuff  is  very  flawed 
when  you’re  reading  it,  and  I  can  only  imagine  how  difficult  this 
is  going  to  be  for  him  to  design  the  stuff.  But  just  sort  of  like  in 
a  grassroots  level,  having  been  an  operator  of  a  vehicle  for  many 
years  without  a  camera,  and  then  with  a  camera,  I  can  tell  you, 
it  definitely  makes  a  difference.  It’s  not  going  to  save  everybody, 
but  it’s  definitely  going  to  make  a  difference.  It’s  remarkable  how 
now I don’t want to drive a vehicle without a camera, because I use 
it as, you know, an additional device. Yes, you’ve got to look every-
where,  plus  now  the  camera.  But  it’s  really  helpful.  I’m  actually 
afraid to go in reverse if the car doesn’t have a camera. And in my 
practice,  I  think  the  patients  are  afraid  to  tell  me  they  don’t  have 
cameras.  They  park  down  the  block  or  something.  But  most  of 
them  will  come  in  now,  and  they  say,  ‘‘You  know,  I  got  a  camera. 
Now  I  wouldn’t  go’’—the  comment  is  always  the  same,  ‘‘I  can’t 
drive  without  one.’’  And  it’s  not  perfect,  but  certainly  it’s  going  to 
be  helpful.  I  mean,  I  used  to  be  a  kindergarten  teacher,  believe  it 
or  not,  and  there  are  actually—I’d  call  your—to  your  attention  to 
this  one  handout  here.  Sixty-two  children  behind  this  one  vehicle. 
It’s  a  well-known,  very  popular  American-made  SUV.  And  there’s 
actually  three  classrooms  worth  of  children  behind  that  vehicle 
that  can’t  be  seen  by  somebody  who’s  driving  in  reverse.  So,  you 
know, that’s—it’s just scary. 

So, I can only tell you, from someone who actually lived through 
the  trauma,  drove  without  a  camera,  drove  with  a  camera,  it  defi-
nitely  makes  a  difference.  I  can  only  imagine,  if  I  had  to,  sort  of, 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

look  forward,  that  the  best  technology  would  probably  envision— 
probably  involve  audio  and  visual  at  the  same  time,  because  some 
people  don’t  hear  as  well,  some  people  don’t—or  may  not  look— 
they may not look, because they’re looking somewhere else. So, it’s 
going  to  have  to  be  a  combination.  But  that’s  only  my  speculation. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Mr.  McCurdy,  let  me  follow  up  with  a  question  earlier,  and  that 
is  about  the  Alliance  of  Automobile  Manufacturers’  voluntary 
agreement  on  the  brake-transmission  shift  interlock.  That’s  a  vol-
untary  agreement  that  your  companies  have  entered  into.  Was 
there anything that prompted that? 

Mr.  MCCURDY.  Well,  I—I’ll  have  to  ask  the  staff,  because  it  was 
before my time. It may have been awareness on this particular in-
cident. I don’t recall. If I could ask Rob? 

Senator PRYOR. Sure. 
Mr. MCCURDY. He’s our—— 
Senator PRYOR. Yes. 
Mr. MCCURDY.—safety expert. 
Mr.  STRASSBURGER.  Yes,  it  was  Mr.  Campbell—Representative 
Campbell,  working  with  Congressman  Bass,  coming  to  us,  asking 
us to look at the issue and take it on. And we did. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Great.  And  could  you  identify  yourself,  for  the 

record, please? 

mobile Manufacturers. 

Mr. STRASSBURGER. Rob Strassburger, with the Alliance of Auto-

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
And, Mr. McCurdy, this agreement that you’ve entered into, does 

it require all of your association’s vehicles to have that device? 

Mr. MCCURDY. All have agreed to participate in that, yes. 
Senator PRYOR. Does that mean every single vehicle will have it? 
Mr. MCCURDY. Yes. 
Senator PRYOR. OK. And I’ve heard some discussion earlier about 
‘‘in  key  positions,’’  which  I’m  not  100-percent  sure  I  understand. 
Does that mean—— 

Mr. MCCURDY. I’ve spent a lot of time asking that same question, 
Senator, trying to understand the acronym and make sure that it’s 
there.  And  I’ve  been,  again,  kind  of  tutored  by  my  staff  that  one 
of the reasons there appear to be some differences in the language 
is that actually, believe it or not, the nature of the keys are chang-
ing  so  dramatically.  What  you  and  I  probably  think  of  as  a  tradi-
tional key, that concept is changing, they’re moving to start buttons 
and  they’re  going  more  electronic.  So,  they  wanted  to  get  away 
from just kind of the standard vision of a key, but they are talking 
about it in all positions. 

Senator PRYOR. OK, so they’re talking about it. It’ll work all the 

time, no matter what the key position, or whatever, may be? 

Mr. MCCURDY. That’s my understanding, yes, sir. 
Senator PRYOR. And—— 
Ms. CLAYBROOK. Mr. Chairman, could I comment on one question 

you asked—— 

Senator PRYOR. Yes. 
Ms. CLAYBROOK.—very briefly, which is, the auto industry—— 
Senator PRYOR. Microphone, please. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

Ms.  CLAYBROOK.  Sorry.  The  auto  industry  has  been  sued  for  not 
having  it’s  break-shift  interlock  for  a  number  of  years.  This  is  not 
something  they  didn’t  know  about.  I  would  say  it  goes  back  15 
years. And the foreign industry, in 1995, pretty much agreed to put 
the  brake-shift  interlock  in,  and  the  Detroit  manufacturers  would 
not. And then, there were 20/20 and 60 Minutes programs—I can’t 
remember  which  ones—disclosing  this.  So,  there’s  been  a  lot  of 
pressure  about  this  issue.  It’s  not  a  brand-new  issue.  I  am  deeply 
grateful  that  Representative  Campbell  and  Congressman  Bass 
pushed the companies to take it the next step. But it’s not a brand- 
new issue. I just wanted—— 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Ms. CLAYBROOK.—to—for the record. 
Senator  PRYOR.  I  understand  that,  and  I  think  the  Committee 

does, as well. 

But here’s my last question, Mr. McCurdy. On this issue—would 
the manufacturers be opposed to a statutory requirement that this 
be done? And if so, why? 

Mr.  MCCURDY.  Senator—and  I  indicated  this  in  personal  con-
versations  with  Senator  Sununu,  that  if  the  Senator  believes  it’s 
essential  to  memorialize  this  agreement,  then  we  would  be  sup-
portive of doing so. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Mr. MCCURDY. Is that clear? I mean, I—— 
Senator  PRYOR.  Yes.  No,  I  just  didn’t  know  if  there  was  a  good 
reason  why  we  shouldn’t  do  that.  But,  OK,  we’ll  continue  to  work 
with you on that. 

And  the  last  question  I  had  was  on  the  auto-reverse  windows. 
We’ve talked a little bit about those today. But, as I understand it, 
the technology exists, they’ve been using these, I guess, in Europe. 
I don’t know if they’re required in Europe. I don’t know their exact 
circumstances.  But,  as  I  understand,  it’s  $10  to  maybe  $15,  on  av-
erage,  a  window,  something  like  that.  Is  this  something  that  your 
alliance would consider doing on a voluntary basis, or, there again, 
is  it  something  that  NHTSA  thinks  should  be  done  by  regulation, 
or should we—— 

Mr.  MCCURDY.  Senator,  we’ve  worked  with  NHTSA  and—on  the 
changing  of  the  nature  of  the  shift  on  the—and  activator—on  the 
power  windows.  Before,  it  was  one  that  could  be  accidentally  sup-
pressed—or depressed, that, therefore, continued engagement. And 
so,  the  design  changes  were  to  make  those  that  they  were  sup-
pressed—or leveled out. And then, last year, it was amended again 
to make sure it had to be a lift-up-and-out—— 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Mr. MCCURDY.—in order to raise the window. And that’s becom-

ing the standard. That’s where auto manufacturers are going. 

I  actually  asked  a  question,  trying  to  understand,  too,  on  the 
auto-reverse  situation—some  automakers—first  of  all,  it’s  not  re-
quired,  to  the  best  of  my  members’  recollection,  in  Europe  or  in 
Japan,  even  though  it’s—I  think,  Ms.  Claybrook’s  correct  that  in 
Japan it appears to be more widely used. In some vehicles—in the 
vehicle  I  was  riding  in  yesterday,  in  the  express  position,  it  is  an 
automatic  reverse.  But  in  some  situations,  believe  it  or  not,  you 
don’t  want  it  having  auto-reverse,  because  if  someone  were  trying 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

to  actually  reach  into  your  car,  and  you  didn’t  want  them  to  be 
reaching  into  your  car—criminal  act  or  something—they  could  ac-
tually  force  the  window  down.  So,  that’s  why  the  lift-up-and-out— 
so,  it’s  only  in  the  express  position  that  it  would—that  it  goes 
down.  On  others,  you  actually  have  it  where  it  would—where  you 
couldn’t  force  that  down.  So,  there  are  some  trade-offs  there.  I’m 
not providing an excuse. I’m just telling you that—just some of the 
technical  questions  that  have  been  raised.  And,  again,  I  think 
we’ll—we’re  willing  to  work  with  the  Senate  and  the  leaders  and 
NHTSA to try and find out what is that best approach. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Mr. MCCURDY. And, again, you know—I apologize—this is where 
data  really  is  critical,  just  really  understanding  the  full  impact  of 
that.  It  does  sound  easy.  I  don’t  think  it  is  as  much  a  cost  issue 
as  it  is  some  other  factors.  But,  again,  we’re  open  to  working  with 
the Senate on this. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Now, Senator Sununu, do you have any other questions? 
Senator  SUNUNU.  Just  a  follow-up  to  the  question  of  cost  that 
you  asked,  for  Mr.  Medford,  because  I  do  want  to  be  clear  about 
the  cost  of  the—as  clear  as  we  can  be  about  the  cost  of  the  auto- 
reverse.  Ten  years  ago,  I  think  NHTSA’s  estimate  was  that  it 
would  be  $100  a  window  to  implement.  I  think  their  current  esti-
mate,  or  the  2004  estimate,  was  $8  to  $12.50  a  window.  So,  don’t 
you  think  it’s  reasonable  to  assume,  not  only  can  that  cost  profile 
be  beaten  today,  but  that  if  this  is  established  as  a  standard  fea-
ture,  we  can  expect  it  to  be  significantly  less  than  that  $8  figure? 
Mr. MEDFORD. Certainly, Senator, that—if the volume were to in-
crease,  the  prices  are  likely  to  be  reduced.  I  think  the—there  are 
two types of auto-reverse systems. NHTSA actually has an optional 
requirement in its window standard that is more severe and strin-
gent  than  the  one  that  exists  in  the  European  standard.  And  so, 
they think there may be some differences in cost, if you had to com-
ply  with  that  one,  versus  the  other  one.  And  the  figures  that  you 
quoted, that were in the 2004 notice, or before that more stringent 
one  than  currently  exists  as  an  option  in  our  standard  today.  And 
it would be less for the Europeans, we think. 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you for the clarification. 
Ms. Claybrook? 
Ms.  CLAYBROOK.  Yes,  I  just  wanted  to  comment  that  80  percent 
of  all  the  vehicles  in  Europe  today  have  the  auto-reverse  in  every 
window. So, I just want the record to be clear on that. 

And,  second,  for  Mr.  McCurdy,  if  we’re  going  to  have  data—we 
don’t  collect  data  as  well  as  we  should  yet—but  in  2004  at  least 
eight children were strangled by power windows. And I have never 
heard of a complaint yet, either in Europe, or in the United States 
to  the  few  equipped  vehicles  that  are  here,  where  someone  said 
that  some  criminal  tried  to  get  into  their  vehicle  and  killed  them 
because  they  had  auto-reverse.  So,  if  we’re  going  to  rely  on  data, 
let’s  rely  on  data.  And  I  know  we  have  that.  And  I’d  love  to  have, 
you know, any further answer to that, that you might have. 

Mr. MCCURDY. Well, I appreciate the gentlelady for the clarifica-

tion. And, again, for—this is my third week, so I—— 

Ms. CLAYBROOK. I know it is. And I know—— 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

Mr. MCCURDY.—I’ve got to—— 
Ms. CLAYBROOK. I know it is. I want to come visit you, so we can 

talk some more. 

Mr. MCCURDY. Yes. No, I—— 
Ms. CLAYBROOK. Right, OK. 
Mr. MCCURDY. We’ve had some previous experience, but it’s been 
a  number  of  years.  You  know,  and  this  is  not  meant  in  any  way— 
I asked, probably, a naive question yesterday when I was in Detroit 
at this 4,000-acre facility, where 5,000 people are doing safety and 
testing  on  automobiles,  and  been  there  for  decades,  and  looking  at 
people  who  are  so  committed  to  the  purpose  of  safety.  And  if  you 
listen to them, there is a real commitment. And no one is there try-
ing  to  design  things  that  intentionally  cause  harm.  And  I  under-
stand  that  NHTSA—I  don’t  know  what  your  budget  is  on  testing, 
but I know that you do some in Ohio, and there’s a lot of contract— 
it’s a huge amount—as do other auto manufacturers. And my naive 
question was, Where does Public Citizen do their testing? And I got 
this  blank  look.  And  the  fact  of  the  matter  is,  you  do  not  have  a 
budget  for  that.  And  there’s  literally  millions  of  dollars  spent  on 
this. 

So, I’m offering, again, an invitation for you all, as Members and 
staff  and  advocates,  to  actually  come  and  observe  and  see.  And 
some  people  will  never,  you  know,  be  totally  convinced.  Perfect  is 
often  the  enemy  of  the  good.  We  want  to  have  some  good  results 
here.  We  want  to  work  with  you  on  those.  And  that’s  the  commit-
ment that I give you. And I can’t speak for everybody. And I appre-
ciate  everybody  saying,  ‘‘Well,  thank  you  for  this.’’  It’s  not  me.  It’s 
that—it’s  been  the  work  of  these  manufacturers  and  literally  hun-
dreds  of  thousands  of  people  that  have—making  this  commitment. 
Ms.  CLAYBROOK.  You  know,  Mr.  McCurdy  raises  a  point,  which 
is,  there’s  no  budget  in  this  bill  for  NHTSA  to  do  this  work.  And 
there’s  no  authorization  amount.  And  Public  Citizen,  of  course, 
does not have a testing budget. Wish we did. We’d love to do that. 
But  we  rely  on  the  government.  And  so,  one  of  the  things  that  we 
do  do,  Mr.  McCurdy—and  we’d  love  to  do  this  with  you—is,  we 
lobby  for  more  money  for  NHTSA  to  do  its  testing  work.  And  I’d 
love to join hands with you and do this together. Thank you. 

Senator SUNUNU. Well, I appreciate that very much. I’m going to 
conclude my time, there. I know you can be counted on to lobby for 
more money for NHTSA—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  SUNUNU.—when  the  authorization  period—when  we 
come  to  the  authorization  period.  And  when  we  have  those  discus-
sions here in this Subcommittee and the full Committee, I think we 
need  to  take  into  consideration,  and  we  will  take  into  consider-
ation,  everything  that  we’re  asking  NHTSA  to  do,  whether  it’s 
through SAFETEA–LU or TREAD or this legislation here. 

I  want  to  thank  all  of  the  panelists  for  taking  the  time  to  be 
here.  This  hearing,  I  think,  was  very  detailed,  was—went  even  a 
little  bit  longer  than  I  had  expected.  But  that’s  a  good  thing,  be-
cause  that  means  we  at  least  gave  everyone  a  chance  to  weigh  in 
on  the  things  that  they  think  are  of  greatest  concern  to  all  of  us. 
And we—I think everyone here on the Committee and the staff un-
derstand, whether they’ve been to facilities at the auto manufactur-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

ers or not, that you’ve got great people working at those companies. 
They’re smart, they’re capable. They have families, they have kids. 
And  there  are  probably  more  than  a  few  that  have  dealt  with  the 
kinds  of  issues  and  problems  that  we’re  talking  about  here.  So,  I 
think everyone recognizes that, when you’re talking about children 
and families, these issues do cut very close to home—through fam-
ily,  through  friends,  through  stories  that  you’ve  heard,  and  as 
we’ve heard here today. 

Dr. Gulbransen and Packy Campbell, very grateful for you being 
here,  willing  to  speak  on  behalf  of  many,  many  others,  some  of 
whom  sitting  behind  you  today.  No  one  who  hasn’t  been  as  close 
to  this  as  you  have  can  really  appreciate  the  difficulties  and  the 
courage that it takes for you to share your family’s story. So, we’re 
grateful for that. 

Mr.  Medford,  we  know  you’ve  got  a  challenging  job,  whatever 

level we authorize for you, and we wish you well in your work. 

And, Ms. Claybrook, thank you for being here today, for your ad-

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  I  want  to  thank  Senator  Sununu  for  his 

leadership on this issue. It’s very important. 

Thank all the members—all the witnesses on the panel today. 
And  I  also  want  to  say  that  the  record  will  remain  open  for  2 
weeks  for  Senators  to  offer  written  questions,  and  we’ll  work  with 
the staff on getting those responses back. 

But, with that, I want to thank you all very much, and the hear-

vocacy. 

ing’s adjourned. 

[Whereupon, at 11:45 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THE ASSOCIATION OF INTERNATIONAL AUTOMOBILE 

MANUFACTURERS, INC. (AIAM) 

The  Association  of  International  Automobile  Manufacturers  (AIAM)  appreciates 
this  opportunity  to  provide  its  views  on  vehicle  safety  for  children,  the  subject  of 
a  February  28  hearing  and  of  legislation  now  before  the  Commerce,  Science,  and 
Transportation  Committee.  AIAM  is  a  trade  association  representing  14  inter-
national  motor  vehicle  manufacturers  who  account  for  40  percent  of  all  passenger 
cars  and  light  trucks  sold  annually  in  the  United  States.  AIAM  members  include 
Aston  Martin,  Ferrari,  Honda,  Hyundai,  Isuzu,  Kia,  Maserati,  Mitsubishi,  Nissan, 
Peugeot, Renault, Subaru, Suzuki and Toyota. AIAM also represents original equip-
ment  suppliers  and  other  automotive-related  trade  associations.  For  more  informa-
tion, visit our website at www.aiam.org. 

The  focus  of  the  Subcommittee’s  February  28  hearing  was  Senate  bill  S.  694,  in-
troduced  on  February  27  by  Senators  John  Sununu  and  Hillary  Clinton.  Main  ele-
ments of the bill are requirements for— 

• A  NHTSA  rulemaking  to  mandate  that  power  windows  have  an  automatic  re-

verse feature. 

• A  NHTSA  rulemaking  to  establish  a  rearward  visibility  performance  standard. 
• A  NHTSA  rulemaking  to  establish  a  vehicle  roll-away  standard.  This  standard 
would  assure  that  light  vehicles  having  an  automatic  transmission  may  not  be 
shifted  out  of  the  ‘‘Park’’  position  unless  the  service  brake  pedal  is  depressed. 
This  requirement  would  apply  in  all  ignition  key  positions  in  which  the  trans-
mission can be shifted out of ‘‘Park.’’ 

• NHTSA  to  establish  a  database  of  injuries  and  deaths  in  non-traffic,  non-crash 

events involving passenger motor vehicles. 

• NHTSA to establish a consumer information program relating to child safety in 

non-traffic, non-crash incidents. 

AIAM  supports  the  establishment  of  child  safety  as  a  high  priority  for  the  Sub-
committee,  and  vehicle  manufacturers  view  it  as  a  high  priority  for  their  own  re-
search and product development initiatives. We also support NHTSA’s efforts to ob-
tain  data  on  non-crash  vehicle-related  events.  We  believe  that  such  data  provides 
the necessary, rational starting point and the only appropriate basis for establishing 
program priorities for new safety initiatives to address non-crash events. The alter-
native  of  relying  upon  anecdotal  information  or  intuitive  assessments  could  well 
lead  to  shifting  of  NHTSA  and  manufacturer  resources  away  from  initiatives  that 
have  greater  life-saving  potential,  toward  actions  with  lesser  potential  benefits.  We 
also support, as a necessary corollary to legislative direction for new data collection 
efforts,  the  provision  of  adequate  budget  and  staff  resources  for  NHTSA  to  collect 
and  analyze  the  data.  Without  such  resources  and  staff,  the  data  collection  and 
analysis process could be impaired or delayed. 

We also support the establishment of a consumer information program of the type 
included  in  the  bill,  to  bring  market  incentives  to  bear  in  promoting  child  safety. 
Reliance on such market-based approaches (based upon previously developed and re-
liable  data  and  analysis)  can  provide  safety  benefits  more  quickly  than  regulatory 
approaches  in  many  instances.  Ongoing  efforts  to  educate  parents  and  care-givers 
as  to  the  need  to  use  child  restraints  and  the  proper  use  of  those  restraints  have 
been  highly  effective.  We  continue  to  support  efforts  to  enhance  the  performance  of 
child restraint systems, including efforts to make restraints easier to use. Extension 
of  such  consumer  education  programs  to  include  non-crash  risks  is  a  reasonable 
step. 

Our specific comments on S. 694 are as follows: 

(69) 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

Section 2(a)—Power Window Safety 

Consistent with direction under the 2005 SAFETEA–LU legislation, NHTSA com-
pleted a rulemaking to modify power window operating switch design to require that 
the switches would operate to close a window only if the switch were pulled up. See 
71  Fed.  Reg.  18673,  April  12,  2006.  In  responding  to  petitions  for  reconsideration 
of that rule, the agency stated that, based on available data, the measures adopted 
by  the  agency  would  ‘‘prevent  the  types  of  power  window  incidents  that  have  been 
documented.’’  See  71  Fed.  Reg.  18679.  The  agency  went  on  to  state  that  risk  sce-
narios  presented  by  safety  advocacy  organizations  ‘‘lacked  any  documentation  that 
any  such  cases  have  actually  occurred.’’  Id.  Without  any  documented  evidence  that 
a safety problem beyond that addressed by the 2006 NHTSA rule exists, the redirec-
tion of agency and manufacturer resources to implement automatic reverse features 
across-the-board  cannot  be  justified.  However,  as  noted  above,  we  support  the  en-
hancement  of  NHTSA’s  data  collection  capability  for  non-crash  incidents,  and  we 
would be open to reconsidering our opposition to mandating auto-reverse if new data 
were  to  show  a  safety  need.  If  Congress  deems  it  necessary  to  direct  further  action 
by  NHTSA  on  this  matter,  we  urge  that  it  direct  NHTSA  to  conduct  a  review  of 
the newly acquired non-crash data in 2 years, and pursue further rulemaking if jus-
tified based upon that review. 
Section 2(b)—Rearward Visibility Performance Standard 

If  Congress  mandates  improvements  in  rearward  visibility  for  light  vehicles,  we 
support  a  true  performance-based  approach.  For  example,  a  standard  could  specify 
an  area  behind  a  vehicle  that  must  be  visible  to  the  driver  by  some  means.  In  this 
way,  manufacturers  may  implement  the  most  suitable  visibility  systems,  which 
could  involve  technology  that  does  not  yet  exist  and  could  well  vary  among  vehicle 
types.  However,  we  have  two  concerns  with  the  language  in  S.  694  in  this  regard. 
First,  although  the  language  of  the  bill  on  this  point  is  not  clear,  the  section  2(f) 
definition  of  ‘‘rear  blind  zone’’  could  be  interpreted  to  prevent  manufacturers  from 
relying  on  mirrors  or  enhanced  rear  window  design  to  achieve  compliance.  Section 
2(f) appears to require that areas beyond those visible through windows and mirrors 
must be visible, even if such areas are not safety critical. (The existing bill language 
could  also  be  interpreted  as  excluding  mirror  and  window  performance  only  in  es-
tablishing  phase-in  priorities.)  In  either  case,  it  is  not  clear  why  visibility  provided 
by  windows  and  mirrors  should  automatically  be  excluded  from  consideration.  Sec-
ond,  NHTSA’s  November  2006  report  on  rear  visibility  technology  identifies  signifi-
cant shortcomings in existing systems. It would be a mistake to mandate the imple-
mentation  of  new  technology  until  there  is  a  reasonable  basis  to  conclude  that  the 
technology  will  perform  well.  Therefore,  we  urge  Congress  to  allow  NHTSA  to  ex-
tend  the  time  for  completing  rulemaking  and  mandating  compliance,  based  on  the 
availability of effectively performing rear visibility systems. 
Section 2(d)—Preventing Vehicles From Rolling Away 

S.  694  establishes  the  same  ‘‘brake-transmission  shift  interlock  (BTSI)’’  perform-
ance  criteria,  with  the  same  September  1,  2010,  effective  date  as  the  industry  Vol-
untary  Agreement  to  implement  BTSI  that  was  submitted  to  NHTSA  on  August  7, 
2006.  The  bill  would  require  manufacturers  to  report  and  NHTSA  to  publish  the 
identification  of  vehicle  models  that  do  not  comply  with  the  BTSI  criteria;  the  vol-
untary  agreement  includes  a  comparable  commitment  to  publish  this  information. 
The  industry  estimated  that  80  percent  of  model  year  2006  light  vehicles  complied 
with  BTSI  criteria,  and  98  percent  of  model  year  2009  light  vehicles  are  projected 
to comply. 

All light vehicles produced by AIAM member companies already comply. Although 
we  would  not  oppose  a  requirement  for  BTSI,  we  do  not  see  a  substantive  safety 
benefit  that  would  result  from  enactment  of  section  2(d).  We  note  that  requiring  a 
NHTSA  rulemaking  as  in  section  2(d)  would,  to  some  degree,  divert  agency  re-
sources  away  from  activities  that  would  presumably  have  a  greater  safety  benefit. 
Section  2(e)—Database  on  Injuries  and  Deaths  in  Non-Traffic,  Non-Crash 

Events 

The  provisions  of  S.  694  regarding  the  establishment  of  a  NHTSA  database  of 
non-crash  events  are  somewhat  more  detailed  than  the  comparable  provisions  in 
section 2012 and 10305 of SAFETEA–LU, but we doubt that these minor differences 
would  lead  to  any  substantive  changes  in  the  data  system  that  NHTSA  develops. 
As stated previously, we support the development of this database. A more effective 
step that Congress could take, however, would be to include in the bill an authoriza-
tion  of  appropriations  in  an  amount  NHTSA  projects  to  be  necessary  to  implement 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

the  database,  and  to  support  inclusion  of  the  necessary  funding  in  the  Fiscal  Year 
2008 budget for the agency. 
Section 3—Child Safety Information Program 

We  support  the  child  safety  information  program  described  in  section  3.  We  also 
support  NHTSA’s  ongoing  effort  to  make  the  LATCH  system  for  child  restraints 
more effective and easy to use, and the provision of consumer information to encour-
age proper use of child restraint systems. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SALLY GREENBERG, SENIOR PRODUCT SAFETY COUNSEL, 

CONSUMERS UNION OF U.S., INC. 

Introduction 

Consumers Union (CU), 1 nonprofit publisher of Consumer Reports (CR), welcomes 
the  opportunity  to  submit  comments  to  members  of  the  Senate  Commerce  Sub-
committee  on  Consumer  Affairs,  Insurance,  and  Automotive  Safety.  CU  has  been 
testing  cars  and  reporting  our  findings  to  readers  since  the  organization’s  founding 
in  1936.  CU  regularly  testifies  before  Congress  on  issues  ranging  from  automotive 
safety to health care to telecommunications and financial privacy. 

The  topic  for  discussion  this  morning,  vehicle  safety  for  children,  is  a  top  legisla-
tive  priority  for  Consumers  Union.  This  Senate  Commerce  Committee  has  a  proud 
history of enacting legislation that has provided critical protections for children and 
adults  riding  in  passenger  vehicles.  It  is  not  an  exaggeration  to  say  that  had  this 
Committee not acted on seat belts, air bags, child car seats, roof crush, rollover and 
many  other  auto  safety  issues,  many  thousands  of  people  would  either  not  be  alive 
today or would have suffered grievous injury. 

This  hearing  provides  us  with  a  welcome  opportunity  to  share  with  Members  of 
this  Subcommittee  concerns  about  the  unfinished  business  of  keeping  children  safe 
in and around cars. Our testimony focuses on four key areas of interest for us both 
in terms of our testing and our public policy work: blind zones, LATCH car-seat in-
stallation system, power window switches, and brake-shift interlock. 
The Problem of Backing Over Children 

Every  year,  thousands  of  children  are  hurt  or  die  because  a  driver  backing  up 
couldn’t  see  them.  Consumers  Union  has  studied  the  problem  and  has  found  that 
all vehicles today have blind zones that prevent drivers from being able to see what 
is behind them. We also learned that some vehicles have far larger blind zones than 
others. 

Several  years  ago,  Consumer  Reports  began  measuring  blind  zones  for  every  car 
and  truck  we  test  at  our  Auto  Test  Division  in  Connecticut.  (see  CR’s  Best  and 
Worst Blind zone chart in the Appendix) We put a 28″ cone behind the vehicle that 
approximates  the  size  of  a  1–2  year-old  child  and  asked  a  5′8″  male  driver  and  a 
5′1″  female  driver  to  use  their  rear  view  and  side  mirrors  to  attempt  to  see  what 
is  behind  them  as  they  back  up.  The  results  of  our  testing  have  been  startling. 
While  all  vehicles  have  blind  zones  that  are  dangerous,  some  vehicles  have  blind 
areas  as  large  as  69  feet,  a  sure  recipe  for  disaster  if  a  child  is  in  back  of  that  car 
or  truck.  Back-overs  are  not  ‘‘freak’’  accidents—they  happen  all  too  often  and  most 
important, are completely preventable. 

Currently,  there  are  three  sources  of  data  on  backing-over  incidents  that  provide 

insights into the dimensions of this problem: 2 

• According to a 2005 report from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention 
(CDC),  7,475  children  were  treated  in  hospital  emergency  rooms  after  being 
struck  or  rolled  over  by  a  vehicle  moving  in  reverse  during  the  2001–2003  pe-
riod. 

1 Consumer  Reports  is  published  by  Consumers  Union,  an  expert,  independent  nonprofit  or-
ganization whose mission is to work for a fair, just, and safe marketplace for all consumers and 
to empower consumers to protect themselves. To achieve this mission, we test, inform, and pro-
tect.  To  maintain  our  independence  and  impartiality,  Consumers  Union  accepts  no  outside  ad-
vertising  and  no  free  test  samples,  and  has  no  agenda  other  than  the  interests  of  consumers. 
Consumers Union supports itself through the sale of our information products and services, indi-
vidual contributions, and a few noncommercial grants. 

2 With the enactment of SAFETEA in 2005, NHTSA is now required to collect these data. Sec-
tion  255  of  that  law  directs  the  National  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administration  (NHTSA)  to 
establish  a  method  for  collection  of  ‘‘non-traffic  non-crash  data’’  on  ‘‘back-overs,  power  window 
incidents, hyperthermia, fires and other related incidents.’’ 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

• KIDS AND CARS 3 own data—which is the only database that currently tracks 
non-traffic incidents—shows at least 550 fatal back-over incidents occurred from 
2000–2007,  primarily  involving  children  under  the  age  of  5.  Most  of  these  inci-
dents took place in residential driveways or parking lots. An injury or death oc-
curred  in  99  percent  of  cases  documented  in  the  database.  Over  60  percent  of 
backing-up  incidents  involved  a  larger  size  vehicle,  (truck,  van,  SUV).  Trag-
ically,  in  over  70  percent  of  these  incidents,  a  parent  or  close  relative  was  be-
hind the wheel. 

• NHTSA’s  recent  report,  ‘‘Vehicle  Backover  Avoidance  Technology  Study,’’  [here-
inafter  Backover  Report]  released  in  November  2006,  used  1998  death  certifi-
cate data to estimate that there were 183 fatalities per year from back-over inci-
dents, and between 6,700 and 7,419 injuries. 4 

Young  children  are  impulsive  and  unpredictable  and  they  have  little  under-
standing  of  danger.  They  do  not  recognize  boundaries  such  as  property  lines,  side-
walks, driveways or parking spaces. Toddlers have established independent mobility 
between  the  ages  of  12–23  months,  and  because  of  their  relatively  small  size,  they 
are  often  not  easily  visible  to  caregivers.  Their  concept  of  personal  safety  is  also 
minimal.  Back-overs  are  often  the  predictable  consequence  of  a  child  following  a 
parent into the driveway without the parent’s knowledge. That is the story parents 
tell us time again—they did not know the child had followed them out of the house. 
The  tragic  consequences  of  a  parent  or  caregiver  not  seeing  a  child  and  backing 
over that child are enormous. Dr. Greg Gulbransen, a pediatrician, is here today to 
describe  from  personal  experience  the  tragic  result  of  his  inability  to  see  his  little 
son Cameron as Dr. Gulbransen backed his car into his own driveway. 

CU  is  committed  not  only  to  educating  parents  to  the  dangers  of  blind  zones 
through our publication, Consumer Reports, but to working for the enactment of leg-
islation  that  will  require  that  all  cars  to  meet  a  rearward  visibility  standard.  CU 
believes  that  if  technology  exists  to  prevent  these  terrible  incidents  and  the  cost  is 
reasonable,  such  technology  should  be  standard  equipment  for  all  vehicles.  This  is 
the provision in the Kids and Cars Safety Act (S. 1948, 109th Congress) pertaining 
to back-over prevention: 

(b) REARWARD VISIBILITY—Not later than 18 months after the date of enactment 
of  this  Act,  the  Secretary  shall  issue  regulations,  applicable  to  all  passenger 
motor  vehicles,  requiring  a  rearward  visibility  performance  standard  that  will 
provide  drivers  with  a  means  for  detecting  the  presence  of  a  person  or  object 
behind the vehicle in order to prevent backing incidents involving death and in-
jury especially to small children and disabled persons. 

Does  the  technology  exist?  Yes,  technology  exists  to  allow  drivers  to  see  behind 
them  as  they  back  up  and  has  been  used  for  years.  The  legislation  we  are  sup-
porting, the Cameron Gulbransen Kids and Cars Safety Act of 2007, doesn’t require 
a particular technology—it simply calls for a rearward visibility performance stand-
ard  which  the  automakers  can  meet  using  any  technology  that  satisfies  the  stand-
ard. 

Consumer  Reports  has  tested  both  rear  bumper  sensors  that  beep  when  they  de-
tect  an  object  in  the  vehicle  path  and  rearview  cameras.  CR  found  cameras  to  be 
the most effective for preventing a collision with an object or person behind the ve-
hicle.  Automakers  are  experimenting  with  new  technologies  all  the  time,  including 
sensor systems that will actually park the car. 

3 KIDS  AND  CARS  is  a  nonprofit  safety  organization  based  in  Kansas  whose  founder  and 
president, Janette Fennell, has maintained a database of statistics on back-over and other non- 
traffic  incidents  since  1999.  The  government  has  never  gathered  these  data.  Non-traffic,  non- 
crash  incidents  occur  when  a  car  is  either  parked  or  backing  up  or  moving  forward  slowly  and 
not  driving  on  the  roadways  or  thoroughfares.  KIDS  AND  CARS  data  indicate  that  back-over 
incidents  have  grown  each  year  as  the  popularity  of  longer,  higher  vehicles  like  SUVs,  pickup 
trucks  and  to  a  lesser  extent,  minivans  has  grown.  (NHTSA  disputes  that  the  numbers  are 
growing, while acknowledging it doesn’t have good data to prove or disprove that assertion. Ve-
hicle Backover Avoidance Technology Study, p. 13.) 

4 NHTSA’s report notes the agency’s problem in sizing-up the dimensions of the problem: ‘‘The 
magnitude  of  the  back-over  problem  has  been  estimated  based  on  available  data.  Much  of  the 
difficulty  in  determining  an  exact  count  of  back-over  crashes  is  due  to  the  fact  that  NHTSA 
databases  mainly  cover  traffic  crashes,  which  excludes  back-over  crashes  that  occur  outside  of 
the traffic-way (e.g., on private property). In response to Sections 2012 and 10305 of SAFETEA– 
LU,  NHTSA  is  currently  in  the  process  of  exploring  alternate  ways  of  developing  a  system  to 
improve  the  collection  of  non-traffic  vehicle-related  incidents.  Information  on  the  development 
is  contained  in  the  section  on  ‘Plans  to  improve  data  collection  in  the  United  States’  of  this  re-
port.’’ Page 13, NHTSA Backover Study. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

Is  the  cost  reasonable?  NHTSA  estimates  the  cost  of  cameras,  the  most  effective 
technology in current use for seeing what is behind the vehicle, to be approximately 
$325. If the vehicle already has a monitor for a navigation system, or other purpose, 
the  cost  is  substantially  lower.  Put  that  cost  into  perspective.  A  car  DVD  system 
costs $1,295–$2,097, a moon or sun roof costs $700–$1,595, seat warmers cost $645– 
$895. These are all options that many auto buyers are actively seek out when buy-
ing  a  new  car.  Surely  the  cost  of  this  technology  is  worth  the  price  if  it  saves  a 
child’s life. 

Back-overs  can  happen  in  any  vehicle  because  all  vehicles  have  blind  zones—the 
area  behind  a  vehicle  you  can’t  see  from  the  driver’s  seat.  The  danger  tends  to  in-
crease  with  larger  vehicles.  As  CU’s  Auto  Test  Site  Director  David  Champion  has 
noted  the  longer  and  higher  the  vehicle,  the  more  difficult  it  is  to  see  a  child  or 
something on the ground behind. 

Consumer Reports also advises our readers that ‘‘it’s always best to look carefully 
behind  the  vehicle  before  you  get  in  and  again  before  you  put  the  car  in  gear  and 
back up. Remember to back up slowly, and pay attention to your mirrors.’’ 

Consumers  Union  joins  with  other  safety  groups—including  KIDS  AND  CARS, 
Advocates  for  Highway  and  Auto  Safety,  Public  Citizen,  US  PIRG,  the  American 
Academy  of  Pediatrics,  in  urging  Senators  to  support  legislation  to  require  a  rear-
ward  visibility  standard  in  all  vehicles.  That  measure  is  included  in  a  bill  that  is 
co-sponsored  by  Senators  Hillary  Clinton  and  John  Sununu,  S.  1948  in  last  year’s 
Congress  and  will  be  introduced  on  February  27,  2007  during  the  110th  Congress. 
We  also  endorse  KIDS  AND  CARS’  recommendations  to  keep  children  safe  as 

well. 

These recommendations include: 
• Walk around and behind a vehicle prior to moving it. 
• Know  where  your  kids  are.  Make  children  move  away  from  your  vehicle  to  a 
place where they are in full view before moving the car and know that another 
adult is properly supervising children before moving your vehicle. 

• Teach children that ‘‘parked’’ vehicles might move. Let them know that they can 

see the vehicle; but the driver might not be able to see them. 

• Consider  installing  cross  view  mirrors,  audible  collision  detectors,  rearview 

video camera and/or some type of back-up detection device. 

• Measure the size of your blind zone (area) behind the vehicles you drive. A 5′1″ 
driver  in  a  pickup  truck  can  have  a  rear  blind  spot  of  7  feet  wide  by  50  feet 
long. 

• Be  aware  that  steep  inclines  and  large  SUV’s,  vans  and  trucks  add  to  the  dif-

ficulty of seeing behind a vehicle. 

• Hold children’s hand when leaving the vehicle. 
• Teach your children to never play in, around or behind a vehicle. 
• Keep toys and other sports equipment off the driveway. 
• Never leave children alone in or around cars; not even for a minute. 
• Keep vehicles locked at all times; even in the garage or driveway. 
• Keys should never be left within reach of children. 
• Always make sure all child passengers have left the car after it is parked. 
• Be  especially  careful  about  keeping  children  safe  in  and  around  cars  during 

busy times, schedule changes and periods of crisis or holidays. 

LATCH Car Seat Installation System 

Consumers  Union  has  long  been  concerned  about  the  safety  of  child  passengers 
in cars. We know that when families with children are in the market for a car, child 
safety is one of their top priorities. We also know that parents and caregivers have 
struggled for years to install car seats securely enough to ensure that their children 
will be safe in the event of a crash. For many parents, getting a secure fit remains 
a challenge. 

Lower Anchors and Tethers for Children (LATCH), an installation system created 
to  help  standardize  the  way  child  restraints  are  attached  to  vehicles  without  using 
a seat belt, has been in operation since the NHTSA-promulgated regulation (Federal 
Motor Vehicle Safety Standard 225) became fully effective on September 1, 2002. All 
child  restraints  and  most  new  vehicles  manufactured  as  of  that  date  were  required 
to  include  hardware  components  designed  to  simplify  child  safety  seat  installation 
and  to  reduce  the  continuing  high  incidence  of  misuse  and  incorrect  installation  of 
child safety seats. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

CR  also  noted  in  the  article  attached  herein  that  ‘‘The  [LATCH]  system  doesn’t 
work  equally  well  in  all  vehicles.  In  many  cars,  the  new  attachment  points  are  ob-
scured or difficult to reach, so it’s not easy to use them even with some of the new-
est child seats. In other models, the LATCH anchors are positioned too far out from 
the vehicle’s seat, making it difficult to secure the child seat tightly against the rear 
seat’s back cushion. Try your child seat in the vehicle before you buy.’’ 

In  2005  NHTSA  conducted  a  survey  to  collect  information  about  the  types  of  re-
straint systems being used to keep children safe while riding in passenger vehicles. 
In  particular,  NHTSA  was  interested  in  whether  drivers  with  were  using  LATCH 
to secure their child safety seats to the vehicle, and if so, were these seats properly 
installed. This is what they found, which we thought was quite instructive: 

• 55  percent  of  child  safety  seats,  located  in  a  seating  position  equipped  with  an 
upper anchor were attached to the vehicle using an upper tether. 45 percent of 
parents and caregivers, however, are still not using the upper tethers. 

• 13 percent of the time child safety seat was placed in a seat position in the ve-
hicle  not  equipped  with  lower  anchors—the  seat  belt  was  used  to  secure  the 
child  safety  seat  to  the  vehicle—of  course,  since  we’re  all  taught  to  put  kids  in 
the middle seat. 

• Among the 87 percent who do place the child safety seat at a position equipped 
with  lower  anchors,  60  percent  use  the  lower  attachments  to  secure  the  child 
safety seat to the vehicle. 

• 81 percent of upper tether users and 74 percent of lower attachments users said 

upper tether and/or lower attachments were easy to use. 

• 75 percent preferred lower attachments over seat belts of those with experience 

using both lower attachments and seat belts. 

• 61 percent of upper tether non-users and 55 percent of lower attachments non- 
users  cited  their  lack  of  knowledge—not  knowing  what  they  were,  that  they 
were available in the vehicle, the importance of using them, or how to properly 
use them—as the reason for not using them. 

On  February  8,  2007,  NHTSA  held  a  meeting  to  give  the  public  an  opportunity 
to  discuss  their  experiences  using  LATCH.  Consumers  Union  tests  over  80  vehicles 
each year. We ask our engineers to fit car seats—infant, toddler and booster seats— 
into a wide variety of cars and light trucks, using both the LATCH system and seat-
belts  and  comparing  the  ease  of  use  and  other  factors  between  cars  and  car  seats. 
We  report  the  results  to  our  readers,  raising  concerns  about  LATCH  systems  that 
are  particularly  difficult  to  use  or  belts  that  could  be  better  designed.  Consumers 
Union’s  Jennifer  Stockburger,  an  automotive  engineer  and  mother  of  young  chil-
dren,  made  a  presentation  at  the  February  meeting  in  Washington,  D.C.,  and  that 
Power Point presentation is attached. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

1
n
e
e
r
g

76 

LATCH EFFECTIVENESS 

CU’s  concerns  about  the  ease  of  use  and  operation  of  LATCH  is  discussed  below 

in the August 2005 issue of CR, accompanied by photos: 
The Reality of Latch 

CHEVROLET AVALANCHE—Where do you put the child seat while securing the 
tether?  The  Avalanche  illustrates  the  potential  challenge  in  securing  a  low  tether 
anchor. 

Unfortunately,  there  are  factors  that  can  make  installation  of  LATCH-equipped 

seats difficult or, in some cases, impossible. 

Typically, the safest spot to install a child seat is in the center position of the rear 
seat.  That  positions  the  child  farthest  from  danger  in  an  impact.  Unfortunately, 
most  vehicles  don’t  equip  their  vehicles  with  lower  anchors  in  the  center  seats. 
Chrysler Group and General Motors are good at providing three sets of attachments 
in  their  larger  vehicles,  and  Ford  owner’s  manuals  often  allow  for  child  seats  to  be 
positioned  in  the  middle  using  the  inner  anchors  from  the  left  and  right  side 
LATCH anchors. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.

3
n
e
e
r
g

s
p
e

.

2
n
e
e
r
g

77 

Access to the lower anchors varies from vehicle to vehicle; the best anchors allow 
the  seat  to  quickly  click  or  be  hooked  into  place,  while  others  make  it  awkward  to 
attach and/or detach. Some vehicles have very firm seat cushions, making it difficult 
to fit your hand in to find and access the anchor. Other vehicles have soft cushions, 
but  the  anchor  is  recessed  so  far  back  that  it’s  difficult  to  reach.  Optimally  located 
lower anchors provide enough space for an adult hand to easily access them. 

Getting  to  the  top  tethers  can  also  be  a  difficult  and  frustrating  process.  Many 
vehicles have well-positioned anchors that are readily accessible; parents can simply 
run  the  top  tether  under  the  head  restraint  and  clip  it  into  the  top  tether  anchor. 
Never run the tether over a removable or adjustable head restraint because the soft 
material  in  the  head  restraint  can  compress  and  create  slack  in  the  tether  strap. 
It  is  better  to  remove  or  raise  the  restraint  and  run  the  tether  over  the  seatback. 
Of  all  vehicle  types,  sedans  generally  have  tether  anchors  that  are  easiest  to 
reach, located on the rear deck behind the seats, typically set inside a small, covered 
recess.  Wagons,  SUVs,  and  hatchbacks  with  good  tether  anchors  have  them  posi-
tioned  midway  up  the  back  of  the  seats,  sometimes  with  plastic  covers  that  snap 
in  place  when  they  aren’t  being  used.  Ideal  setups  provide  one  top  tether  anchor 
for each seat location, so the straps are anchored straight back without twisting. 

But many wagons and hatchbacks also have less-friendly tether anchor locations. 
Some  place  the  anchors  at  the  base  of  the  seat  where  it  folds.  These  can  be  a  full 
arm’s-length  away,  making  them  already  difficult  to  reach.  To  access  this  anchor 
from  within  the  cabin,  it  may  be  necessary  to  tilt  the  seatback  forward—a  chal-
lenging maneuver if a large child seat is already on the vehicle’s seat. Other models 
place the tether anchors beneath carpet or covers in the cargo floor. 

Hatchbacks  and  wagons  also  often  have  a  cargo  cover  that  protects  luggage  from 
the  sun  or  the  prying  eyes  of  thieves.  But  the  space  between  the  cargo  cover  and 
the  seatback  is  often  very  narrow,  making  it  impossible  to  fit  the  tether  strap 
through.  The  cover  must  be  removed  to  access  and  install  the  tether  strap,  which 
is just another annoyance to deal with and adds to the potential for parents or care-
givers to opt out of a crucial step. 

TOYOTA  RAV4—Even  SUVs  marketed  to  families  can  present  challenges  to 
child-safety-seat installation, especially when attaching the lower tether anchor. Be 
sure to try installing a seat before buying a vehicle. 

CU’s Recommendations for Improving LATCH Usability & Effectiveness: 
• LATCH anchors should be required in center rear seats. 
• Improve top tether access and visibility. 
• Improve lower and upper anchor clearance so they can be reached easily. 
• Ensure  that  routing  for  top  tethers  isn’t  impaired  by  head  restraints  or  other 

vehicle components. 

• Ensure top tethers on the seats are lengthy enough (CR found they were some-

times too short to reach the tether anchor in the vehicle). 

Power Window Hazards 

NHTSA  estimated  in  a  1997  study  that  499  people  each  year  visit  emergency 
rooms due to power window injuries, almost  1⁄3 of those under the age of 6, another 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

4
n
e
e
r
g

78 

nearly  1⁄3 between the age of 6 and 15. Since 1971, 5 at least 59 children have been 
strangled  to  death  and  thousands  more  children  and  adults  injured  by  power  win-
dows. 6 

When  the  Senate  Commerce  Committee  enacted  SAFETEA–LU  in  2005,  it  in-
cluded  a  critically  important  provision  to  prevent  young  children  from  accidentally 
closing  power  windows  on  their  necks,  causing  strangulation.  Section  258  of 
SAFETEA–LU 7 called for the elimination of hazardous armrest rocker switches, re-
quiring  the  safer  pull-up  or  pull-out  switches;  NHTSA  then  published  rules  requir-
ing  safer  switches  on  all  new  passenger  vehicles  manufactured  after  October  1, 
2008. 8 We have been pleased to see that Model Year 2007 vehicles, with only a few 
exceptions, now employ the safer switches. There remains some unfinished business, 
however. 

While getting rid of dangerous switches is a big leap forward, and should prevent 
most  of  the  accidental  strangulations  by  children  who  are  leaning  on  a  switch  with 
their  heads  in  the  window  path,  nonfatal  injuries  are  still  a  major  safety  hazard. 
Injuries  inflicted  by  power  windows  have  a  very  long  history—and  power  windows 
have  enormous  force:  they  will  literally  slice  a  cucumber  or  green  pepper  in  two. 
The injuries that occur when another person inadvertently closes the power window 
on a child’s fingers or hand or arm are often gruesome. 

And yet there is an easy fix for this hazard—auto-reverse or anti-trap technology 
that  is  commonly  used  in  Europe  should  also  be  the  standard  here.  Like  garage  or 
elevator  door  sensors  that  open  the  door  if  they  detect  an  obstruction,  this  tech-
nology  sends  a  window  down  if  it  meets  with  an  obstacle  in  its  path.  Such  tech-
nology would have saved the many lives of children strangled by power windows or 
are  missing  fingers  or  pieces  of  fingers  that  were  amputated  by  a  power  window. 
None of this information will come as a surprise to NHTSA—or the auto industry. 
Consumers  Union  has  copies  of  hundreds  of  reports  sent  over  the  past  4  decades 
to  both  the  automakers  and  NHTSA  with  heartbreaking  stories  of  small  children 
with  amputated  fingers  or  broken  arms  and  worst  of  all,  strangulations  of  children 
because  another  child  or  adult  didn’t  realize  she  or  he  was  in  the  path  of  the  win-
dow. The history of the government’s failure to require safe power window designs— 
and  the  industry’s  failure  to  address  the  hazard—when  the  technology  is  readily 
available and the cost is modest, is difficult to understand. 

At  least  80  percent  of  the  European  car  market  has  vehicles  with  anti-trap  win-
dows—they  have  become  custom  there.  An  effective  anti-trap  voluntary  standard 
was  adopted  by  the  European  parliament  and  the  Council  of  the  European  Union 
in  February  of  2000, 9 Since  that  time,  no  power  window  fatalities  have  been  re-
corded in any vehicle meeting European standards—and so, though voluntary, near-
ly every European automakers has adopted this technology. 10 

By  contrast,  only  15–20  percent  of  U.S.  vehicles  have  this  technology.  The  same 
models  of  cars  equipped  with  auto-reverse  power  windows  in  Europe  do  not  have 
that  technology  in  their  U.S.  version,  even  as  an  option—the  Ford  Focus  is  one  ex-
ample.  The  estimated  cost  of  making  all  windows  ‘‘anti-trap’’  is,  according  to 
NHTSA, $8–$12 per window for a grand total of less than $50.00 per car. 11 

Legislation introduced by Senators Clinton and Sununu, the Cameron Gulbransen 
Kids  and  Cars  Safety  Act  of  2007  (S.  1948,  109th  Congress)  addresses  the  hazard 
by requiring auto-reverse or ‘‘anti-trap’’ technology in all cars by a specific date: 

(a)  POWER WINDOW SAFETY—Not  later  than  18  months  after  the  date  of  enact-
ment of this Act, the Secretary of Transportation (referred to in this Act as the 
‘Secretary’)  shall  issue  regulations,  applicable  to  all  passenger  motor  vehicles, 
to ensure that power windows and panels automatically reverse direction when 
they  detect  an  obstruction  to  prevent  children  from  being  trapped,  injured,  or 
killed. 

5 Feb.  1,  1971,  Federal  Motor  Vehicle  Safety  Standard  118,  regulating  power  windows,  was 

adopted by NHTSA setting minimal safety standards. 

6 The  number  of  power  windows  has  increased  dramatically  over  the  past  three  decades.  In 
1973, only 1.9 million new vehicles in North America had power windows. By 1994 that number 
was 68.1 percent for passenger cars and 55.3 percent for light trucks. 
7 www.consumersunion.org/pub/1205%20Alliance%20rebuttal.pdf. 
8 NPR 

http://216.35.221.77/templates/story/ 

requirement 

story 

on 

the 

new 

9 See  Petition,  Center  for  Auto  Safety,  Filed  with  NHTSA  August  19,  2003,  page  2. 

story.php?storyId=3915926. 

www.autosafety.org. 

10 Id. 
11 Id. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

Previous NHTSA Proposals on Power Windows 

In 1969 the government proposed auto-reverse technology for all power windows— 
the  automotive  industry  unanimously  opposed  this  measure  and  it  was  dropped. 12 
The resulting standard imposed minimal performance requirements for power oper-
ated windows. Again in 1996 NHTSA proposed a rulemaking to remedy the hazards 
from power windows but took no further action. 

We  urge  Members  of  this  Subcommittee  on  Consumer  Affairs,  Insurance,  and 
Automotive  Safety  to  support  the  Cameron  Gulbransen  Kids  and  Cars  Safety  Act 
of  2007,  which  will  require  auto-reverse  or  anti-trap  technology  and  address  once 
and for all the hazards to children and others from power windows. 
Brake Shift Interlock 
Introduction 

Technology to prevent vehicles from inadvertently being put into gear by children 
or anyone else when the vehicle is in the ‘‘Park’’ position is known as Brake-Trans-
mission  Shift  Interlock  or  BTSI.  It  is  an  essential  safety  technology  that  requires 
depressing  the  brake  pedal  to  move  the  gear  shift  out  of  park.  Since  children  typi-
cally  cannot  reach  the  brake  pedal,  if  BTSI  is  in  place,  they  cannot  place  the  car 
into gear by themselves. 

One  of  the  witnesses  at  today’s  hearing,  Packy  Campbell  from  New  Hampshire, 
lost  his  21  month  old  son  Ian  when  Ian’s  brother  set  his  father’s  truck  into  motion 
and Ian was unable to move out of the way when the truck suddenly started rolling 
in  reverse.  This  is  not  an  isolated  circumstance.  KIDS  AND  CARS  estimates  that 
over 100 children have died since 1998 by placing a vehicle into motion. The govern-
ment  does  not  track  these  statistics  because  they  typically  do  not  occur  on  public 
roadways and have not been officially part of the government database. 13 

S. 1948, introduced in October of 2005 as the Cameron Gulbransen Kids and Cars 
Safety Act, included a provision calling for brake shift interlock in all vehicles with-
in 18 months after enactment. 14 The provision is below: 

NHTSA announced on August 17, 2006 that the Alliance of Automobile Manufac-
turers and the Association of International Automobile Manufacturers were entering 
into  a  voluntary  agreement  to  ensure  that  all  vehicles  sold  in  the  U.S.  with  auto-
matic  transmissions  will  be  equipped  with  ‘‘brake  transmission  system  interlocks’’ 
to  prevent  children  from  moving  the  shift  mechanisms  out  of  park. 15 Automakers 
included in this agreement have agreed to comply by September 1, 2010. 16 

According  to  NHTSA,  approximately  80  percent  of  MY  2006  motor  vehicles  are 
equipped  with  an  automatic  transmission  control  system  designed  in  accordance 
with  the  requirements  of  this  agreement.  More  than  98  percent  of  MY  2009  motor 
vehicles  to  be  produced  are  forecasted  to  be  equipped  with  an  automatic  trans-
mission control system designed in accordance with this agreement. 

While  Consumers  Union  appreciates  that  automakers  embrace  the  importance  of 
having BTSI on all vehicles, CU believes that voluntary agreements are insufficient 
to ensure across-the-board compliance with an important safety standard. Voluntary 
agreements are just that, voluntary, and they don’t bind the whole industry the way 
a  mandatory  safety  standard  does.  Indeed,  a  handful  of  automakers,  are  not  bound 
by  the  agreement  because  they  are  not  members  of  the  associations  that  were  sig-
natories to the agreement, though they may well chose to comply. 

Below is the list of automakers that are part of the voluntary agreement. 
Participating Automakers: 

Aston Martin 
BMW Group 
Ford Motor Company 

12 Id. 
13 Section  255  of  SAFETEA,  enacted  by  Congress  in  2005,  now  requires  that  the  government 
begin  keeping  track  of  injuries  and  deaths  involving  automobiles  even  if  they  do  not  occur  on 
public roadways. 

14 S.  1948,  109th  Congress,  pertinent  section:  (c)  PREVENTING VEHICLES FROM ROLLING 
AWAY—Not  later  than  18  months  after  the  date  of  enactment  of  this  Act,  the  Secretary  shall 
issue regulations, applicable to all passenger motor vehicles, requiring the vehicle service brake 
to  be  engaged  in  all  key  positions  and  while  the  key  is  out  of  the  ignition,  before  starting  the 
engine  or  engaging  the  transmission  in  order  to  prevent  accidents  resulting  from  vehicles  acci-
dentally or unintentionally rolling away. 

15 See this site for information on BTSI: 

http://dms.dot.gov/search/searchResultsSimple.cfm?numberValue=25669&searchType=docket. 

16 The agreement says that ‘‘any vehicle under 10,000 pounds produced for the United States 
market, with an automatic transmission that includes a ‘Park’ position shall have a system that 
requires that the service brake be depressed before the transmission can be shifted out of ‘Park’.’’ 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

Hyundai Motor 
Maserati 
Nissan 
Suzuki 
DaimlerChrysler Corporation 
General Motors 
Isuzu Motors 
Mazda 
Porsche 
Toyota 
Ferrari 
Honda 
Kia Motors 
Mitsubishi Motors 
Subaru 
Volkswagen Group 

The  bill  introduced  on  February  27,  2007  codifies  the  voluntary  agreement  and 
makes it law, thus bringing all auto manufacturers under the requirement to imple-
ment BTSI, but maintaining the same generous timelines for compliance. 

This is the bill’s language on BTSI: 
PREVENTING VEHICLES FROM ROLLING AWAY.— 

(1)  IN GENERAL.—Not  later  than  24  months  after  the  date  of  the  enactment  of 
this  Act,  the  Secretary  shall  issue  regulations  to  require  light  motor  vehicles 
that  are  equipped  with  an  automatic  transmission  that  includes  a  ‘‘Park’’  posi-
tion  to  have  a  system  that  requires  the  service  brake  to  be  de-pressed  before 
the transmission can be shifted out of ‘‘Park’’. This system shall function in any 
starting  system  key  position  in  which  the  transmission  can  be  shifted  out  of 
‘‘Park’’. 
(2)  APPLICABILITY.—The  regulation  issued  under  paragraph  (1)  shall  apply  to 
light motor vehicles manufactured on or after September 1, 2010. 

The  following  is  a  list  of  Model  Year  2007  vehicles  that  are  not  equipped  with 
Brake-Transmission Shift Interlock (BTSI) technology as reported to NHTSA by the 
vehicle manufacturers: 

Audi: A4/S4, A4/S4 Avant, A4/S4 Cabriolet 

BMW: X3, Z4 

Buick: Rendezvous 

Cadillac: CTS 

Chevrolet: Equinox, Express 1500, Express 15-Passenger Van, Silverado Classic 

Ford: E–150, E–350 15-Passenger Van, Freestar, Ranger 

GMC: Savana, Savana 15-Passenger Van, Sierra Classic 

Honda: S2000 

Hummer: H2 

Isuzu: Ascender 7 

Jeep: Liberty, Patriot 

Mazda: B-Series 

Mercury: Monterey 

Pontiac: Torrent 

Saturn: Ion, VUE 

Volkswagen: New Beetle 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Conclusion 

81 

Consumer  advocates  working  on  product  safety  believe  that  if  a  product  hazard 
can  be  fixed  for  a  reasonable  cost,  it  should  be  done.  This  is  especially  true  with 
hazards  to  children.  We  don’t  believe  in  playing  the  blame  game—blaming  parents 
for  being  careless  or  not  conscientious  when  a  product  harms  or  kill  their  children 
is  counterproductive  and  cruel.  If  we  had  played  the  blame  game  with  safety  caps 
on medicines or poisons, on garage doors or cigarette lighters, all of which have been 
redesigned  for  a  reasonable  cost  with  children’s  safety  in  mind—we  would  have 
many more children lost to injury or death. 

Whenever we can, we should fix safety hazards for everyone, but especially when 
they  put  our  children  at  risk.  We  think  this  bill—which  addresses  the  hazards  of 
back-over,  power  windows  and  brake  shift  interlock,  provides  Members  of  Congress 
with a unique opportunity to fix hazards to children at a reasonable cost. 

We  urge  members  of  the  Senate  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation  Com-
mittee to support the Cameron Gulbransen Kids and Cars Safety Act and thank you 
for your time and consideration of these vitally important issues. 

Consumer Reports—October 2003 

DRIVING BLIND 

Every  year,  children  are  injured  and  killed  because  drivers  don’t  see  them  while 

According  to  KIDS  AND  CARS,  a  nonprofit  group  that  wants  to  improve  child 

safety around cars, back-over incidents last year killed at least 58 children. 

A contributing factor is that consumers continue to buy larger vehicles—minivans, 
pickups, and sport-utility vehicles—with larger blind spots. A blind spot is the area 
behind a vehicle that the driver can’t see. 

To  help  drivers  back  up,  carmakers  and  aftermarket  companies  offer  two  types 
of devices for vehicles: sensors and rear cameras. The cameras are marketed as safe-
ty devices; the sensors, as parking assists. KIDS AND CARS has called for vehicles 
to come equipped with such systems. Now, sensors are optional in many larger vehi-
cles; cameras are optional in some higher-priced models. 

We  tested  several  aftermarket  sensors  and  cameras  that  can  be  installed  on  any 

vehicle, comparing them with original-equipment versions. 

The  bottom  line:  Your  first  line  of  defense  against  back-over  accidents  is  to  get 

out of your car and check behind it just before you back up. 

Rear-mounted  video  cameras  also  help  prevent  back-over  accidents  because  they 
let  you  see  much  of  the  area  that’s  usually  hidden  in  the  blind  spot.  But  they  tend 
to  be  expensive,  from  $400  to  $900,  not  including  the  cost  of  professional  installa-
tion, which is recommended. 

A plastic fish-eye lens that adheres to a rear window can provide almost as much 

help as a video camera on certain vehicles and costs only about $20. 

The  sensor  systems  in  our  tests,  which  cost  $130  to  $500  not  including  profes-
sional  installation  costs,  worked  well  for  parking  but  they  aren’t  sensitive  enough 
to be a reliable safety aid. 

backing up. 

************************************************************* 

CR Quick Take 

The  best  way  to  prevent  so-called  back-over  accidents  is  to  walk  behind  your  car 

and check for obstructions. 

If  you  want  an  extra  margin  of  safety,  first  try  the  $20  Rear  View  Safety  Lens, 

which works on vertical rear windows like those in many SUVs and minivans. 

Camera  systems  provide  a  clearer  picture  and  will  work  on  any  vehicle,  but  they 

are expensive. 

Rear sensor systems can help you park, but they aren’t reliable safety devices. 

************************************************************* 

The Problem of Rear Blind Spots 

Back-over accidents usually occur when a person, often a child, is hidden in a ve-
hicle’s  rear  blind  spot.  The  longer  the  vehicle  and  the  higher  the  rear  window,  the 
bigger  the  blind  spot  and  the  more  difficult  it  is  to  see  a  child  or  object  on  the 
ground behind the vehicle. 

To  illustrate  that  point,  we  measured  the  blind-spot  area  of  a  sedan,  a  minivan, 
an  SUV,  and  a  pickup  truck.  We  placed  a  28-inch-high  traffic  cone  at  varying  dis-

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

tances behind the vehicle to measure how far back it would have to be before a driv-
er of average stature (5 feet 8 inches) and one of short stature (5 feet 1 inch) could 
see it. 

We  found  that  a  Honda  Accord  sedan  has  a  blind  spot  of  roughly  12  feet  for  an 
average-height  driver.  That  is,  the  driver  may  not  see  a  small  object  up  to  12  feet 
behind the bumper. The blind spot for a short driver in the Accord is 17 feet. 

The  Dodge  Grand  Caravan  minivan  has  a  blind  spot  of  13  feet  for  the  average- 
height  driver  and  23  feet  for  the  short  driver.  The  Toyota  Sequoia  SUV  is  slightly 
worse: 14.5 feet for an average-height driver; 24.5 feet for a short driver. 

By far the biggest blind spot, however, occurred with a Chevrolet Avalanche pick-

up: 30 feet for an average-sized driver, 51 feet for a short driver. 
Your Choices 

Camera systems. When the vehicle is shifted into reverse, a camera sends a wide- 

angle view of the area behind the vehicle to a monitor near the driver. 

tems also work as parking aids. 

object. These systems are expensive. 

• Best  for  seeing  small  children  or  objects  in  a  vehicle’s  blind  spot.  Camera  sys-
• But  neither  model  in  our  tests  emits  an  audible  alert  when  you  approach  an 
• Details: To use the HitchCAM, your vehicle must have a tow hitch; the camera 
is  mounted  in  the  trailer-hitch  receiver  and  broadcasts  to  a  video  screen  at-
tached  to  the  inside  of  the  windshield.  The  camera  for  the  Magna  Donnelly 
Video Mirror mounts to the rear of your vehicle and sends the image to a small 
flip-down screen below the rear-view mirror. 

Because it looks straight out the back, the HitchCAM shows more area. The Video 
Mirror,  which  looks  downward,  displays  less  area  overall—about  4  feet  behind  the 
rear bumper—but enough to help prevent a back-over accident. This view works bet-
ter  as  a  parking  aid.  The  Video  Mirror  also  helped  us  back  up  to  a  trailer.  (You 
must  remove  the  HitchCAM  from  the  trailer  hitch  when  connecting  a  trailer.)  But 
the Video Mirror was much less effective at night than the HitchCAM. 

With  both  systems,  image  clarity  and  screen  size  didn’t  match  those  of  factory- 
installed cameras in the Acura MDX and the Lexus RX330. But they provide a rea-
sonable image. 

Both systems worked well even when splashed with muddy water. 
Wide-angle lens. The plastic lens sticks to the rear window and allows you to see 

a wide-angle rear view. 

• Best for seeing objects in the blind spot, parking. 
• But  the  lens  works  only  with  vertical  rear  windows,  such  as  those  in  many 
SUVs, minivans, and wagons. It may interfere with normal rear visibility. Back- 
seat  passengers  or  cargo  may  block  the  view,  and  the  lens  is  subject  to  reflec-
tions. You must keep it free from smudges. 

tested, 

The  model  we 

the  Elite  Enterprises  Rear  View  Safety  Lens, 
www  .rearlens.com,  is  6  x  8  inches  and  made  of  plastic.  Because  the  lens  is  small, 
details  are  hard  to  see.  But  the  lens  significantly  reduced  the  blind  spot  on  most 
vehicles from 15 or more feet to about 2 feet. 

Sensor systems. Using ultrasonic or microwave energy, sensors detect objects with-
in  about  6  feet  behind  the  vehicle  and  alert  the  driver  via  a  beep  and/or  a  lighted 
display. 

• Best for a parking aid to help drivers avoid dinging fenders and bumpers. Mod-
els  in  our  tests  detected  large  stationary  objects.  For  example,  they  generally 
picked up a 3-inch-wide pole when it was 3 to 4 feet away from the vehicle. 
• But most could not detect objects low to the ground, such as a bicycle or basket-

ball, or a small moving object. 

False  signals  can  also  be  a  problem.  They  were  often  caused  by  dips  in  the  road 
and  surface  changes.  Systems  with  sensors  near  the  rounded  edge  of  the  bumper 
can  pick  up  the  sides  of  a  garage  and  emit  a  false  warning.  In  time,  these  ‘‘false 
positives’’ may lull drivers into ignoring the warnings. 

All require professional installation. 
The  Rostra  model  may  require  cutting  and  bending  the  license  plate  and  could 
interfere  with  the  tailgate  latch.  It  might  also  prevent  the  license-plate  lights  from 
illuminating the plate. The Guardian Alert requires a 2-inch receiver tow hitch and 
5-pin trailer wiring socket, but is the only model that didn’t require drilling into the 
vehicle. All aftermarket systems performed about the same as factory-installed sen-
sors. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

************************************************************* 

CR Quick Recommendations 

83 

If  you  want  an  aid  for  parking,  any  of  these  products  can  help.  To  help  prevent 
a back-over accident, however, only the rear-mounted video cameras and Rear View 
Safety Lens are reliable. 

Of the two camera systems we tested, the HitchCAM provides the larger and bet-
ter-quality  video  display,  but  requires  a  2-inch  receiver  tow  hitch  and  5-pin  trailer 
wiring  socket  for  mounting.  For  half  the  price,  the  Donnelly  Video  Mirror  can  be 
mounted on any vehicle with a rear hatch. 

Among sensor systems, the Rostra system is the most sensitive. For half the price, 

the ReverseGuard provides good sensitivity but no visual alert. 

************************************************************* 

Ratings—Backup  Aids  (Availability—Most  models  at  retail  stores  through 

2003.) 

Cameras—In order of display clarity. 

Brand 

HitchCAM HC–001 
Magna  Donnelly  Video  Mirror  Re-

verse Aid 22336 

Price 
($) 

900 
400 

Clarity of display 

Good 
Fair 

Screen 
size (in.) 

2.75x2 
2x1.5 

Sensors—In order of sensitivity. 

Brand 

Price 
($) 

Sensitivity 

Features 

No. of sensors 

Audio alert 

Visual alert 

Rostra Obstacle 

Sensing System 
250–1594 

ReverseGuard 

Classic RA10 

Echomaster EM– 

PV 

Guardian Alert 

Hitch Receiver 

350 

Very Good 

200 

130 

500 

Good 

Fair 

Poor 

2 

4 

2 or 4 

1 

Yes 

Yes 

Yes 

Yes 

Yes 

No 

Yes 

Yes 

Availability: Most models at retail stores through 2003. 

************************************************************* 

How To Avoid a Backover Accident—What You Can do 

If  children  play  in  your  driveway,  park  your  car  at  the  end  of  the  driveway  close 

to the street. 

Show  your  children  how  hard  it  is  to  see  out  the  back  of  your  car.  Let  them  see 

you disappear into the blind spot. 

Just  before  backing  up  your  vehicle,  walk  behind  it  to  make  sure  your  path  is 

clear. Be sure children are not so close as to be able to dart behind you. 

Look  in  your  mirrors  before  you  put  the  car  in  reverse  to  monitor  the  rear  area. 
Look around while backing up, using all mirrors and looking over both shoulders. 
Back up slowly. 
If you have a backup aid, pay attention to its audible or visual warnings but don’t 

rely solely on the aid. 

Consumer Reports—August 2003 

WHICH POWER-WINDOW SWITCHES ARE SAFER? 

At  least  25  children  have  died  during  the  past  decade  from  injuries  involving 
power  windows  in  cars,  according  to  KIDS  AND  CARS,  a  nonprofit  group  that 
tracks auto-safety issues involving children. Typically, the child has his or her head 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

84 

out  the  window  of  a  parked  car  and  accidentally  leans  on  the  window  switch.  The 
glass moves up forcefully, choking the child. 

Two  types  of  switches  are  inherently  riskier  than  others  if  they’re  mounted  hori-

Rocker  switches  move  the  glass  up  when  you  press  one  end  of  the  switch,  down 

zontally on the door’s armrest: 

when you press the other. 

Toggle switches work when pushed forward or pulled back. 
A third type, the lever switch, is safer because it makes it harder to raise the win-
dow  accidentally.  Lever  switches  must  be  pulled  up  to  raise  the  glass.  They  gen-
erally  have  not  been  implicated  in  fatal  injuries,  according  to  KIDS  AND  CARS. 
Switches  of  any  design  mounted  vertically  or  on  an  upswept  armrest  are  harder  to 
activate by accident. 

Lever switches and auto-reverse sensors are common in Europe. But auto-reverse 
is  required  in  the  U.S.  only  in  vehicles  with  auto/one-touch-up  windows  and  re-
motely  controlled  windows.  (BMW  is  recalling  some  vehicles  because  of  problems 
with the autoreverse mechanism.) 

Clarence  Ditlow,  director  of  the  Center  for  Auto  Safety  (and  a  member  of  Con-
sumers Union’s board of directors), says, ‘‘If garage doors can have a reversing sen-
sor, power windows should.’’ His organization has petitioned the government for up-
graded safety standards. 

In  response  to  a  petition  by  safety  groups  including  Consumers  Union,  in  April 
2006, the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA) decided to ban 
power  window  rocker  and  toggle  switches  from  U.S.  manufactured  vehicles.  Car 
makers will install recessed or lever switches instead. They have until Oct. 1, 2008 
to do so. 

The Big Three automakers say they abide by the safety standards in place wher-
ever  their  cars  are  sold.  For  example,  Kristen  Kinley,  a  spokeswoman  for  Ford 
Motor  Co.,  says  its  power  windows  meet  and  in  some  cases  exceed  Federal  stand-
ards. 

KIDS AND CARS is working with Consumer Union for legislation requiring a na-

tional performance standard for power windows. 

************************************************************* 

What You Can do 

Never  leave  children  alone  in  a  car  or  the  keys  in  the  car  when  kids  are  nearby. 
Pay  close  attention  to  the  design  and  location  of  window  switches  when  shopping 
for a new car. Here’s a basic rundown for the vehicles we’ve reviewed: 

Horizontal rocker switches. Most vehicles from Ford, Lincoln, Mercury, Chevrolet, 

Buick, Cadillac, GMC, Oldsmobile, and Pontiac, and the Saturn Ion. 

Horizontal  toggle  switches.  Some  vehicles  from  Chrysler  including  the  Dodge 

Neon, Stratus, and Intrepid, and Dodge trucks. 

Lever  switches,  the  safer  type.  Acura,  Audi,  BMW,  Chrysler  Pacifica,  Honda, 
Hyundai, Infiniti, most Isuzu models, Jaguar, Kia, Lexus, most Mazda models, Mer-
cedes-Benz,  Mitsubishi,  Nissan,  Saturn  L  and  Vue,  current  Saab  models,  Subaru, 
Toyota, Volkswagen, and Volvo. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JANETTE E. FENNELL, PRESIDENT, KIDS AND CARS 
Child safety and health is purported to be a top priority in this country. Both the 
National Highway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA) and the Alliance of Auto-
mobile Manufacturers (Alliance) have stated that safety is their top priority. Never-
theless,  certain  common  design  features  and  equipment  built  into  motor  vehicles 
still place children at risk of serious, even fatal, injuries in and around motor vehi-
cles. 

In  many  ways,  the  development  of  motor  vehicle  technology  has  improved  safety 
and  convenience.  However,  potential  safety  hazards  have  accompanied  the  develop-
ment of some technologies. Power windows are a case in point. This technology was 
added  as  a  convenience,  but  it  has  also  added  new  hazards.  Power  windows  pose 
a  serious  threat  of  death  and  injury  to  children  when  they  are  trapped  by  the  win-
dow as it rises. This danger has been documented for decades, since power windows 
first  became  popular. 1 Nothing  has  been  done  because  the  deaths  and  injuries  are 
not  reported  as  part  of  the  national  traffic  safety  statistics.  In  the  110th  Congress, 

1 Ralph Nader, May 1968 letter warning about the dangers of power windows. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

85 

we  have  not  only  the  opportunity  but  the  obligation  to  finally  eradicate  power  win-
dow strangulation as a cause of death and serious injury to children. 

Congress recently forced NHTSA to address one aspect of the risk posed by power 
windows. In the Safe, Accountable, Flexible and Efficient Transportation Equity Act: 
A  Legacy  for  Users  (SAFETEA–LU),  Congress  required  all  power  window  systems 
in  motor  vehicles  to  have  ‘‘pull-up  or  out’’  switch  designs  which  are  safer  than  the 
rocker  or  toggle  switch  designs.  Rocker  and  toggle  switches  are  known  to  be  dan-
gerous because they can be pressed by accident, as when a child unknowingly leans 
an elbow on a rocker switch, inadvertently closing one or all of the power windows. 
‘‘Pull-up’’  or  ‘‘pull-out’’  switch  designs  are  not  prone  to  this  problem.  This  change  is 
an important safety advance but addresses only a portion of the injury problem. 

Even  with  safer  window  switches,  passengers  are  still  in  danger  if  someone  else 
in the vehicle intentionally closes a power window without realizing that fingers or 
hands  are  in  the  way  of  the  rising  window.  Children  continue  to  be  killed  and 
maimed by power windows. In December of 2006, a Detroit, MI child was strangled 
to  death  by  a  power  window.  The  Detroit  incident  is  particularly  noteworthy  be-
cause  the  vehicle  involved  was  a  Pontiac  Vibe,  which  has  the  safer  power  window 
switches. 

To  prevent  these  tragic  injuries  and  deaths  auto-reverse  technology  is  needed  in 
all power windows. When a power window rises with 40–80 pounds of pressure and 
meets  an  obstruction,  auto-reverse  technology  would  ensure  that  power  windows 
would  immediately  reverse  direction.  Eighty  percent  of  vehicles  sold  in  Europe  al-
ready  come  equipped  with  this  simple,  lifesaving  technology.  U.S.  children  deserve 
this same protection. 

In  the  U.S.,  auto  manufacturers  provide  ‘‘obstacle  detections  devices  for  sliding 
doors  and  automatic  liftgates.’’ 2 The  industry  protects  us  from  these  moving  door 
panels; but ignores power windows. What’s the difference? Children are just as like-
ly  to  be  injured  by  power  windows  as  they  are  by  sliding  minivan  doors  and  power 
liftgates.  The  industry  needs  to  simply  provide  the  same  technology  they  already 
utilize on doors and liftgates to power windows. 

The  American  public,  lawyers  and  safety  advocates  understand  the  danger  posed 
by power windows and that there is an available technological solution. Safety advo-
cates  have  been  calling  for  an  improvement  in  power  window  safety  for  decades. 
Yet,  NHTSA  has  denied  no  less  than  5  petitions  requesting  that  auto-reverse  tech-
nology  be  added  to  power  windows.  NHTSA’s  reasons  for  denying  the  petitions  are 
the supposed lack of data and cost. 

Current  cost  estimates  are  between  $8–$10  per  window.  If  this  technology  be-
comes  standard  equipment  on  all  vehicles  the  true  cost  will  range  between  $5–$7 
per window or possibly lower. Even at current cost estimates, this safety technology 
is  far  less  expensive  than  many  optional  convenience  and  entertainment  features 
the manufacturers include in their motor vehicles. 

With  regard  to  the  lack  of  data,  there  is  actually  an  abundance  of  information 
about the issue. NHTSA estimates that there could be 499 hospitalizations annually 
(NHTSA  Research  Note,  May  1997);  small  children  are  often  victims,  losing  fingers 
and even limbs. Ten year-old data shows we have a problem. 

NHTSA  reviewed  1997  and  1998  death  certificates  and  located  at  least  4  deaths 
for  each  of  those  years.  NHTSA  is  aware  of  the  8  fatalities  that  occurred  in  2004; 3 
yet  they  continue  to  state  that  ‘‘based  on  all  available  evidence  the  agency  expects, 
on average, at least one child fatality, and at least one serious injury (e.g., amputa-
tion,  brain  damage  from  near  suffocation)  per  year  could  be  prevented  by  the  re-
quirements of the final rule.’’ 4 This simply is not the case. 

KIDS  AND  CARS  collects  data  about  non-traffic  incidents  involving  children 
under  the  age  of  fourteen.  Enclosed  are  two  spreadsheets  containing  information 
KIDS  AND  CARS  has  compiled  about  power  incidents  where  people  were  injured, 
killed or requested something be done about these ‘‘guillotines on wheels.’’ 

Utilizing  methods  anyone  interested  in  locating  data  has  at  their  disposal,  we 
compiled  the  spreadsheets  that  contain  information  about  children  being  strangled 
to death by power windows and others injuries such as fingers amputations, broken 
wrists,  etc.  Though  NHTSA  and  the  Alliance  continue  to  deny  that  power  windows 

2 Testimony  of  the  Alliance  of  Automobile  Manufacturers  (Alliance  testimony),  page  4,  pre-
sented at the hearing on Vehicle Safety for Children, before the Subcommittee on Consumer Af-
fairs,  Insurance,  and  Automotive  Safety,  Senate  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Trans-
portation, February 28, 2007. 

3 NHTSA press event, Children’s Hospital, Columbus, OH, September 2004. 
4 Final  Rule,  Response  to  Petitions  for  Reconsideration,  Power-Operated  Window,  Partition, 

and Roof Panel Systems, 71 FR 18673, 18680 (Apr. 12, 2006). 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

represent a significant risk to all passengers in vehicles, it was information that had 
been reported to them that we used to compile the Spreadsheet #1. 

Spreadsheet #1 contains information compiled from NHTSA Office of Defect Inves-
tigations  (ODI)  reports,  Vehicle  Owner  Questionnaires  (VOQ)  reports,  letters  writ-
ten  to  alert  or  complain  about  the  dangers  of  power  windows  to  Ford,  etc.  The  list 
contains over 140 incidents where people have taken the time to alert auto makers 
and NHTSA about these dangers and provide information about injuries and deaths. 
We  simply  took  the  information  NHTSA  already  has  and  are  reporting  it  back  to 
you in a spreadsheet format. We do not understand why NHTSA has never included 
this information in any of their reports or studies about power windows. Though far 
from comprehensive, (not even the tip of the tip of the iceberg) it does provide infor-
mation  about  the  dangers  of  power  windows.  It  is  important  to  note  that  drivers 
do  not  have  the  ability  to  see  young  children  seated  directly  behind  them  before 
raising power windows. They can alert children that windows are being put up; but 
do not have the ability to visually monitor them while driving. 

Spreadsheet #2 contains information compiled by KIDS AND CARS involving chil-

dren injured or killed by power windows from our database. 

We  know  there  are  hundreds  if  not  thousands  of  power  window  injuries  and 
deaths  that  have  been  reported  to  auto  manufacturers  but  we  do  not  have  access 
to their data, nor is it contained in the enclosed spreadsheets. We feel the informa-
tion provided is compelling enough for Congress to act. But, if the Committee deter-
mines  more  data  is  needed  to  act,  we  suggest  that  the  Subcommittee  use  its  sub-
poena powers to request the relevant records from all auto manufacturers including 
complaints,  injuries,  fatalities  and  lawsuits  filed  regarding  power  window  injuries 
and  deaths.  This  information  is  not  being  supplied,  yet  the  Alliance  notes  ‘‘that 
auto-reverse  was  denied  because  the  petitioners  did  not  provide  data  regarding  the 
need.’’ 5 Why  are  they  not  providing  the  data  that  is  available  at  their  finger  tips? 
We  know  that  hundreds  (most  probably  thousands)  of  reports  have  been  made  to 
auto  makers  about  these  injuries  and  fatalities.  The  industry  has  withheld  this  in-
formation for decades; yet place the burden on nonprofit agencies to inform NHTSA 
and the general public about these dangers. 

The  combination  of  NHTSA’s  1997  power  window  injury  study,  our  spreadsheets 
and  the  subpoenaed  records  of  auto  makers  will  finally  put  to  rest  the  fact  that 
auto-reverse is a necessary safety feature. We encourage and trust that you will act 
with the information provided. 

During  the  last  10  years  KIDS  AND  CARS  has  advocated  for  non-traffic  motor 
vehicle  safety  for  children.  During  that  time  we  have  tried  to  persuade  NHTSA  to 
collect data about non-traffic incidents and bring awareness to the dangers children 
face in and around ‘‘parked’’ vehicles. NHTSA freely states that non-traffic incidents 
are  clearly  under  their  purview; 6 7 but  they  have  resisted  getting  involved  except 
when mandated by Congress to act. 

Again, we need Congress to help save the lives of young children from these pre-
dictable  and  preventable  situations.  We  have  provided  data  that  for  some  reason 
has been ignored by the Federal agency in charge of keeping us safe in and around 
our  motor  vehicles.  We  know  that  the  costs  are  minimal;  especially  in  contrast  to 
the  life  of  even  one  child.  We  know  the  industry  is  already  using  the  auto-reverse 
technology on many if not most vehicles in Europe, and in door panels and liftgates 
and  on  power  windows  for  high-end  models  in  the  U.S.  Safety  should  not  be  a  lux-
ury only for those who can afford it. 

To  honor  the  60+  children  who  have  lost  their  lives  since  this  problem  was  first 
brought  to  the  NHTSA’s  attention,  we  implore  you  to  act  swiftly  and  with  resolve 
to  stop  power  window  deaths  and  injuries,  reverse  the  history  of  regulatory  delay 
and indifference, and ensure that power windows will no longer kill or seriously in-
jure another innocent child. 

Attachments to this prepared statement have been retained in Committee files. 

Æ 

5 Alliance testimony, op. cit. note 1, page 11. 
6 ‘‘NHTSA  is  also  responsible  for  motor  vehicle  safety  when  there  is  not  a  crash  or  the  event 
occurs  off  the  public  traffic  way.  When  the  agency  tries  to  quantify  safety  problems  associated 
with non-traffic or non-crash situations it often finds that it has little or no data and must rely 
on  the  data  gathering,  efforts  of  others.’’  Data  Collection  Study:  Deaths  and  Injuries  Resulting 
from Certain Non-Traffic and Non-Crash Events, May 2004, page 3. 

7 ‘‘NHTSA is responsible for reducing deaths and injuries associated with motor vehicle crash-
es and non-crashes.’’ Interim Status Report, NHTSA Pilot Study, Non-Traffic Motor Vehicle Safe-
ty Issues, July 2001, page 1. 

VerDate Aug 31 2005  12:35 Jul 18, 2008 Jkt 000000 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35958.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

